KONSTANTINOV, and P. MITANOV, Department of Technology of Plastics, Higher Institute of Chemical Technology, Sojia 66, Bulgaria synopsis The compatibility has been studied of two types of synthetic rubbers with two types of phenolic resins by measuring the heat effect of mixing of their equiponderant solutions in varying volume ratios.
On the basis of the calorimeter curves obtained in the study, compatibility has been established for all the components under investigation over a wide range of ratios.
The characteristics of the polymer compositions thus obtained and of the corresponding films depend upon a variety of factors, compatibility being one of considerable importance.
The compatibility of the polymer materials is characterized by their ability to form thermodynamically stable, uniform, and monophasic systems.
The compatibility can be established by means of several techniques: electronographic, dilatometric12 optical,a measuring the heat of mixings and others.
The study of the compatibility of polymers by measuring the heat effect of mixing has had limited application and has not been fully explored yet.
According to Struminski and Slonimski14 the appearance of a positive or a small negative effect should be taken as a criterion of compatibility, while Gurevich and Frost5 suggest as a criterion the abrupt changes in the calorimetric curves, independent of the sign of the heat effect.
This paper presents the results of experiments on the compatibility between plasticized synthetic rubbers, poly(butadiene acrylonitrile) and polychloroprene, and phenolic resins, p-tert-butylphenolformaldehyde resin and a rosin-modified phenolformaldehyde novolak resin, used in the preparation of thermosetting adhesives by measuring with an adiabatic calorimeter the heat effect of mixing.
The ratio of the stock solutions can influence the magnitude of the heat effect, but does not affect the compatibility.
This conclusion was based on the observed compatibility of BPA-phenoxy with poly(buty1ene terephthalate) and a cyclohexylene dimethylene terephthalate/isophthalate copolymer and the presumed compatibility of BPA-phenoxy with poly(ethy1ene terephthalate)
The purpose of this communication is to show that, although such specific interactions may be necessary conditions for compatibility in these systems, they are not sufficient to ensure it.
However, all blends of the two were opaque, which is conclusive evidence of phase separation and incompatibility.
indicate the incompatibility in this system.
DSC curves for P-1,3-PT and a 50 wt% blend with BPA-phenoxy 
The miscibility of polyesters with this material must thus be affected by factors other than the proposed hydroxyl-carbonyl interaction, as the potential for this interaction exists in both the compatible and incompatible systems.
The morphology, compatibility, crystallization characteristic, melting behavior, and crystallization kinetics were investigated.
PP-g-MA had a better compatibilization effect.
All of the researched b-nucleated PP/PTT blends contained b crystals of PP, and the compatibilizers exhibited synergistic effects with the b-nucleating agent to further increase the content of b crystals.
Isotactic polypropylene (PP) is one of the most versatile common thermoplastic polymers because of its outstanding performance; its properties include an excellent chemical resistance, water resistance, good ductility, and low processing costs.
However, in b-nucleated PP/PA6 blends modiied by a PP-g-maleic anhydride (MA) compatibilizer, a high Kb could be obtained, and it was not influenced by the PA6 content.
Menyha´rd et al.14 also observed that the formation of a b-PP matrix in b-nucleated PP/PA6 without a compatibilizer was related to the selective encapsulation of a b-nucleating agent in the polar PA6 phase, whereas the addition of PP-g-MA improved the distribution of the b-nucleating agent in the PP phase to form a matrix rich in b crystals.
However, this research focused on the blends of bnucleated PP with some polar polymers and their modification by polar compatibilizers.
In this study, we adopted a b-nucleated PP/PTT incompatible blend system as the research object and investigated the effect of two compatibilizers with different compatibilization mechanisms on the morphology, compatibility, crystallization behavior, melting characteristics, and crystallization kinetics of the b-nucleated PP/PTT blends to obtain an indepth understanding of this new promising material.
Then, b-nucleated PP was mixed with PTT and the compatibilizers, whose volume ratio was 70/30/5.
Finally, the mixtures were blended with the twin-screw extruder at temperatures of 200– C to prepare the compatibilized b-nucleated PP/ 250 
In comparison, b-nucleated PP/PTT PTT blends.
Calculation of the work of adhesion and interfacial tension The compatibility of the blends could be studied through the interfacial tension and the work of adhesion.
The doublelogarithm form of the Ozawa equation is as follows: where X(T) is the relative crystallinity at temperature T; K(T) is a function related to the decline of the  COMPATIBILIZED b-NUCLEATED PP/PTT BLENDS 1619 Figure 1 SEM pictures of the fracture surfaces of the b-nucleated PP, uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blend, and b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Morphology Figure 1 shows the SEM micrographs of the fracture surface of the b-nucleated PP, uncompatibilized bnucleated PP/PTT blends, and b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA.
On the fracture surface of the uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blends [see Fig.
This showed poor interfacial bonding between PP and PTT, so it was necessary to improve the compatibility of their blends with the compatibilizer.
Compared with the uncompatibilized blends, the particle Journal of Applied Polymer Science DOI 10.1002/app
Values of the b-Nucleated PP/PTT Blends Calculated According to Harmonic-Mean Equations TABLE I Sample b-Nucleated PP ) Test liquid y ( c (mN/m) cd (mN/m) cp (mN/m) Water 105.0 Glycol 77.7 Water 87.0 21.5 14.7 6.8 Glycol 58.8 PTT 29.6 18.3 11.2 b-Nucleated PP/PPg-MA Water 100.9 Glycol 77.0 22.8 19.1 3.7 b-Nucleated PP/SEP Water 105.0 Glycol 85.0 18.4 8.6 9.8 size of the PTT dispersed phase was smaller, and the particle distribution was more uniform on the fracture surface of the b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP [see Fig.
Therefore, SEP had an effective compatibilization effect on the b-nucleated PP/PTT blending system.
Hence, PP-g-MA was more favorable for the promotion of the compatibility of PP and PTT.
Compatibility analysis The compatibility of the polymer blends could be studied through the measurement of interfacial tension and the work of adhesion of the blends.
To study the compatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blends, the b-nucleated PP/SEP blends and b-nucleated PP/PP-g-MA blends were compatibility in the TABLE II Interfacial Tension and Work of Adhesion of the b-Nucleated PP, b-Nucleated PP/SEP Blend, and b-Nucleated/PP-g-MA Blend with PTT b-Nucleated Matrix Dispersed phase c (mN/m) W (mN/m) PP 2.0 50.3 b-Nucleated PP/SEP blend b-Nucleated PP/PP-g-MA blend PTT 1.8 46.1 0.8 50.3 Journal of Applied Polymer Science DOI 10.1002/app also prepared by the same process.
The y values of the tested liquids to the Figure 2 (a) Crystallization and (b) melting curves of the b-nucleated PP, uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blend, and b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA.
It can be seen that the compatibilizer SEP decreased the tension between the b-nucleated PP phase and the PTT phase.
Therefore, both SEP and PP-g-MA enhanced the interfacial compatibility of the b-nucleated PP/PTT blends, and PP-g-MA had the better effect.
Nonisothermal crystallization and melting behavior characterization Figure 2 shows the DSC crystallization and melting the b-nucleated PP, uncompatibilized curves of C for pure PP to 126.9 b-nucleated PP/PTT blends, and b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA, and the corresponding data are listed in Table III.
In the uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT the PP phase increased, and DHc blends, Tp decreased with the addition of PTT.
Compared with the uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blends, the crystallization peak temperature (Tp c ) and melting peak temperature m) of the PP phase in the b-nucleated PP/PTT (Tp blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA c of Kb Values for the PP, b-Nucleated PP, b-Nucleated PP/PTT Blend, and b-Nucleated PP/PTT Blend TABLE IV Figure 3 WAXD patterns of the b-nucleated PP, uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blend, and b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA.
This indicated that SEP increased the compatibility of the blends and strengthened the fractionalized crystallization behavior SEP also decreased the transferring quantity of TM5 into the of PTT.
This may have been due to the fact that the polar PP-gMA increased the compatibility of the blends and might have completely stopped the transference of TM5 into the PTT phase.11–13 Moreover, the fractionalized crystallization behavior of PTT was greatly strengthened, which decreased Tp C. This c the addition of PP-g-MA greatly suggested that improved the compatibility of PTT and PP; this was in accordance with the results of SEM observation.
to 152.5 Figure 3 presents the WAXD patterns of the b-nucleated PP, uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blends, and b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with SEP and PP-g-MA.
The Kb value of the uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blends was 0.41; this indicated that TMB-5 was an effective b-nucleating agent.
Compared with the uncompatibilized b-nucleated PP/PTT blends, the Kb value of the blends compatibilized with SEP changed slightly.
However, the Kb value of the b-nucleated PP/PTT blends compatibilized with PP-g-MA increased markedly.
This may have been attributed to the fact that PP-g-MA had a better compatibilization effect than SEP and promoted the dispersion of the b-nucleating the preparation this study achieved high Kb in the method of PP/PTT blends.
CONCLUSIONS The b-nucleated PP was incompatible with PTT, and the addition of the two compatibilizers decreased the interfacial tension between the b-nucleated PP and PTT.
PP-gMA had a better compatibilization effect.
All of the researched b-nucleated PP/PTT blends contained b crystals of PP, and the compatibilizers exhibited a Journal of Applied Polymer Science DOI 10.1002/app
Compatibility in a Blend of Poly(2,3-Dichloro-l-Propyl Acrylate) and Poly (glycidyl Methacrylat e-co-Ethyl Acrylate)
The compatibility of mixtures of poly(2,3-dichloro-l-propyl acrylate) and poly(glycidy1 methacrylate-co-ethyl acrylate) has been investigated by measurement of the following properties: density, light transmission, glass transition temperature, vapor absorption, and NMR relaxation times.
To varying degrees, all results provided evidence supporting the contention that these mixtures are compatible.
In this article, we study the compatibility of mixtures of poly(2,3-dichloro-l-propylacrylate), DCPA, with a 65:35 copolymer of glycidyl methacrylate and ethyl acrylate, named COP for convenience.
The resulting mixtures are of current interest as resist materials in x-ray Five different types of measurements were employed in this study to evaluate compatibility: (1) density, (2) optical clarity, (3) glass transition temperature, (4) vapor absorption, and (5) NMR.
Such separation is a phenomenon associated with the "lower critical solution temperature," and has been observed in many compatible polymer mixtures3-j In our experiments, the intensity of light transmitted through a mixture as the temperature was increased to 290°C was monitored by recording the voltage generated as the light impinged on a photoresistor mounted on a Reichert zetopan microscope.
Glass Transition Since a single well-defined glass transition was found in the thermogram for each mixture, the mixtures can be considered compatible by this commonly used criterion.
Although our calculated value of 0.04 exceeds the critical value of interaction parameter, the difference is sufficiently small so that the polymer pair can be considered to be on the verge of compatibility.
The observed & values, if taken literally, suggest that the mixture is compatible at 60°C, though perhaps only marginally so around room temperature.
The miscibilities of polyacrylate and polymethacrylate with poly(vinylidene fluoride) have been characterized by several techniques.5,6 
Benedetti et al.8 have characterized the blends of an acrylic resin with fluoroelastomer based on vinyliCorrespondence to: B. S. Kim (kimbs@ynu.ac.kr).
Polymer blends are physical mixtures of structurally different polymers, which interact through secondary forces with no covalent bonding.9 The manifestation of superior properties depends upon compatibility or miscibility of homopolymers at molecular levels.
If the mechanical mixing is strong enough and high enough as much as on the whole, then the viscosity after the mixing prevents the phase separation and the rubber blend can obtain the uniform phase.15 
Kole et al.19–22 have reported morphology, physical properties, dielectric properties, thermal stability, and effect of compatibilizing agent on blends of EPDM and SR. 
The better tensile strength of 25/75 SR/ FKM blend may be attributed to the increase of the technological compatibility.
Technological compatibility means efficient stress transfer from one phase to another phase, resulting in improved physical properties as observed in the present case.
If the blends were technologically incompatible, the physical properties would have fallen.
If the polymer blends are partially compatible, their Tg values will shift toward each other.
Figure 7 shows the tan d temperature curves of the SR/FKM blends.
The better tensile strength of 25/75 SR/FKM blends may be attributed to the increase of the technological compatibility.
The morphology of the blends showed the decrease in domain size with increase of FKM content, which implies variation in compatibility.
Consequently, the SR/FKM blends were increased with the compatibility of the blend by co-crosslinker.
A crystalline polymer, poly(ethy1ene oxide) (PEO), was chosen as a model polymer to blend with these copolymers because of its known capability of forming hydrogen bond.
The compatibility of these blends was established with transition temperature criteria by differential scanning calorimetry (DSC).
The interactions in the compatible blends were studied by comparing the difference spectra of these blends with their synthetic spectra; that is, the addition spectra of the corresponding parent polymers after properly adjusting the weight ratios.
The chemical structure, Tgr qinh, and mol % of hydroxyl group for the copolymers used in compatibility studies with PEO are shown in Table V. The hydrogen bonding formation between the copolymers and PEO was of two kinds: blends of PFA, COPFA, PMA, and PHFA with PEO in which the hydrogen bonding strength was affected by the inductive effects that resulted from the substituent group adjacent to the respective hydroxyl group and blends of COPVOH and PEO in which hydrogen bonding formation was probably due to the strong acidity of phenol groups of COPVOH as a result of resonance effects with the benzene ring.
The effect of increasing the concentration of hydroxyl groups on compatibility with PEO was studied by using COPFA (40.5 mol % of -OH).
In the second category two different mole ratios of hydroxyl group on COPVOH were prepared and the copolymer with 86.9 mol % of hydroxyl group was selected to study compatibility with PEO.
Tgs of compatible copolymer/PEO blends versus blend composition in weight fraction of PEO: (A) PFAIPEO; (B) COPFAIPEO; (C) PHFAIPEO; (D) COPVOH/PEO.
The strength of interaction between the copolymers and PEO can be judged in a qualitative way by examining (1) the lowest copolymer concentration at which a compatible, amorphous mixture with PEO is obtained and (2) the effectiveness of PEO in lowering the Tg of the copolymer.
As a further check of our spectroscopic data we compared the “synthetic” spectrum of PS/PEO (8/1), which is incompatible, with the experimental one.
This is to be expected in an incompatible mixture with little interaction between constituents.
The result is quite different, however, in the compatible blend PFA/PEO (8/1), as shown in Figure 17.
ELSEVIER Synthetic Metals 71 (1995) 2251-2252 Conducting polymer blends of poly(3-octylthiophene) and poly(viny1 chloride) and the influence of a plasticizer on the compatibility N. Ljungqvist and T. Hjertberg Department of Polymer Technology, Chalmers University of Technology, S-4 12 96 Goteborg, Sweden Abstract Meltmixed conducting polymer blends of poly(3-octylthiophene), POT, and poly(viny1 chloride), PVC, have been examined according to their conductivity, miscibility behaviour and their morphology.
mechanical in an immiscible blend, among others, is to use properties) a compatibilizers compatibilizer to increase the strength of the interface between the two phases.
For conducting blends, the compatibilizer may result in increased conductivity.
It is well known that the plasticizer di-iso-octyl transition temperature, T,, of PVC phthalate, DOP, the glass such as lower The primary objective of this work is to examine the effect of the plasticizer DOP on compatibility and hence on conductivity of a conducting polymer blend of poly(3-octylthiophene), POT and PVC.
In the present paper, we describe the compatibility of blends of PVA and DNA sodium salt, investigated by differential scanning calorimetry (DSC), dynamic mechanical analysis, and scanning electron microscopy (SEM).
In this work, the term “compatibility” does not refer to miscibility on a molecular scale, but to a micro-separated structure with improved properties.
have correlated the difference in thermal stability of blends containing cellulose with that in compatibility.
Thermal degradation behavior of a compatible polymer blend is often quite different from that of the blend components.
Compatibility of Epoxidized Natural Rubber with Thermoplastic and Thermosetting Resins JOHN K. KAUITSIS and NIKOS K. KALFOGLOU, Department of Chemistry, University of Patras, 261 10 Patra, Greece Synopsis The compatibility behavior of epoxidized natural rubber (ENR) at two different degrees of epoxidation with hydroxyl-containing polymeric resins was investigated.
The results were interpreted in terms of the acid character of the aromatic or aliphatic hydroxyl contained in the resin and a predictive compatibility scheme based on copolymer-copolymer miscibility theory was tested.
If such an interpretation is correct, ENR should be compatible with other proton-donating polymers.
In this study the compatibility of ENR at different degrees of epoxidation, 50 mol% (ENR50) and 25 mol% (ENR25), with thermally inert (Novolac) and reactive (Resole) phenolic resins was examined.
These studies are of interest not only in order to correlate polymer structure with compatibility but also to diversify the properties of the above resins.
It was expected that depending on its degree of compatibility, ENR would flexibilize the resins and/or modify their impact properties, the latter when rubbery microdomains are formed.
More diffuse phase boundaries are shown by the compatible ENFt50/Novolac blend where a finer state of dispersion is attained.
Moreover, except for compositions 5R-95 and 10R-90 where the Tg, ENR shifts to higher temperatures, (possibly the result of partial miscibility), both pure component relaxations give evidence of incompatibility.
The significant broadening of the relaxation spectra observed in some phenolic resin blends (ENR25-Novolac and ENR50-Resole) may be accompanied by an increase in impact strength in analogy to similar blends.lg The limited compatibility of phenoxy compared to phenolic resins can be attributed to the weaker acid character of the aliphatic hydroxyl, and possibly to its higher molecular weight (reduced entropic factor).2o In the case of CER it is suggested that the curing agent (of a basic polyamide structure) after epoxide ring opening, competes with ENR for the protons, giving additional interand intramolecular bonds.
An attempt was also made to correlate compatibility data using a predictive compatibility scheme tested successfully before3 and based on copolymer-copolymer miscibilityz1 and solubilityz2 theories.
Though the scheme is not theoretically rigorous in that it assumes all x i j to be positive, it is not surprising that its incompatibility prediction on the  464 KALLITSIS AND KALFOGLOU ENR/Novolac blend is at variance with the experimental results using the DMA technique.
The compatibility of some of the polymer blends studied can be explained by hydrogen-bonding interactions.
ENR with a sufficiently high degree of epoxidation is compatible, but probably not miscible at the molecular level, with Novolac resins.
The degree of compatibility is reduced when methylol groups are also present (Resole).
Temperature dependence of the degree of compatibility in SBR±NBR blends by ultrasonic attenuation measurements: influence of unsaturated polyester additive M.H.
The obtained ultrasonic relaxation peaks due to glas-rubber transition were used to investigate the degree of compatibility (DC) in the blends as well as its variation with temperature.
Two polymeric components are compatible if the mixing takes place at the molecular level.
From the thermodynamic point of view, complete compatibility is not a common feature of polymers due to the entropy gain by mixing different kinds of long chains.
However, a certain degree of mixing may take place to produce a semi-compatible blend.
This encouraged the same co-workers to investigate the effect of UPE additive on the compatibility of SBR and NBR in their physical blends [13].
In all the previously quoted investigations, either by low frequency DMTA or by US investigations, the overall compatibility was the main point of interest.
Linear Tg-composition diagram means perfect compatibility, while deviations from linearity indicate some phase separation.
From the a±T curves, isothermal compatibility diagrams at different temperatures can be constructed, from which DC can be deduced at any temperature.
Estimation of compatibility in SBR±NBR blank blends.
The overall compatibility The variation of a with T for B1, B2, B3, B4 and B5 is shown in Fig.
For an incompatible blend, the mechanical loss (and consequently the ultrasonic attenuation coeficient) curves show the presence of two peaks corresponding to the dynamic glass transition temperatures of the individual polymers.
For a highly compatible blend, the curves show only a narrow single peak between the transition temperatures of the individual polymers.
An intermediate situation arises when broadening of transition peaks occurs in the case of partially compatible systems, accompanied by a shift in dynamic Tg to higher or lower temperatures depending on the composition.
The broader the transition peak, the more incompatible are the polymers in a blend.
The maximum value occurs at NBR/SBR content of about 42=58 which is assumed to represent the blend of maximum incompatibility.
The technique adopted here for investigating the temperature dependence of compatibility depends on a model proposed by Takayanagi et al.
If k is equal to unity the two polymers are compatible and a linear relation is obtained between Tg and the blend composition.
Deviation of k from unity is taken as a measure of the degree of incompatibility.
Temperature dependence of compatibility The previous calculations give an estimate of the overall compatibility of SBR and NBR in a narrow temperature range where the glass±rubber transition takes place in the two components or in their blends.
A more accurate estimate of the variation of compatibility with temperature appears to be a necessity.
Some these lines approach linearity at certain temperatures, indicating a fairly high compatibility, while others deviate considerably from linearity, indicating high incompatibility.
Isothermal compatibility curves in B-specimens.
This indicates that the compatibility of SBR and NBR in the blends is not perfect at all temperatures.
The compatibility is moderate at temperatures below 270 K where the two polymers are still in their glassy state.
Thus, the compatibility reaches a minimum when SBR is rubbery while NBR is glassy.
Estimation of compatibility in SBR±NBR blends containing 10 phr of unsaturated polyester 3.2.1.
The overall compatibility Fig.
with k1; thus indicating an improved overall compatibility.
Temperature dependence of compatibility The solid line in the three diagrams of Fig.
Isothermal compatibility curves in P-specimens.
show a sharp drop in DC at temperatures above 333 K, a temperature region in which the blank blends showed moderate degree of compatibility.
Since the previous investigation of compatibility, either by ultrasonic velocity and attenuation measurements or dielectric permittivity measurements, were carried out only at room temperature which usually falls between 288 and 315 K, it would be expected that the addition of 10 phr UPE will improve DC at room temperature.
Youssef / Polymer 42 (2001) 10055±10062 temperature can be used as a good tool for the investigation of the overall degree of compatibility as well as the dependence of DC on temperature in polymer blends which have close glass transition temperatures.
Such an investigation showed that SBR±NBR blends are highly compatible only in a certain temperature range.
The effect of addition of 10 phr of unsaturated polyester (UPE) resin showed that the temperature range of high compatibility has changed and that the compatibility diminishes in other temperature ranges.
In contrast to isocyanomethylpolystyrene, our new isocyanide resins have excellent solvent compatibility.
The monomers needed for 4 are not compatible as comonomers for suspension polymerizations.
The blood tests revealed that by the criteria of the test method employed in this work, cellulosic P E G had a good blood compatibility.
In the present work, the formation behavior of PECs from various types of cellulose derivatives and their blood compatibility were investigated.
Tests, in uiuo, for blood compatibility were made by a method of peripheral vein indwelling suture.I7-l9 By the criteria of this test, some cellulosic PECs were found to have an excellent blood compatibility.
Blood Cornpatability The coating of the sample polymers on the polyester sutures used for the blood compatibility tests was carried out by casting from formic acid solutions.
It can be seen that, by the criteria of the present in uiuo test, the cellulosic PECs have a relatively good blood compatibility.
No thrombus was observed around suture (S); (b) in this case, the blood compatibility was evaluated as ++.
Among the PECs examined, the PECs containing quaternary ammonium cellulose derivatives as polycation component showed an excellent blood compatibility.
In order to discuss the effect of the chemical structure of cellulosic PECs on the blood compatibility, a further investigation must be carried out to clarify the effect of DS values of component derivatives on the blood compatibility.
Cellulosic PEC is a kind of hydrgel , and it is also important to examine the relationship between the water content of PECs and their blood compatibility.
Furthermore, the system of Q-HEC and CMC, in which the complex formation is stoichiometric, is suitable for investigating the effect of the excess charge in PEC on the blood c~mpatibility.~J~ Such studies are in progress in our laboratory using not only in uiuo but also in uitro tests for blood compatibility.
Recently, some investigator have used the specific heat increment (AC,) at T, to investigate the polymer-polymer compatibility by DSC.
The interaction between component polymers in a compatible blend where one of the constituents is crystalline has been studied using the experimentally determined melting point depression.
In our present study we are examining the compatibility of blends of polystyrene and polybutadiene by determining experimentally the glass transition temperature and the specific heat increment (AC,,) at Tg of the polymer blends, as well as determining these quantities for the homopolymers.
From the above milling data, we can conclude that the compatibility increases in the intermediate regions of PS compositions with the increase of milling time.
WEIGHT FRACTION PS Figures 3,9, and 10 we have concluded that PS 116,000 is more compatible with PBD 270,000 than PS 237,700.
for the PS/PBD mill blends, we can conclude that the compatibility increases with an increase of milling action.
From these experimental data it can be concluded that lower molecular weight polystyrene is more compatible with polybutadiene than higher molecular weight polystyrene.
From the TJPS) and AC,(PBD) experimental data of the PS/PBD blends, it can be concluded that the compatibility increases with increase of milling action.
The morphology of nylon 6 and polystyrene (PS) blend with styrene-maleic anhydride copolymer (SMA) as a compatibilizing agent was studied.
Physical blends of immiscible polymers offer attractive opportunities for achieving unique property combinations and obtaining optimum cost/beneﬁt ratios.1,2 Since the most of mixing two or more polymers result in phase separation, the performance of blends depends critically on their phase morphology and the nature of the interface between the phases.
The way to overcome most of problems caused by phase separation is compatibilization, which is the addition of appropriate block or graft copolymers that act as interfacial agents.2 Nylon 6 has peculiar properties, which are high strength and modulus, good chemical and abrasion resistance, high melting point, low coefﬁcient of friction, and toughness.3 However, water sorption originated from hydrophilic amide group in structure gives rise to reducing dimensional stability and damages electrical properties.
Wiley Periodicals, Inc. ing the rubber or thermoplastic resin to reduce moisture sorption and also to improving the processibility.4, 5 The method of reactive compatibilization is very often used to obtain blends with desirable properties.
Nylon 6 blends with polypropylene, polystyrene (PS), ABS, and polymethylmetacrylate by the addition of various compatibilizers have been reported.5– 8 Many studies have been focused on the chemical reaction between nylon 6 and styrene-maleic anhydride copolymer (SMA) during melt mixing and especially the interfacial adhesion between nylon 6 and immiscible components is increased by these reactive groups.
However, the current studies have been restricted to the molecular weight, molar ratio, concentration, and properties of compatibilizer in nylon 6 blends.
Polystyrene (PS; Mw 140,000) and the reactive compatibilizer SMA (Mw 224,000) containing 7 wt % of anhydride were also obtained from Aldrich Korea (Seoul, Korea).
Dichloromethane and formic acid obtained from Aldrich Korea were used to conﬁrm the reactivity of compatibilizer.
CONCLUSIONS The experiments studied here were designed to gain insight into the improvement of miscibility in nylon 6/PS blends using the reactive compatibilizer.
Polymer Bulletin ORIGINAL PAPER Study on the effects of polyhedral oligomeric silsesquioxane on compatibility, crystallization behavior and thermal stability of polylactic acid/polycaprolactone blends Elham Moeinifar1 · Maryam Otadi1 · Javad Seyfi2  · Hossein Ali Khonakdar3,4 Received: 13 October 2018 / Revised: 27 March 2019 / Accepted: 1 April 2019 © Springer-Verlag GmbH Germany, part of Springer Nature 2019 Abstract Herein, the effect of polyhedral oligomeric silsesquioxane (POSS) on compatibility, crystallization and thermal stability of polylactic acid (PLA)/polycaprolactone (PCL) blends was investigated.
However, the compatibility level was notably reduced once the nanoparticle content increased which was attributed to the lower dispersion quality of POSS at higher concentrations.
Differential scanning calorimetry results showed that lower contents of POSS suppressed the solution crystallization of PLA component due to the enhanced interactions between PLA and PCL as a result of the improved compatibility.
Apart from the heat shielding role of POSS, the higher level of compatibility and, thus, more interactions between PLA and PCL were also responsible for the improved thermal stability since PCL is much more thermally stable than PLA.
In conclusion, the nanoparticle-induced blend compatibility could impose positive and negative influences on different properties of PLA/PCL systems, which needs to be further investigated.
Another bio-based polymer is poly(ε-caprolactone) (PCL) which is utterly biodegradable and biocompatible.
If the compatibility of PLA/PCL blends is improved, the application window of this blended system would be extended.
In a recent study [14], graphite nanoplatelets were found to improve the compatibility of PLA/PCL blends via localization in the PCL phase, whereas in another study, titanium dioxide nanoparticles preferably localized at the interface of PLA/PCL blends leading to improved interfacial adhesion between the blend counterparts [15].
The role of POSS as efficient compatibilizers in polymer blends has been elucidated in some studies.
[20] used Janus POSS as a compatibilizer for immiscible polystyrene/ polymethyl methacrylate blends and found that the tensile strength and elongation of the blend were enhanced by adding a small amount of POSS.
Kodal [21] investigated the effects of POSS on the compatibility of polypropylene/polyamide six blends.
In another study, different types of POSS were added to PLA/PCL blends via melt blending method to improve the compatibility of the blend.
[24] studied the effect of PLA grafted with maleic anhydride as compatibilizer on the thermal diffusivity and crystallization behavior of PLA/PCL blends produced via the solution casting technique.
The PCL domain size distribution is much more uniform in the case of POSS1 which indicates the efficient compatibilizing role of POSS nanoparticles.
One of the rational explanations for such compatibilizing effect of POSS particles is the inhibition of coalescence due to the presence of a solid barrier localized at PLA/PCL interface [10].
These results further imply that the lower the POSS content, the better the dispersion quality of POSS nanoparticles leading to the enhanced level of compatibilization between PLA and PCL.
Such enhanced compatibility could result in improvement in the performance of the blends but a question may arise whether this effect is in favor of both PLA’s and PCL’s crystallization or not.
For POSS1 and POSS2, on the one hand, the addition of POSS increased the compatibility between PLA and PCL.
Thus, it could be rationalized that at lower POSS contents (POSS1 and POSS2), the enhanced compatibility mechanism is dominative whereas the nucleating effect is dominated at higher POSS contents leading to increasing the crystallinity of PLA at higher POSS contents.
The induced limitation on the PCL crystallinity at lower POSS contents could be again attributed to the improved compatibilization and thus the enhanced level of PLA and PCL interactions.
However, as the POSS content increases, the Xc values are increased implying the domination of the nucleating effect of POSS to the effect of improved compatibilization.
Such contradictory results reveal that the improved compatibilization effect is the governing mechanism in the crystallization from solution whereas the nucleating effect is the governing mechanism in PCL’s melt crystallization and PLA’s cold crystallization.
These observations lead one to infer that the compatibility of PLA/PCL blends has been enhanced by addition of 1 and 2 wt% of POSS, especially due to the fact that PCL is more thermally stable than PLA, and thus, higher level of interactions between these polymers could positively affect the thermal stability of the blend.
On the other hand, the reduced thermal stability of PLA/PCL blends could be a hint for the decreased compatibility of the blend.
In this study, biodegradable PLA/PCL blends were compatibilized by POSS nanoparticles via a solution casting process.
DSC analysis showed that, despite the famous nucleating role of POSS which is in favor of crystallization process, the crystallization behavior of PLA and PCL components was also influenced by the level of the blend’s compatibility.
Both the enhanced and reduced thermal stability in the case of low and high contents of POSS could be attributed to the lowered compatibility level between PLA and POSS.
Kodal M (2016) Polypropylene/polyamide 6/POSS ternary nanocomposites: effects of POSS nanoparticles on the compatibility.
Finotti PFM, Costa LC, Chinelatto MA (2016) Effect of the chemical structure of compatibilizers on the thermal, mechanical and morphological properties of immiscible PLA/PCL blends.
The dielectric constants were determined by a dielcometer GK at 7000 Hz and 20 i 0.1"C. RESULTS AND DISCUSSION The use of polyesteralcohols in the synthesis of polyurethane foams is limited by their comparatively high viscosity as well as by their low compatibility with freon 11.
The compatibility between different compounds is better when the components have similar dielectric constants.
However, as seen in Table I, the dielectric constants of the oligoesteralcohols synthesized with the waste products from the production of dimethylterephthalate are substantially higher than that of freon 11, which is only 2.3 at 20°C, and consequently only a low compatibility is to be expected.
The compatibility of two or more components can be improved5*6 by the addition of definite kinds of low-molecular compounds.
Because of the high viscosity of the oligoesteralcohols, we determined first the compatibility limits of oligoesteralcohols in mixtures containing various amounts of tris(8-chlorethyl) phosphate.
Thereafter the compatibility of the pure oligoesteralcohols with freon 11 was evaluated by extrapolation.
The compatibility ratio of oligoesteralcohol no.
Low-molecular diols such as ethyleneglycol and diethylenegly~ol~ have a low compatibility ratio.
In order to improve the compatibility of the oligoesteralcohols, we prepared oligoesteralcohol no.
The compatibility (Fig.3, containing tall oil fatty acids, shows a better compatibility than the previous two.
Dependence of the compatibility with freon 11 of the mixture of tris(@-chlorethy1)phosphate (TCA)-oligoesteralcohol, containing 15% low-molecular poly(ethy1ene glycol) (PEG) on the ratio between TCA and oligoesteralcohol with 15% low-molecular poly(ethy1ene glycol (PEG): (I, 0 ) oligoesteralcohol no.
4 has the best compatibility, 0.28, as compared with all the rest of the oligoesteralcohols studied (Fig.
1 does not alter its compatibility with freon 11 (Fig.
2 improved the compatibility of the latter (Fig.
The introduction of the latter in the oligoesteralcohols necessitates the study of their influence on the compatibility of the mixture with freon 11.
Dependence of the compatibility with freon 11 of the mixture tris(P-chlorethy1)phosphate (TCA)-oligoesteralcohol, containing 15% low-molecular poly(ethy1ene glycol)(PEG) and 10% nonreactive fire retardants (NFR): (l,.)
1-low-molecular polyol up to 10% has no effect on either the compatibility with freon 11 (Fig.
The use of reactive fire retardants having a structure (OHCHZCH, )3~H6POCHzCH~OCH20P6Hfi(CH2CH20H)3 I OR I OR where R = CH3 or CH2CH2C1, reduces the compatibility of all the oligoesteralcohols studied (Fig.
The decrease in the compatibility is probably due to the saltlike character of the fire retardant, which raises the level of molecular interaction.
Dependence of the compatibility with freon 11 of the mixture tris(@-chlorethy1)phosphate (TCA)-oligoesteralcohol, containing 15% low-molecular poly(ethy1ene glycol)(PEG) and 10% reactive fire retardants (RFR): (l,.)
An enhancement of the compatibility with freon 11 of oligoesteralcohols, synthesized from the waste products in the production of dimethylterephthalate can he achieved either by the introduction of tris(P-chlorethy1)phosphate or by insertion of tall oil fatty acids or nitrogen-containing alcohols in the chain of the oligoesteralcohol.
Synergistic reinforcement of nanoclay and mesoporous silicate ﬁllers in polycaprolactone: The effect of nanoclay on the compatibility of the components N. Moussaif*, C. Crespo, J.G.
modiﬁed organophilic silicate layers as compatibilizer.
The compatibilizing role of the nanoclay was studied with respect to the morphological, melt-rheological and dynamic mechanical properties of these nanocomposites.
Mesoporous silicate (MCM) is an ordered material that usually consists of extended inorganic or inorganic-organic hybrid arrays with exceptional long-range ordering, highly tuneable textural and surface properties, and controlled pore size and geometry [32], which have been investigated as a drug delivery carrier for more than decade, thanks to its biocompatibility and its nanopore structure [33e36].
There have been a number of studies in the literature focussing on the compatibilisation of immiscible polymer blends by the addition of inorganic ﬁllers, as an alternative way, to modify its interfacial properties.
Analogous to ﬁlled immiscible polymer blends, the use of a modiﬁed organophilic clay as a compatibiliser in incompatible polymer-ﬁller composites remains an important topic of investigation.
Furthermore, the use of commodity organophilic clay as a compatibiliser is certainly more economical than processing new chemical modiﬁcation or functionalization of the ﬁllers.
silicate layers) as a compatibiliser is developed.
Our approach consists of premixing mesoporous silicate with a modiﬁed organophilic silicate layers, which might act as an interfacial agent, owing to its known compatibility with the PCL matrix, will be able to improve the wetting characteristics of the polymer with the mesoporous silicate.
In the remainders of this work, compatibilised samples are named PCL/x MCM-C30B, where x is the wt.% of MCM-41 added to the polymeric matrix.
For comparison, non compatibilised PCL composites ﬁlled with MCM-41 (named PCL/x MCM) were also prepared under the same experimental conditions except for the presence of Cloisite30B (C30B).
The melt-rheological properties of the neat PCL, the PCL/MCM and the compatibilised PCL/MCM-C30B composite series with different contents of MCM were performed on a Rheometer System Gemini HR nano (Malvern Instruments, UK) in an oscillatory mode at a temperature of 90 C, using a stainless steel parallel-plate geometry of 20 mm of diameter with the gap set of 1000 mm.
As the objective of the present paper was to examine the compatibilising effect of the clay C30B in PCL/MCM composites, TEM observations of the prepared composites were carried out.
2 shows TEM micrographs with different magniﬁcations of the compatibilised nanocomposite PCL/3MCM-C30b (Fig.
2a) and noncompatibilised composite PCL/3 MCM (Fig.
A nanoscale and ﬁne dispersion of mesoporous silicate particles, with uniform size, is observed in the compatibilised composite matrix (Fig.
2b, the mesoporous silicates appear highly agglomerated in the noncompatibilised composite matrix, due to a lack of interaction between the hydrophobic polymer and the hydrophilic nature of the mesoporous silicale.
These observations point to the beneﬁcial effect of the organophilic silicate layers (C30B) as an interfacial compatibilizer, capable of reducing the interfacial tension between the mesoporous silicate particles and the PCL and giving rise to a homogeneous dispersion of the mesoporous silicate particles.
3 shows the dynamic viscosity (h0) versus frequency, for different amounts of MCM in compatibilised and non compatibilised PCL composites.
3, the non-compatibilised composites (open symbols) exhibit a small frequency dependence similar to the neat PCL, revealing a Newtonian plateau at low frequencies, with a so-called pseudo-plastic behaviour at high frequencies.
In contrast, the compatibilised composites (ﬁlled symbol) show much higher viscosity value than those of non compatibilised ones.
The viscosity curves versus frequency of the compatibilised composites have a much steeper slope at low frequencies, exhibiting a very strong shear thinning behaviour, specially at a content of 4 wt.% of MCM.
The increase in the viscosity with MCM content in the compatibilised composites is primarily caused by a dramatic increase in the storage modulus G0, as may be seen in Fig.
The values of G0 of the compatibilised PCL/MCM-C30B are shown monotonically increased with MCM loading at low frequencies and got close to each other at a high frequency range, which corresponds to the segmental motion of the polymer molecules.
The effect of MCM content become much more notable at low frequencies for the comapatibilised composites than for the non-compatibilised ones (Fig.
(a) compatibilised (with 0.5 wt.% C30B), (b) non-compatibilised.
compatibilised composites change signiﬁcantly and G0 becomes nearly independent of frequency (Fig.
As the MCM content increases in such nanocomposite systems (compatibilised ones), the interaction sites also increase, and a rubber-like interconnected structure is assumed to be formed.
Dependence of the dynamic viscosity on the frequency for different amounts of MCM in compatibilised (ﬁlled symbol) and non compatibilised (open symbol) PCL composites.
5 shows plots of G0 versus G00 for the pure PCL, the non compatibilised (PCL-MCM) and the compatibilised composites (PCL-MCM-C30B) with frequency as a parameter.
5, the curves of non-compatibilised composites with different compositions fall all on the same curve of the pure PCL and exhibit a slope of 2 at low frequencies.
However, for the compatibilised composites samples, the G0 versus G00 curves, do not coincide with that of PCL and their slope decreases with increasing MCM contents.
The shift and the change in slope of the G0 versus G00 curves indicate that the microstructure of these nanocomposites changes signiﬁcantly with addition of MCM: the interaction between PCL matrix and MCM increases obviously with the addition of MCM, when the composite is compatibilised [56].
The solid-like relaxation observed above for the compatibilised nanocomposites (PCL/MCM-C30B) is a clear indication of a long-time relaxation process resulting from enhanced levels of interactions between the MCM silicates and the polymer components.
Dependence of the storage modulus G0 (a) and the loss modulus G00 (b) on the frequency for different amounts of MCM in compatibilised (ﬁlled symbol) and non compatibilised (open symbol) PCL composites.
Therefore, the elastic modulus of both non-compatibilised (PCL/MCM) and compatibilised PCL/MCM-C30B (nano) composites with different MCM loading were characterized.
Storage modulus G0 versus loss modulus G00 of compatibilised (ﬁlled symbol) and non compatibilised (open symbol) PCL composites.
The non-compatibilised PCL/MCM composites (Fig.
In sharp contrast, the compatibilised PCL/MCM-C30B nanocomposites (Fig.
In fact, at 27 and 35 C, the elastic modulus (E) of the compatibilised nanocomposites containing 4 wt.% of MCM are approximately 55% and 52% higher compared to that of the PCL matrix, respectively (Table 1).
Dependence of the elastic modulus on the temperature for different amounts of MCM in compatibilised (ﬁlled symbol) and non-compatibilsed (open symbol) PCL (nano) composites.
Table 1 Dependence of the elastic modulus (E) On the amount of MCM (in wt.% and volume fraction Vf) in compatibilised and non compatibilised PCL nanocomposites.
The experimental and the predicted normalized elastic modulus (E/Em) versus the volume fraction of MCM in both compatibilised and non compatibilised PCL composites, at 27 and 35 C, are shown in Fig.
The experimental values of non-compatibilised (open symbols) composites have shown a negative deviation from both of the two prediction models.
However, in compatiblised nanocomposites (ﬁlled symbols), the experimental values have shown to ﬁt the Guth prediction model with a slight positive deviation.
These results indicate that at a given content of MCM the compatibilised nanocomposites possess different structure than that of non comaptibilised one.
The considerable improvement in the stiffness of the compatibilised PCL nanocomposites (at least up to a mesoporous silicate loading of 4 wt.%), can be the consequence of the high dispersion of the ﬁllers as well as of their synergistic interactions with the polymer.
Dependence of the normalized elastic modulus on the volume fraction of MCM in compatibilised (ﬁlled symbol) and non-compatibilised (open symbol) PCL (nano) composites, for different temperatures.
Dependence of the elongation at break (at room temperature) on the amount of MCM in compatibilised (ﬁlled symbol) and non-compatibilised (open symbol) PCL (nano)composites.
Polymer 53 (2012) 3741e3748 3747 (C30B) as compatibilising agent improves the dispersion of the mesoporous silicates and their interfacial interactions with the PCL matrix.
Due to the synergistic effects that arise from the combination of modiﬁed layered clays and mesoporous silicate, an enhancement of the thermo-mechanical performances of the compatibilised nanocomposites is achieved.
The results shown above, indicate again clearly, that modiﬁed organophilic layered silicates such as C30B play a potential role in improving the compatibility of MCM with PCL.
PCL PCL/C30B PCL/2 MCM PCL/3 MCM PCL/2 MCM compatibilised PCL/3 MCM compatibilised Tc (oC) 33.3 34.3 31.8 32.1 32.1 31.9 Tm (oC) 57.4 56.8 56.5 56.9 56.9 56.3 DHm (J/g) 64.9 62.8 62.6 62.2 64.1 64.1 Xc% 45.7 44.5 45.0 45.1 46.3 46.8 separately to PCL.
Conclusions PCL/MCM nanocomposite materials were successfully prepared by melt-extrusion, using modiﬁed organophlic silicate layers as compatibiliser.
The role of silicate layers as a compatibiliser was investigated with respect to the morphological, rheological and dynamic mechanical properties of these nanocomposites materials.
The rheological analysis found that the addition of MCM (up to 4 wt.%) in the non-compatibilised composite did not have large effect on the viscosity of PCL.
However, the compatibilised nanocomposite (using moderate nanoclays content of 0.5 wt.%) ﬁlled with 3 or 4 wt.% MCM displayed notable shear thinning behaviour at low frequency and had much higher viscosity than the corresponding non compatibilised one.
The storage modulus of the compatibilised nanocomposites showed a monotonic increase with MCM content in low frequency region due to the interaction between the PCL matrix and MCM, which was consistent with the slope changes found in the ColeeCole plot.
A reliable method to decide whether two polymers A and B are miscible or incompatible would be very helpful in many ways.
Because of the fact that favorable interactions are required for the formation of an IPC as well as for the homogeneous mixing of polymers in the pure state, numerous attempts have been made to obtain information on polymer compatibility from easy to realize viscometric measurements [ 1 ] with solvent/polymer A/polymer B systems.
The present work was undertaken to study the correlation between the dilute solution behavior of polymer blends and the compatibility of the high molecular weight components.
In the following we are checking to what extent the formation of mixed aggregates in the case of compatible polymers, even at inﬁ nite dilution, manifests itself in deviations of < [ η ] > from additivity.
In the literature one can ﬁ nd some reports concerning deviations from Philippoff’s law, but the required information on polymer compatibility is, in most cases, unavailable.
Unfortunately reliable information on the compatibility of the blends is lacking for all the systems reported by Budtov.
Based on Tg measurements, the authors concluded that these polymers are compatible.
In order to back up their statement, they also measured the blend viscosities in dilute DMF solutions and found that Krigbaum’s criterion for compatibility was obeyed.
The negative deviation from additivity supports the proposed correlation between polymer compatibility and the formation of interpolymer complexes.
As already mentioned, 192 reports on viscometric measurements performed to obtain information on polymer compatibility can be found in the literature; however, the work of Parashar turned out to be the only one proving that the conclusion drawn from the measured < b > values ( Equation 4 ) is correct.
The compatibility of dextran and pullulan has recently been proved by means of the experimental phase diagram water/dextran/pullulan in combination with its modeling.
Conclusion For polymer research it would be very helpful to have a quick and reliable tool to answer the question of whether two polymers are compatible or not.
Interpolymer Complexes and Polymer Compatibility Macromolecular Rapid Communications www.mrc-journal.de trustworthiness of the proposed quick assessment of polymer compatibility.
1988 , 35 , Received: June 19, 2012; Revised: July 16, 2012; Published online: ; DOI: 10.1002/marc.201200431 Keywords: dextran ; interpolymer complex ; intrinsic viscosity ; polymer compatibility ; pullulan [ 1 ] W. Krigbaum , F. T. Wall , J. Polymer Sci.
The compatibility of the pCIS-co-S copolymers with PPO depends on the fraction of styrene in the copolymer.
Its p-chlorostyrene content, determined by elemental analysis for chlorine, was 50.1 mole%; this polymer thus lies within the range of compatibility with PPO.
Figure 4 is representative of the several compatible blends studied.
However, the impurities present in the PPO and the multiple peaks observed for unblended components yielded the conclusion that TSD measure ments cannot be used unequivocally to infer polymer polymer compatibility for this system.
All rights reserved Printed in Great Britain 0141-3910/98/$—see front matter Evaluation of compatibility of EPDM and butyl rubber—II.
Oltenitei, Bucharest 79628, Romania cFaculty of Chemistry, University of Bucharest, 13 Carol I Av., Bucharest 70346, Romania (Received 5 November 1997; accepted 30 December 1997) The exposure of ethylene-propylene terpolymer/butyl rubber blends to gamma radiation was carried out in order to evaluate the level of their compatibilization.
Previous experiments concerning the radiation stability of EPDM6 and IIR11 have emphasized that these polymers are convenient for the processing under the action of high energy radiation.12,13 In this paper the results obtained in the investigation on the compatibilization of ethylene-propylene terpolymer (EPDM) and butyl rubber (IIR) are reported.
The mixture containing 75 % EPDM presents the highest crosslinking rate, like uncompounded EPDM.6 In contrast with pure elastomer, after the maximum level of crosslinking  Evaluation of compatibility of EPDM and butyl rubber—II 571 is attained the rate of scission increases because of the degradation of IIR fraction.
Evaluation of compatibility of EPDM and butyl rubber—II 573 Table 2.
In continuation of our earlier work6 on polymerplasticizer compatibility, in this article we will describe the composition-dependent effects of lowmolecular-weight poly ( p -t-butyl phenol formaldehyde PTBF) , as an additive, on the miscibility and the mechanical properties of poly (methyl methacrylate) (PMMA).
This article was downloaded by: [New York University] On: 20 October 2014, At: 18:59 Publisher: Taylor & Francis Informa Ltd Registered in England and Wales Registered Number: 1072954 Registered office: Mortimer House, 37-41 Mortimer Street, London W1T 3JH, UK Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition Publication details, including instructions for authors and subscription information: http://www.tandfonline.com/loi/tbsp20 Effect of synthesis temperature of PEO-grafted PU/PS IPNs on surface morphology and in vitro blood compatibility J. H. Kim & S. C. Kim Published online: 02 Apr 2012.
To cite this article: J. H. Kim & S. C. Kim (2003) Effect of synthesis temperature of PEO-grafted PU/PS IPNs on surface morphology and in vitro blood compatibility , Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition, 14:6, 601-614, DOI: 10.1163/15685620360674281 To link to this article: http://dx.doi.org/10.1163/15685620360674281 PLEASE SCROLL DOWN FOR ARTICLE Taylor & Francis makes every effort to ensure the accuracy of all the information (the “Content”) contained in the publications on our platform.
Also available online www.vsppub.com Effect of synthesis temperature of PEO-grafted PU/PS IPNs on surface morphology and in vitro blood compatibility ¤ J. H. KIM and S. C. KIM Center for Advanced Functional Polymers, Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology, 373-1, Kusong-dong, Yusong-gu, Taejon 305-701, South Korea Received 4 February 2002; revised 2 December 2002; accepted 25 February 2003 Abstract—When hydrophilic/ hydrophobicpolymers have a microdomain structure, platelet adhesion and activationare effectivelysuppressed by prohibition of the excessive assembly of glycoproteinsand adenosine triphosphate (ATP) consumption of the platelets on the surface.
In this study, poly(ethylene oxide)-grafted hydrophilic polyurethane (PU)/hydrophobic polystyrene (PS) interpenetrating polymer networks (IPNs) were synthesized by varying the synthesis temperature to control the phase separation and the microdomain surface structure, and the effect of the degree of phase separation on the in vitro blood compatibility.
The microdomain structure on the surface affected the adhesion and the activation of the adhered platelets, and the suppression of the phase separation resulted in the decrease of the domain size, which also enhanced the blood compatibility of the PEO-grafted PU /PS IPNs.
Key words: Biocompatibility; brinogen; platelet; phase separation; IPN.
INTRODUCTION Surface properties of the biomedical polymers govern the blood compatibility; in particular the surface morphology, surface roughness and the surface energy are the key factors determining the antithrombogenicity of the materials.
Since 1994 we have reported that hydrophilic PU/hydrophobic PS IPNs exhibit good blood compatibility, as well as excellent mechanical properties.
They investigated the effect of the degree of phase separation and morphological pattern on the bloodcompatibility with controlled morphology [16–19].
The composition of monomers and crosslink density considerably affected bloodcompatibility, since the size of the dispersed PS-domain was affected by those conditions.
Recently, we introduced the mobile pendant PEO chains on the PU/PS IPNs for enhanced bloodcompatibility of the hydrophilic/ hydrophobic polymers [20, 21].
Surface roughness also seems to be a very important factor affecting the blood compatibility of PEO-grafted PU /PS IPNs (in particular initial adsorption of brinogens), though the difference of domain size was 3-times larger than the difference of roughness; the degree of phase separation and domain size seem to be more important factors.
The percentage adhesion decreased from 59.5% to 40.4%, and the number of the adhered platelets decreased from 9000 platelets / mm2 to 6182 platelets / mm2 as the synthesis temperature of the PS network during the ± synthesis of PEO-grafted PU/PS IPNs was decreased from 80 C. As a result, we found that the microdomain structure had an effect on the adhesion and the activation of the adhering platelets also on the PEO-grafted surfaces, and the suppression of the phase separation, that is, the decrease of the domain size enhanced the blood compatibility of the PEO-grafted PU /PS IPNs.
The adsorption of brinogen and adhesion of platelets was dramatically suppressed by lowering the synthesis temperature, which indicated that the bloodcompatibility of PEO-grafted PU/PS IPNs was enhanced by increasing the degree of mixing between the phases and diminishing the size of domains.
At 260°C and after 60 min’ blending, the blend containing 30% P46 became an almost compatible system for appearing of a single glass transition temperature.
After 60 min’ of blending, the compatibility of the system can be greatly improved even for the blend containing 40% P46 mixed at 260°C by the micrograph’s observation.
Porter and Wang provided an overview on the compatibility and transesterification of various polymer blend^.^ Blends of liquid crystalline polymers (LCP) with engineering plastics have become recently a major research effort.
If there is strong interaction taking place between the LCP and the matrix polymer, a more compatible LCP blend will result.
This article is concerned with the compatibility of the blends resulting from the transesterification between PC and liquid crystalline polyesters.
The single Tg of a totally compatible binary poly mer blend can be predicted by the Fox equation: 80 T P4630% 70 6 0 50 ‘ 0 PC = P46 10 30 20 40 Reaction Time (min) 50 60 70 120 110 100 A P46 10% 90 P46 20% 80 v P46 30% P C 70 60”1’6, 50 , , 0 10 20 30 40 Reaction Time (min) 50 60 70 Figure 8 PC blends mixed at 250°C for different times.
CONCLUSIONS Blends of P46 and PC at various compositions were studied to understand their compatibility at different blending temperatures and time.
Rheological behavior and two Tg’s found from the DSC thermograms at all blend compositions indicated blend incompatibility for both sets of blends.
The incompatibility of the vulcanized blends was also found by measuring the spin–spin relaxation time T2 by pulsed NMR.
© 2003 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 89: 837–847, 2003 Key words: rheology; rubber; compatibility; bromination; power law index INTRODUCTION ethylene–propylene–diene In the rubber industry, rubber blends have been widely used to obtain the best characteristics of each single rubber.
This has been recognized to cause both inferior static and dynamic mechanical properties such as poor tensile strength, fatigue resistance, and high hysteresis in the rubber blend.6 Consequently, many attempts to improve the properties have been reported to achieve an equivalent cure rate between the two rubbers.6–15 For example, grafting of the vulcanization inhibitor, prevulcanization inhibitor (PVI) groups, onto the EPDM was found to reduce the access of the natural rubber (NR) to the cure system.7 Improvement of crosslinking distribution and tensile strength was then achieved.7,8 Grafting of accelerators onto EPDM has also been reported to be effective in providing cure compatibility.6 Maleic anhydride was Correspondence to: S. Kiatkamjornwong (ksuda@chula.
89, 837–847 (2003) © 2003 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. grafted and then provided a metal-chelating group on the EPDM by Coran.9,10 Carboxylated EPDM and halogenated EPDM were found to increase the number of cure sites resulting in cure compatibility.11–15 Most attempts clearly showed a signiﬁcant improvement in overall properties.
In this study we have therefore evaluated the rheological properties and compatibility of the brominated EPDM (BEPDM) blend with natural rubber (STR5L) and those blends of the unmodiﬁed EPDM with STR5L.
Recently there have been some reports of employing a pulsed NMR technique to investigate the crystallization of polymers18,19 and polymer blends.16,20,21 We then also used the pulsed NMR technique to characterize the compatibility of the blends by measuring the spin–spin relaxation time T2 of the vulcanized rubber blends.
Rheological properties and compatibility The log–log plots of apparent shear stress versus apparent shear rate for STR5L/EPDM and STR5L/ BEPDM blends with various blend compositions are shown in Figures 4 and 5, respectively.
The log additive rule of polymeric blend, viscosity, and glass-transition measurements were used to elucidate the blend compatibility.
Box 105, Yusung, Daejon 305-600, South Korea 3Department of Chemical Engineering and Technology, Shanghai University, Jiading, Shanghai 201800, China Received 27 March 2002; accepted 27 June 2002 ABSTRACT: To endow blood-compatible properties onto polypropylene (PP) ﬁlm, we grafted 2,3-epoxypropyl methacrylate (EPMA) to PP ﬁlm with a preirradiation grafting technique and then introduced various functional groups onto the grafted PP ﬁlm.
We also immobilized heparin on aminated PP ﬁlm to compare blood compatibility with various functionalized samples.
The blood compatibility of various functional groups and heparin-introduced samples as well as control samples was examined by the determination of platelet adsorption and thrombus formation.
Phosphoric-acid-groupand heparin-introduced PP ﬁlms had especially good blood compatibility.
Particularly, the surface of complex oxygenator circuits has made it possible to maintain extracorporeal circulation in patients for extended periods of time with little, if any, requirement for anticoagulation.24 Although the blood compatibility of  SURFACE MODIFICATION OF PP FILM 1727 oxygenators has been improved, it needs to be improved more to further extend the use time of oxygenators.
Appropriate surface modiﬁcation of existing polymers possessing the desired physical properties is beneﬁcial for the improvement of biocompatibility without the alteration of the bulk properties of the biomaterials.
Kang et al.33 studied the blood compatibilities of heparin-immobilized polyurethane after modiﬁcation by oxygen plasma glow discharge, and they reported that heparin was coupled to the carboxylic acid or amine groups grafted on the substrate surface.
Introduction of functional groups in EPMA-grafted PP Knowledge of the interfacial interaction of polymers with blood is important in establishing polymer blood compatibility.
Blood compatibility The wettability of a surface-modiﬁed material is one of the important factors affecting its blood compatibility.
duced and heparin-immobilized PP ﬁlms had good blood compatibility properties.
References CONCLUSIONS To endow blood-compatible properties onto PP ﬁlm, EPMA was grafted to PP ﬁlm with a preirradiation grafting technique, and then various functional groups were introduced onto the grafted PP ﬁlm.
Phosphoric-acid-group-introduced and heparin-immobilized PP ﬁlms had good blood compatibility properties.
72.7/18.5/8.8, true compatible blends were demonstrated by phase-contrast microscopy, torsion pendulum studies, and differential scanning calorimetry experiments for blends containing up to 40% E/VA/SO,.
This observation implies better packing and a negative heat of mixing and thus is in harmony with a negative free energy of mixing and the observed molecular compatibility.
INTRODUCTION The incompatibility of most polymer blends is a phenomenon long familiar to polymer chemists.
In most instances, this incompatibility can be attributed to the very small entropy of mixing of long-chain molecules In being overcome by a small, but generally positive, heat of mixing.'
the following, we report an example of polymer molecular compatibility involving poly(viny1 chloride) (PVC) and an experimental terpolymer poly(ethy1ene-co-vinyl acetate-co-sulfur dioxide) (E/VA/SO,) .
Incompatible Blend 121 WC 108 Compatible Blend 109 Compatible Blend 110 Compatible Blend 111 Compatible Blend 112 Fig.
Temperature variation of modulus of compatible blends: samples identified in Table 11: (0) sample 108; (a) sample 109; (e) sample 110; (a) sample 111; ( 8 ) sample 112; ( 0 ) sample 113; (A) sample 121.
The dynamic mechanical response of molecularly compatible polymer blends and true random copolymers prepared from the component monomers should be almost indistinguishable.
These results clearly indicate the blends follow copolymer To rules; we adduce compatibility of these blends on a molecular scale.
The secondary relaxations of the compatible blends are intriguing.
While compatible blends yielded dynamic mechanical data indicating a single glass transition, we would expect that molecularly incompatible blends exhibit the glass transitions of their components.2 In such cases, the modulustemperature curve should take on a "step" character, and the loss data should show maxima for each transition.
Internal friction vs. temperature of compatible blends; samples identified in Table 11; symbols as in Fig.
2. blend is incompatible, as indicated by the earlier microscopy results.
The DSC thermograms for our series of compatible blends are shown in Figure 6.
Temperature variation of modulus of an incompatible blend; sample identified in Table 11.
Internal friction vs. temperature of an incompatible blend; sample identified I I -100 0 TEMPERATURE ("C) in Table II.
DSC thermograms of compatible blends; samples identified in Table 11. compositions by an expression such as that proposed by Fox4 for random copolymers : 1/T, = (Wl/T,,) + (W2/T,*) (1) Here, T,, and T,, are the glass transition temperatures (OK) of pure polymers 1 and 2, respectively, and Wl and W2 are the corresponding weight fractions.
The DSC curves of the compatible blends are to be contrasted with the thermogram shown in Figure 8 for the incompatible blend 121.
T,-composition plot for compatible blends; samples identified in Table 11; symbols as in Fig.
DSC thennogram of an incompatible blend; sample 121 identified in Table 11.
Density vs. composition for compatible blends; samplm identified in Table 11; symbols as in Fig.
We speculate that the increased densities of the compatible blends implies better molecular packing due to attractive polymer-polymer interactions.
Polymer blends have been of particular interest over the past several years because of their engineering significance as a means of modifying physical properties of the mixture relative to the starting componen& and because of their scientific value as a means of studying compatibility of M a r and dissimilar m0lecules?9~ However, many techniques such as dielectric, mechanical, or thermal analysis require temperature scanning which is undesirable if the nature of the mixture in the steady state is of interest?
Although great strides in the understanding of compatibility have been achieved with these techniques, the nature of intermolecular interactions, which ultimately determine compatibility, is not directly addressed.
Preliminary results from studies of the compatibility between mechanically mixed polymer blends are also presented as well as some discussion of the possible applications of the technique to the study of other polymeric systems.
If the blend is incompatible on the molecular scale, CP will take place between the protons and the carbons of the protonated polymer only.
If the blend is compatible on the molecular scale, CP should take place between the protons of the protonated polymer and the carbons of the deuterated polymer which are close to the polarized protons.
Thus, by studying dipolar intermolecular interactions between proton abundant and proton deficient polymers under various conditions, one can obtain information on polymer compatibility over short distances.
The d-PS was obtained from Polymer Laboratories and had an M, = 87,000, an M,/M,, 5 1.05, and a reported percent deuteration of > 98%.
In particular, the CPMAS spectrum of the deuterated polystyrene was obtained under the same conditions used in compatibility experiments to determine what contribution to the d-PS spectral intensity would arise from cross polarization from residual protons remaining in the d-PS.
Thus, using intermolecular CPMAS NMR spectroscopy one can determine and assess compatibility, mixing, and diffusion dynamics of blends at the segmental level.
This method should be a very sensitive tool to study the compatibility of polymers.
Among other applications are misciblilty studies of other mixtures, the effect of residual solvents on compatibility and mixing, the effect of additional polymer components as compatibilizers, the study of phase separation of polymer blends, and the study of specific interactions within polymer mixtures.
For high-viscosity PMMA, from 10 to 20%, it is clear that blends appear at the brittle–ductile transition, which is related to the compatibility of the two phases.
As the viscosity of PMMA decreases, the critical amount of PMMA needed for the compatibility of the two phases also decreases.
D638 D790 D790 D256 D785 9815 44.5 2300 75 175 104 85 20.0 Many investigations about ABS blends were reported.
The compatibilizing effect of PMMA in blends was critical to the impact strength of ABS blends and depends on the SAN content of ABS.7,8 SMA resins are of low molecular weight, having low viscosity and high functionality.
Homopolymers, as well as a block or graft copolymer, can be used as compatibilizers that act as interfacial agents, thus reducing the interfacial tension and promoting the adhesion at the interface.9 –11 To obtain the good thermal properties and low price of ABS, in this present study, the properties, compatibility, and morphology of ABS blends were investigated.
When a low percentage of PMMA was mixed with ABS, the two phases were marked by poor compatibility.
Thus it can be deduced that ABS and PMMA lack enough interface adhesiveness and are characterized by phase separation and low compatibility.
The TEM phase morphology of blends, illustrated in Figure 10(b), shows that the abnormal shape of PMMA in the matrix has disappeared, thus certifying that the compatibility between PMMA and ABS is improved.
It means that PMMA particles dissolved, as it were, in the matrix, with characteristically good compatibility.
It can be concluded that compatibility between PMMA and ABS is dependent on both the amount and the viscosity of PMMA.
When the amount of high-viscosity PMMA varied from 10 to 20 wt %, the morphology of ABS binary blends varied from poor to satisfactory compatibility.
As the viscosity of PMMA decreases, the critical amount of PMMA needed for the compatibility of the two phases also decreases.
It has been well established in the preceding discussion that ABS has poor compatibility with a low content of PMMA.
SMA, as compatibilizer, improved the interfacial adhesiveness of two components.
However, tensile strength increases not only with an increase of SMA as 10% PMMA is blended but also from compatibility of the two phases.
When the amount of high-viscosity PMMA varied from 10 to 20 wt %, the morphology of ABS binary blends varied from poor to satisfactory compatibility.
As the viscosity of PMMA decreases, the critical amount of PMMA needed for the compatibility of the two phases also decreases.
SMA, as compatibilizer, improved the interfacial adhesiveness of ABS and PMMA.
Polymer blends generally tend to be immiscible in contrast to miscible low-molecule blends because of small benefit of statistical entropy of mixing which can be caused by long polymer chains.
In this article, therefore we discuss the compatibility of poly(4-n-alkylstyrene)s and 1,4-PI by observing their structures in bulk by differential scanning calorimetry (DSC) combined with optical microscopy (OM).
Differential Scanning Calorimetry To investigate the compatibility of polymer blends, glass transition temperatures, Tgs, were evaluated by differential scanning calorimetry (DSC) using a Q2000 of TA Instrument, Inc.
Temperature-Modulated DSC To investigate compatibility in detail, temperature-modulated DSC measurements (MDSC) were also performed.
As shown in Figure 4, PC3St_10/1,4-PI_12 sample is confirmed to be homogeneous at all temperature range up to 200 8C, blend samples of PC4St_8/1,4-PI_12, PC6St_15/1,4-PI_12, and PC8St_12/1,4-PI_12 are also checked to be compatible as shown in Supporting Information Figure S2.
This sort of refractive index decrease was also observed in poly(n-alkyl methacrylate)s.33 Secondly, the interface of macrophase separated structure could not be sharp enough but rather smooth due to small interaction parameters, vs, between two compatible polymers.
Blend samples with lower molecular weight must be compatible in shorter range than that of PC3St_222/1,4-PI_12 blend.
When phase structures were observed for polymers with the molecular weight of around 10,000, PC1St/1,4-PI blend revealed two phases at all temperatures adopted, while PC2St/1,4-PI blend exhibited phase transition, that is, immiscible at room temperature and compatible at high temperature, revealing UCST type phase diagram.
The other blend samples were compatible.
However, only a few miscible polymer blends with industrial application have been reported so far., The specific (proton donor-acceptor) interaction between polymers has proven to play an important role for achieving compatibility.
This paper is a n attempt to investigate the possibility of obtaining miscible polyamide/ PHFA blends, as well as the eventual use of PHFA as a compatibilizer (coupling agent) for polyamide/polystyrene blends.
This order of compatibility is confirmed by the DSC data shown in Figure 3 and Table 11.
The results suggest that partially compatible to completely compatible PHFA/PA blends can be obtained.
PS/PHFA/PA Blends The possible utilization of PHFA as a compatibilizer for PS/PA blends was studied in a series of ternary blends (Table I11 and Fig.
The results obtained suggest a possible way for the preparation of compatible or partially compatible polystyrene/polyamide mixtures through the use of PHFA as a "compatibilizer."
Thus, it was possible to use the ionomer as a compatibilizing agent for PVOH/polyolefin blends, which were characterized using most of the above studies of the ternaries at increased polyolefin compositions revealed a stratified structure, making its applicability as a barrier structured blend feasible.
the parameters determining a useful blend are rheological, to stratification3’4 during melt processobtain component ing, and physicochemical, interactions ensuring a satisfactory level of mechanical compatibility.
interfacial properties hence that ionomer In this report the compatibility behaviour of meltis mixed blends of PVOH with an olefinic in the complete composition range.
The olefinic part of the ionomer would reduce the moisture sensitivity of PVOH and could also serve as a compatibilizer for a PVOH/ polyolefin (PO) binary blend, leading also to reduced material cost.
Of interest are the comprehensive compatibility studies of PVOH/poly(3-hydroxybutyrate) blend& 7 prepared from hexafluoroisopropanol (HFIP) solution.
), the compatibility the present work dynamic blends was characterized scanning mechanical (F7’i.r.).
integrity at the components’ by the tensile testing Zn’+ blends--characteristic oxygen of the pendant In the case of the ternary is secured by the mechanical This is for the of strong these may reactions of the Zn”+ of the DISCUSSION Small limited mixing further corroborated PVOH/ionomer, adhesive arise from the complexation ionomer with the electronegative hydroxyl blends, mechanical compatibility ionomer-essentially on a molecular reported Morphological for PVOH stratification.
European Polymer Journal 36 (2000) 1525–1532 Structural compatibility in composite hydrogels III.
This oers preliminary evidence that the component homopolymers are spatially compatible on a dimensional scale deﬁned by T1 in the sense that the principal relaxing moiety or moieties in the composite at a given temperature can relax the remaining protons in the system via spin diusion.
The inﬂuence of spin diusion on relaxation and the way in which it can be used to extract information on spatial compatibility are now examined in more detail.
This latter assertion, which is also reﬂected in the observation of exponential spin lattice relaxation in the composite polymer, is the basis on which the scale of compatibility in the composites is determined.
path lengths are 23.7 and 20.5 nm for Samples I and II, respectively, which deﬁnes the scale of compatibility achieved in the two composites.
One possibility lies in the realization of a monolayer made of a blend of incompatible polymers.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION In the following section, we discuss the conditions which determine polymer incompatibility at the air/water interface, as they result from our model system.
Therefore, the combination of these two characteristics (the good spreadability and the autophobicity) made PMMA and its alkyl-derivatives the best candidates to be selected in order to study polymer incompatibility in a strictly two-dimensional environment.
Therefore, our initial hypothesis is verified, and the diblock copolymer adopted in our calculations displays behavior which is fully compatible with the expected lineactant action on the components of the binary mixture.
Optical micrograph of the films of the blends more intimate as (av)r showed interactions between the two polymers with 18% PEMA composition, which appears to he increases, as further evidence of compatibility and miscibility of the two polymers.
INTRODUCTION The recent article of Olayemi and Ibiyeye' is one of the few reports on detailed study of the miscibility and compatibility of poly(viny1 acetate) (PVAc) with poly(ethy1 methacrylate) (PEMA)-two polymers with relatively polar groups.
The much earlier report by Van Eijnsbergen2 on this polymer pair claimed their incompatibility apparently without proofs.
Olayemi and Ibiyeye,' studying some mechanical properties of this pair of polymers separately and as blends, reported unambiguously the miscibility and compatibility of the polymers to be appreciable and dependent strongly on the ratio of the molecular weights of the two polymers (B"),..
Each of these characteristics of a blend is studied, and the sum total of these qualities is considered for deciding the merits of compatible polymer pairs.
ity or maximum synergism is, however, always at about 18% PEMA and Generally, PVAc demonstrates different levels of compatibility with at least 40% PEMA.
The peak of compatibilappears independent of ( a,,),.
Krause5 argued that compositional range of polymers for compatibility depends on the parameter x AB for poly A-polyB intermolecular interaction and (x AB)or their critical value.
Thus for a for compatibility increases, Hence our arguments and that of Krause taken polymer pair to have a wide compositional range of compatibility, A x A B is expected to be small while (Is?,), should be reasonably large.
The work reported here also clearly indicates that (a,,), has an upper limit, beyond which the observed compositional range of compatibility and ( a,,), holds.
Density of blend increased linearly with (a,,), in each case and is always higher than that calculated (1.1896) from the written with the assumption that incompatible polymers in a blend can be regarded to be independent and form two phases.
that density of a compatible blend is generally higher than that of an incompatible one from the same components, especially if the two components are homopolymers and have fairly simple repeating units.
Our results indicate that, a t about (ic?,), of about 110, percent increase in blend density over what was expected on the basis of the assumption of incompatibility is about 5.5.
This value compares very well with what some previous workers", l3, l4 reported for very compatible blends especially those from components with polar groups.
According to Shur and Ranby," the density of a compatible blend increases as level of compatibility of the two components increases.
The two sets of micrographs confirm the significance of blend composition and existence of highly compatible blend structure at 18% PEMA, and a clearly incompatible one with phase separation at about 40% PEMA.
Thus all our conclusions made so f a r about blends of PVAc-PEMA are corroborated that high (Mu), values are required to produce highly compatible blends of 82/18 (w/w) PVAc/ PEMA to provide significant increases in the mechanical and possibly other properties of the composite polymers.
of Chemical Technology Chonbuk National University Chonju, Korea Abbstract Relationship between compatibility and charge formation in polymer blends has been investigated using polycarbonate (PC)lpoly(sryrene-co-acrylcnitrile) (SAN) blends containing poly( E -caprolactone) (PCL) as a compatibilizer.
It has been found that the compatibility increasesas the PCL content increases.
This implies that the polymer compatibility may govem the dissipation of charge in the blends.
In order to prove this, the effectsof compatibility on the formation of space charge in the blend system have been studied.
Mechanical properties such as elongation at break and impact strength of the blend fall off rapidly at I O wt% of SAN and greater 270 It isof interestto note becauseof limitedcompatibility.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Compaiiii/ify dRZ.4SAMKL B/eds  In Figure I , the tensile strength and the elongation at break of the PClSAN blend containing PCL as a compatibilizerare shown.
pointed out thatcompatible blends showa small maximum in tensile strength over certain blend compositions [8].
It is speculated thatthe synergism in tensile strength observed similar to compatible blends isattributable to improved compatibility of PC and SAN and better molecularpacking by virtue of PCL in the blends.
The beneficial effects of PCL on impact strength may also be attributed to the improved compatibility between PC and SAN in the blend.
PClS ANPCL PCL 0 % 10 % I5 % Disumion This study was initiated to study the relationship between polymer compatibility and charge formation in the blend system.
The compatibility of PCI SAN blend was adjusted by the content of PCL.
too much PCL inducesthe crystallization of PCand also PCL itself is crystallized (Figure 6-(c)), which leads to charge trapping PCISANIPCL Blend System No PCL Layer Incompatible: Well defined inerface Large Q in the blend due to charge trapping nearthc interfacc Compatible No Crynrllization Charge c r o s s interface Small Q SAN (C) Compatible Crystallizationof PCL k PC Charge Mppinq at CIA interface m e Q ** Comparibiliry provider rhe bridge for charge to cmss inarface &Nocharge d Very small Q in the blend der the volege is removed rapping atrhc interface Figure 5 .
The decrease of charge by increased compatibility can be attributed to increased charge transport due to the compatibilizer.
The compatibilizer should enhance the chemical interaction at the interfacial region between polymer domains.
This work has been confined to the blend of two amorphous polymers containing a compatibilizer.
It can be concluded therefore that the formation of space charge in this blend system is strongly dependent on the compatibility of polymer domains.
Compatibility and Dynamic Mechanical Properties of Sulfonated cis1,4Polyisoprenes and Styrene/4-Vinylpyridine Copolymer Blends ZHENG-LONG ZHOU* and A. EISENBERG, Department of Chemistry, McGill University, Montreal, Quebec, Canada H3A 2K6 Synopsis Dynamic mechanical and optical transparency methods were used to investigate the compatibility of a series of blends of sulfonated cis-l,rl-polyisoprene and styrene/4-vinylpyridine copolymers.
It was found that compatibilization occurs at a degree of substitution less than 5%.
It is suggested that proton transfer from the sulfonic acid group to vinyl pyridine, which results in the generation of specific anion-cation interactions, is responsible for the compatibilization, since the removal of ionic interactions through esterification destroys the compatibility.
INTRODUCTION For a very long time, attempts have been made to find compatible polymeric systems or to compatibilize various polymer mixtures.
Y2 Only a few systems are known in which two homopolymers are compatible over a very wide composition range.3 However, compatible blends are desirable because the properties of the mixture are intermediate between those of the homopolymers, rather than giving some type of a superposition of the homopolymer properties.
Several methods of compatibilization of polymers are known.
Weak acid-base or donor-acceptor interactions as well as hydrogen-bonding-type interactions have been proposed as methods of achieving compatibility in many blends.
Poly(viny1 chloride), a hydrogen-bond participant via the a-hydrogen, exhibits compatibility with many polymers containing complementary units, e.g., butadiene/acrylonitrile copolymers,4 a-methylstyrene/methylacrylonitrile copolymer ~ , ~ ethylenehinyl acetate copolymers,6 poly( 6-capr~lactone),~ and syndiotactic poly(methy1 methacrylate).
An example of hydrogen bonding interactions can be seen in (nylon-6)-(ethylene/acrylic acid) copolymer.
Hydrogen bond formation was also reported by Ting et al.1° to occur for compatible blends of poly(ethy1ene oxide) and some styrene copolymers containing a fluorinated alcohol functionality.
While the work of Otocka and Eirich does not involve blends of otherwise incompatible polymers, it is mentioned here because of its relevance to the present work.
There are a few patents which describe compatible or compatibilized blend~.I~-~O For example, Longworth14 found that incompatible blends of polymers and copolymers of the 1-olefins can be rendered compatible by grafting an acid monomer onto one component of the blend and a basic monomer onto the other component prior to mixing.
The present method of compatibilization consists of the incorporation into the two different polymers to be mixed of different acidic or nonionic moieties which, upon mixing, become ionic as a result of the transfer of a proton from the acid to the proton acceptor or base.
In a recent report21 it was demonstrated that polystyrene could be compatibilized with poly(ethy1 acrylate) when polystyrene was sulfonated to the extent of 5% and the poly(ethy1 acrylate) actually contained a similar percentage of vinylpyridine units.
The method is superior to that employing carboxylic acids in similar compatibilization attempts because of the proton transfer from the sulfonic acid.
Carboxylic acids do improve compatibilization, but not quite to the same extent because only hydrogen bonding is involved.21 As is well known, the enthalpies of hydrogen bonds are of the order of 5 kcal/mol, while those of proton transfer are in excess of 10 kcal/mol.
In this work, attempts were made to blend, by means of ionomeric compatibilization, polyisoprene and polystyrene.
These materials are known to be incompatible.
However, if polyisoprene is sulfonated and mixed with a copolymer of styrene containing a low percentage of vinylpyridine, compatibilization is achieved.
It is clearly seen that the two tan6 peaks, characteristic of incompatible blends, are visible at the glass transition temperatures of the homopolymers (-61 and 100°C).
The dynamic mechanical properties of blend 2 show again two peaks (at 0 and 114”C), clearly indicating that the materials are still incompatible.
DISCUSSION Polyisoprene and polystyrene are known to be incompatible, as can be seen from the transparency of a blend of the two homopolymers (Fig.
materials are incompatible.
As can be seen from Figures 1-6, compatibilization of polyisoprene (partly cyclized) and polystyrene is clearly accomplished through ionic interactions.
The compatibilization occurs at a degree of substitution less than 59'0, as was also found in the sulfonated polystyrene and poly(ethy1 acrylate) system.21 It is certain that ionic interactions are specifically responsible for the compatibilization, since the removal of ionic interactions through esterification destroys the compatibility.
Furthermore, one can be sure that compatibility is due to proton transfer from the sulfonic acid to the pyridine because, as was shown in the previous publication,2' the presence of a carboxylic acid group (instead of the sulfonic acid), while helpful, is insufficient to achieve compatibilization.
Polymer 42 (2001) 10071±10075 Polymer Communication www.elsevier.com/locate/polymer Forced compatibility in poly(methyl acrylate)/poly(methyl methacrylate) sequential interpenetrating polymer networks M. SalmeroÂn SaÂncheza, G. Gallego Ferrerb, C. Torregrosa Cabanillesa, J.M.
If crosslink density is high enough, a homogeneous IPN can be obtained, achieving a forced compatibilization of both networks.
It is possible that an IPN prepared with polymers that form a compatible blend presents * Corresponding author.
Thus a homogeneous IPN can eventually be obtained, achieving a forced compatibilization of both the polymers [3,4].
Nevertheless, The aim of this work is to study the phenomenon of forced compatibility in poly(methyl acrylate)/poly(methyl methacrylate), PMA/PMMA, sequential IPNs by dielectric and dynamic-mechanical techniques and its effects on the conformational motions of the polymer chains.
simultaneously participate the in It is known that the forced compatibilization of the IPN mainly depends on the crosslinking density of the network polymerized ®rst [3].
Although different crosslinking contents involve different composition of the IPN, thus changing the intensity of the relaxations peaks, it is clearly observed that the more compatibilized IPN is the one in which the PMA network contains the highest content of crosslinking agent.
Conclusions While the polymer mixture PMA/PMMA presents phase separation, a sequential IPN of these two components can be compatibilized increasing the crosslinking density.
Permanent physical internetwork entanglements the compatibilization.
A COMPARISON OF EXPERIMENTAL TECHNIQUES FOR STUDYING POLYMER-POLYMER SOLVENT COMPATIBILITY Introduction A convenient and reliable technique for investigating incompatibility in polymer-polymer-solvent systems has been desired since the early studies in miscibility were reported in the 1940s (1).
This article was downloaded by: [The University of Manchester Library] On: 09 October 2014, At: 05:34 Publisher: Taylor & Francis Informa Ltd Registered in England and Wales Registered Number: 1072954 Registered office: Mortimer House, 37-41 Mortimer Street, London W1T 3JH, UK Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition Publication details, including instructions for authors and subscription information: http://www.tandfonline.com/loi/tbsp20 Improved blood compatibility by sustained release of heparin–deoxycholic acid conjugates in a PCL–PEG multiblock copolymer matrix Hyun Tae Moon , Yong-Kyu Lee , Joon Koo Han & Youngro Byun Published online: 02 Apr 2012.
To cite this article: Hyun Tae Moon , Yong-Kyu Lee , Joon Koo Han & Youngro Byun (2002) Improved blood compatibility by sustained release of heparin–deoxycholic acid conjugates in a PCL–PEG multiblock copolymer matrix , Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition, 13:7, 817-828, DOI: 10.1163/156856202760197438 To link to this article: http://dx.doi.org/10.1163/156856202760197438 PLEASE SCROLL DOWN FOR ARTICLE Taylor & Francis makes every effort to ensure the accuracy of all the information (the “Content”) contained in the publications on our platform.
Also available online www.vsppub.com Improved blood compatibility by sustained release of heparin–deoxycholic acid conjugates in a PCL –PEG multiblock copolymer matrix HYUN TAE MOON 1, YONG-KYU LEE 1, JOON KOO HAN 2 and YOUNGRO BYUN 1; 1 Department of Materials Science and Engineering, Kwangju Institute of Science and Technology, ¤ Gwangju 500-712, Korea 2 Department of Radiology, College of Medicine, Seoul National University, Seoul 110-744, Korea Received 7 January 2002; revised 28 March 2002; accepted 7 May 2001 Abstract—The heparin and deoxycholic acid conjugate (heparin– DOCA) synthesized in this study has an amphiphilic property and could be completely dissolved in a co-solvent made of 1,4-dioxane (50 v/ v%), n-propanol (25 v/v%), and water (25 v/v%).
INTRODUCTION Heparin is a potent anticoagulant agent that interacts strongly with antithrombin III to prevent the formation of brin clots [1, 2], and has been widely used for improving the blood compatibility of medical devices.
Therefore, the coating method of heparin– DOCA and the PCL –PEG multiblock copolymer could be proposed as a new method to improve the blood compatibility of medical devices that come into contact with blood.
Polymer Degradation and Stability 80 (2003) 551–566 www.elsevier.com/locate/polydegstab On the compatibility of the IPP/PA6/EPDM blends with and without functionalized IPP I. Thermo-oxidative behaviour Raluca Nicoleta Dariea, Mihai Brebua, Cornelia Vasilea,*, Marek Kozlowskib aRomanian Academy ‘‘P.Poni’’ Institute of Macromolecular Chemistry, 41 A Grigore Ghica Voda Alley, RO 6600 Iasi, Romania bInstitute of Materials Science and Applied Mechanics, Wroclaw University of Technology, Wybrzeze Wyspianskiego 2750-370 Wroclaw, Poland Received 18 December 2002; accepted 1 February 2003 Abstract Binary isotactic polypropylene (IPP)/polyamide 6 (PA6) and ternary IPP/PA6/ethylene–propylene diene terpolymer (EPDM) blends in various ratios were obtained in a Haake Rheocord mixer.
Processing behaviour was changed in the presence of IPP functionalized with bismaleimide (BMI), maleic anhydride (MA) and acrylic acid (AA) as reactive compatibilizing agents.
On the basis of the processing and thermal data one can conclude that the compatibilizing agent eﬀect increases in the following order: IPP-AA <IPP-BMIIPP-MA.
These blends require the addition of a compatibilizing agent to achieve satisfactory interfacial adhesion in order to develop an eﬀective stress transfer between the two phases.
The optima properties are obtained in presence of compatibilizing agents such as functionalized polyoleﬁn [5–8], maleated ethylene–propylene rubber (EPR) [2], maleated styrenic polymers [5], etc.
This paper deals with the study of the reactive compatibilization cumulated with impact modiﬁcation (compatibilization-cum-impact modiﬁcation) of binary IPP/PA6 blends with or without EPDM and functionalized IPP, determined from their processing characteristics and the thermal and thermo-oxidative behaviour.
Materials For the compatibilization of IPP/PA6/EPDM blends, an isotactic polypropylene has been functionalized with polar monomers containing carboxyl or anhydride groups such as maleic anhydride (MA), bismaleinimide (BMI) and acrylic acid (AA) using the melt functionalization procedure described elsewhere [15,16].
Blends’ preparation The binary, ternary and compatibilized blends containing IPP, PA6, EPDM and reactive compatibilizing agent as functionalized IPP have been obtained by means of a HAAKE RHEOCORD 9000 mixer with a mixing chamber of 48.3 cm3 in the following conditions: temperature of mixing of 220 C, mixing time of 10 minutes, the rotational speed of 60 rpm.
DSC results All DSC curves are typical for the incompatible blends because two melting peaks corresponding to the two crystalline components IPP and respectively PA6 appear for all the mixing ratios (Figs.
For the other mixing ratios of the components in the system, the peak separation is not so clear, especially in the compatibilized blends (Fig.
These diﬀerences are more evident in the PA6 peak area of compatibilized blends and can be also appreciated from the data of Table 2.
Based on these results, the order of the eﬃciency of IPP-gin accordance with the the compatibilizing agent MAIPP-g-BMI > IPP-g-AA, follows: is as it Fig.
DSC curves for ternary IPP/PA6/EPDM blends compatibilized with IPP-BMI.
Thermogravimetric analysis of the binary IPP/PA6 and ternary IPP/PA6/EPDM blends were performed in order to determine the changes during decomposition caused by the varying mixing ratio, by adding EPDM and especially by compatibilization with MA-, BMIand AA-functionalized IPP.
Polymer Degradation and Stability 80 (2003) 551–566 position of the 50IPP/50PA6 blend that seemed to have a lower compatibility degree.
Changes depend on the IPP/PA6 ratio, on the nature of the compatibilizing agent, and on the concentration of functionalized IPP used for compatibilization.
DTG curves of uncompatibilized (—) 30IPP/60PA6/10EPDM (a), 45IPP/45PA6/10EPDM (b) and 60IPP/30PA6/10EPDM (c) blends and compatibilized with 3 wt.% (—) or 5 wt.% (– –) IPP-MA.
Adding BMI-functionalized IPP to the ternary IPP/PA6/EPDM blends the DTG peaks become very large covering the peaks corresponding to the uncompatibilized ternary blends (Fig.
DTG curves of uncompatibilized (—) 30IPP/60PA6/10EPDM (a), 45IPP/45PA6/10EPDM (b) and 60IPP/30PA6/10EPDM (c) blends and compatibilized with 3 wt.% (—) or 5 wt.% (– –) IPP-BMI.
10EPDM blend compatibilized with 3 wt.% IPP-BMI did not show inﬂexions and contrary to the peaks of it allows a very good mathematical other blends simulation that gives an activation energy of 132 KJ/ factor of 1.78109 and a mol, a pre-exponential reaction order of 0.9.
DTG curves of uncompatibilized (—) 30IPP/60PA6/10EPDM (a), 45IPP/45PA6/10EPDM (b) and 60IPP/30PA6/10EPDM (c) blends and compatibilized with 3 wt.% (—) or 5 wt.% (– –) IPP-AA.
Conclusions Thermal and thermo-oxidative behaviour of some IPP/PA6/EPDM blends with various compositions and containing or not MA-, BMIand AA-functionalized IPP as compatibilizing agents were studied by DSC and TG/DTG analysis.
Two distinct peaks or clear shoulders in DTG curves reveal the incompatibility of binary IPP/PA6 blends while larger peaks appear for ternary IPP/PA6/EPDM blends.
The changes in the shape of TG and DTG curves for the blends containing functionalized IPP indicated an increased compatibilization degree and reactions between functional groups during processing and/or heating at high temperatures in accordance with processing behaviour and DSC results.
The compatibilizing eﬀect follows the order: IPP-MAIPP-BMI> IPP-AA, for an optimum amount of 3 wt.%.
Piglowski J, Gancarz I, Gancarz R. Properties of compatibilized polyamide6/nitrile rubber and polyamide6/polypropylene blends.
Fortelny I, Krulis Z, Michalkova D. Use of additive compatibilization for recycling of municipal plastics waste.
A study on the PP/ PS blends with nylon 6 reactive compatibilizers.
Blending of immiscible polymers in a mixing zone of a twin screw extrudereﬀects of compatibilization.
Reactive compatibilization of polypropylene and polyamide-6,6 with carboxylated and maleated polypropylene.
Gaylord N. Reactive extrusion in the preparation of carboxylcontaining polymers and their utilization as compatibilizing agents.
THERMODYNAMIC ASPECTS OF POLYMER COMPATIBILITY R. KONINGSVELD, L. A. KLEINTJENS and H. M. SCHOFFELEERS Central Laboratory, DSM, Geleen, The Netherlands A B S T R A CT Polymer compatibility, to be understood here in the sense of thermodynamic stability, depends in a subtle way on molecular parameters.
in the thermal expansion coefficients of two compatible polymers will cause the system to become incompatible upon a rise in temperature.
For linear polyethylene and anionic polystyrene the available data point to chain length compatibility.
Two methods for the determination of compatibility are discussed, viz.
Polymer compatibility is a comprehensive subject which has been treated from quite different angles.
If one has to deal with practical production problems the processability of a polymer blend naturally offers itself as a useful measure of compatibility.
From the viewpoint of equilibrium thermodynamics, for instance, compatibility means miscibility on a molecular scale, and we cannot say off-hand whether such a state goes with easy processing.
In view of the high viscosity of the constituents it seems obvious that one should not expect polymer mixtures prepared by the usual technological procedures to be in an equilibrium state, and kinetic effects will doubtless have a good deal to do with differences in judgment on polymer compatibility.
On the other hand, thermodynamically incompatible polymers will in course of time reduce the degree of dispersion.
This illustrative example was given by Gul', Penskaya, Kuleznev and Arutyunova1 who suggested use of the conditions of thermodynamic stability as a criterion for compatibility.
COMPATIBILITY thought here and restrict ourselves to a discussion of the various parameters that determine polymer compatibility in thermodynamic equilibrium.
We also understand that polymer mixtures have so little entropy of mixing to match energy effects, that very small positive heats of mixing suffice to bring about incompatibility.
Alekseyenko16 also considered the packing density of mixed polymers and suggested the packing coefficient K, defined as the ratio of the actual and additive (calculated) volumes of the mixture, to be a useful criterion for compatibility.
Expansion (K > 1) would incompatibility, contraction (K < 1) to miscibility.
The free enthalpy of mixing unambiguously determines equilibrium states and we therefore prefer to base discussions of compatibility on this quantity.
This is the main limitation of the microscopic determination of compatibility.
(pulse-induced critical scattering3 9'5 2), will doubtless prove to be of great value in thermodynamic studies of polymer compatibility.
Although the average chain lengths m„, mw and mz are identical in cases II and III, the continuous distribution III contains appreciable amounts of very high molecular-weight material which presumably is responsible for the smaller compatibility.
It seems therefore worthwhile to check the influence of a possible concentration dependence of g on polymer compatibility.
We have seen that the lattice theory is capable of supplying a satisfactory but after-the-fact description of liquid-liquid phase relations in polymer compatibility.
Although tremendous progress had been made by this application of Flory's equation of state theory it is obvious that further improvements are needed in order to achieve a completely quantitative prediction of phase relations in polymer compatibility, which proves to be a very subtle phenomenon indeed.
Polymer compatibility evidently being governed by subtleties in the enthalpy and/or entropy of mixing, the question does not seem to be altogether superfluous whether a mixture consisting of two chemically identical homopolymers with widely varying chain lengths might show incompatibility.
However, this is no guarantee for chain length compatibility, because the entropy of mixing may also bring about a ripple on the AG(<p2) curve.
In view of all these data one is inclined to accept the compatibility of polydisperse polyethylene.
All this points to 21  R. K O N I N G S V E L D, L. A. KLEINTJENS A ND H. M. SCHOFFELEERS chain-length compatibility.
EXPERIMENTAL METHODS Various methods exist for determining the compatibility of polymers.
The mutual solvent method The phase behaviour of a mixture obtained upon mixing solutions of polymer 1 and of polymer 2 in the same solvent is often used as a criterion for the compatibility of the solvent-free polymer 1-polymer 2 system.
The method is based on calculated ternary phase diagrams reported by Tompa2 6 , 61 and Scott62 which indicate that incompatibility may indeed reveal itself down to fairly low concentrations.
Here we would conclude that the two polymers are incompatible, whereas they are completely miscible, The systems benzeneb u t y l r u b b e r E P DM rubber and diphenyl ether-atactic polypropylene25  R. K O N I N G S V E L D, L. A. KLEINTJENS A ND H. M. SCHOFFELEERS linear polyethylene present examples of such closed miscibility gaps (Figure 20a).
The question as to the compatibility of molten polyethylene/polypropylene blends remains open, and Figure 19d may well be inappropriate for that system.
In the present paper we have tried to show that polymer compatibility is a very complicated and subtle phenomenon that cannot be dealt with by the mere statement that in most polymer mixtures the free enthalpy of mixing is positive.
In linear polyethylene and anionic polystyrene no experimental indication has been found for chain-length incompatibility.
Two thermodynamic methods for establishing compatibility have been analysed.
The extreme sensitivity to chain length might be employed to bring the light-scattering incompatible polymer pairs within reach of the many methods.
Effect of ﬁlm compatibility on electro-optic properties of dye doped polymer DR1/SU-8 Xiaoqiang Sun a,b, Ying Xie a, Xuliang Zhao a, Dehui Li a, Shimin Zhao a, Yuanbin Yue a, Xibin Wang a, Jian Sun a, Lei Liang a, Changming Chen a, Daming Zhang a, Fei Wang a,∗, Zhiyuan Xie b a State Key Laboratory on Integrated Optoelectronics, Jilin University, No.
For EO waveguide, compatible buffer and cladding layers are necessary for light guiding in the active core.
Thus, favorable core–cladding physic-chemical compatibility is crucial for polymer EO waveguide fabrication.
In this paper, we report on the investigation of physic-chemical compatibility of poled dye doped polymer and passive claddings of Norland Optical Adhensive 73 (NOA73), SU-8, polydimethylsiloxane (PDMS) and polymethylmethacrylate (PMMA).
Interface between layers The physic-chemical compatibility of core–cladding couples has remarkable inﬂuence on the waveguide fabrication techniques and EO performance.
Conclusion In this study, physic-chemical compatibility of passive cladding and guest–host EO polymer DR1/SU-8 was investigated.
Introduction In previous work we have reported on the compatibility behaviour of melt-mixed blends of poly(ethylene-co-cyclohexane 1,4-dimethanol terephthalate) (PETG), an amorphous copolyester, with crystalline aromatic polyesters; poly(butylene terephthalate) (PBT) [1] and poly(ethylene terephthalate) (PET) [2].
In this study the phase behaviour and solid state properties characterizing the compatibility of bisphenol-A polycarbonate (PC)/PETG are reported.
Transesteriﬁcation reactions are also responsible for the compatibilization of PC/epoxy blends.
An interesting onestep extrusion process in the presence of a catalyst was shown to compatibilize PC/PET and may produce PC-bPET copolymers by a suitable control of the mixing procedure [23].
In the case of ternary blends a judicial application of PC/polyester blend may lead to a compatible ternary system.
The latter has also been compatibilized using alkylmodiﬁed poly(1-caprolactone) [26].
In the present study the compatibility of melt-mixed blends of PC/PETG in the complete composition range was characterized using mainly, tensile testing, DMA, optical (phase contrast) and electronic microscopy (SEM).
Discussion The results from tensile testing suggest compatible blends and their composition dependence the absence of synergism—very often the result of strong intermolecular forces [30].
Though transesteriﬁcation may not be ruled out, spectroscopic evidence and the limited mixing time employed support the proposition that its role in the compatibilization process is very limited.
The results are discussed in terms of composites interaction, homogeneity, and compatibility.
The materials obtained were characterized, focusing on interaction, homogeneity, and compatibility between composite components using solid-state nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) techniques.3, 6 – 8 The solid-state NMR techniques employed were magic angle spinning (MAS), cross-polarization/magic angle spinning (CPMAS), variable contact-time experiments, and the proton spin-lattice relaxH␳),4, 5, 8 –10 ation time in the rotating frame (T1 which was used as a parameter to identify the inﬂuence of the ﬁber in the polyurethane to obtain information on composite compatibility.
This article was downloaded by: [Texas A & M International University] On: 13 March 2015, At: 02:07 Publisher: Taylor & Francis Informa Ltd Registered in England and Wales Registered Number: 1072954 Registered office: Mortimer House, 37-41 Mortimer Street, London W1T 3JH, UK Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition Publication details, including instructions for authors and subscription information: http://www.tandfonline.com/loi/tbsp20 Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation of surfacemodified metal grafted with sulfonated PEG or heparin Hee Jung Lee , Jong-Kyu Hong , Hyun Chul Goo , Won Kyu Lee , Ki Dong Park , Soo Hyun Kim , Young Mi Yoo & Young Ha Kim Published online: 02 Apr 2012.
To cite this article: Hee Jung Lee , Jong-Kyu Hong , Hyun Chul Goo , Won Kyu Lee , Ki Dong Park , Soo Hyun Kim , Young Mi Yoo & Young Ha Kim (2002) Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation of surface-modified metal grafted with sulfonated PEG or heparin , Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition, 13:8, 939-952, DOI: 10.1163/156856202320401979 To link to this article: http://dx.doi.org/10.1163/156856202320401979 PLEASE SCROLL DOWN FOR ARTICLE Taylor & Francis makes every effort to ensure the accuracy of all the information (the “Content”) contained in the publications on our platform.
Also available online www.vsppub.com Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation of surface-modi ed metal grafted with sulfonated PEG or heparin HEE JUNG LEE 1, JONG-KYU HONG 1, HYUN CHUL GOO 1, WON KYU LEE 1, KI DONG PARK 2, SOO HYUN KIM 1, YOUNG MI YOO 1 and YOUNG HA KIM 1; 1 Biomaterials Research Center, Korea Institute of Science and Technology, P.O.
In vitro brinogen adsorption and platelet adhesion onto the Au-S-PEG-SO3 or Au-S-PEG-Hep surfaces decreased to a great extent, indicatingenhanced blood compatibility.
The enhanced blood compatibility and the decreased adhesion of VSMCs on the modi ed metallic surfaces may help to decrease thrombus formation and suppress restenosis.
All of these studies demonstrated more or less decreased adsorption of proteins and adhesion of platelets, and therefore improved blood compatibilty.
Furthermore, in our previous studies, sulfonated PEG (PEG-SO3/ grafted polyurethane demonstrated enhanced blood compatibility and biostability to a larger extent than PEG alone; this may be attributed to a synergistic effect of the non-adhesive and mobile PEG chain motions combined with anticoagulant active sulfonate groups [25, 26, 34– 38].
Heparin was also immobilized Downloaded by [Texas A & M International University] at 02:07 13 March 2015  Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation 941 onto PEG chains containing functional groups.
In vitro protein adsorption, platelet adhesion, and VSMC proliferation were investigated to evaluate blood compatibility and the effect on restenosis.
In order to determine O/C, N /C, S/C, and Na/C stoichiometries, collecting factors of 2.50, 1.68, 1.80, and 8.5 were Downloaded by [Texas A & M International University] at 02:07 13 March 2015  Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation 943 used for C1s, O1s, N1s, and S2p3, respectively.
Downloaded by [Texas A & M International University] at 02:07 13 March 2015  Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation 945 ¡ ¡ ¡ 1 or/ and SO3 group at 1342– 1352 cm 1 (symmetric SO2 stretch) and 910– 895 cm group introduced was utilized to react with the NH2 group of H2N-PEG-SO3 to incorporate the sulfonated PEG (Au-S-PEGA-SO3), where EDC was used as a catalyst.
Downloaded by [Texas A & M International University] at 02:07 13 March 2015  Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation 947 Figure 3.
Therefore, a study on protein adsorption and platelet adhesion is the rst step in evaluating the blood compatibility of biomaterials [23].
However, the tendency of platelet adhesion Downloaded by [Texas A & M International University] at 02:07 13 March 2015  Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation 949 was very similar to protein adsorption.
In our previous study on the protein adsorption of modi ed PU, the amounts of Fib adsorbed on both PU-PEG and PU-PEG-SO3 were much smaller than on PU; PU-PEG-SO3 exhibited a smaller Fib value but a higher amount of adsorbed albumin than those on PU-PEG [35], although PU-PEG-SO3 exhibited better in vivo blood compatibility than PU-PEG [34].
In addition, Downloaded by [Texas A & M International University] at 02:07 13 March 2015  Improved blood compatibility and decreased VSMC proliferation 951 CONCLUSION Although the technique of coronary stenting has remarkably improved long-term results in recent years, (sub)acute thrombosis and late restenosis still remain problems to be solved.
In vitro brinogen adsorption and platelet adhesion onto the Au-S-PEG-SO3 or Au-S-PEGHep surfaces decreased to a great extent, indicating enhanced blood compatibility.
The enhanced blood compatibility and less adhesion and maybe proliferation of VSMC on the modi ed metallic surfaces might help to decrease thrombus formation and suppress restenosis; therefore it would be very useful to apply to stents with an improved function.
Their compatibility was examined by measuring both the apparent modulus of rigidity and the loss tangent.
Several blends showed a unique glass transition temperature between those of the individual components, which indicated compatibility.
It was found that only those copolymers which phase separate are compatible with poly(2,6-dimethylphenylene oxide).
This is a result of the mutual incompatibility inherent in polymers, as their free energy of mixing is always p0sitive.l Energy of mixing may be expressed as a function of the difference in the solubility parameters BA and BB, where A and B are components of the blend.
When this difference tends toward zero, compatibility increases to some extent.2 A few examples of polymer couples are known where, under well-defined conditions (composition, temperature), demixtion may not occur.
This polymer has been shown to be compatible with homopolystyrene (PS), and one Sample Codes and Characteristics of ABA Poly(styrene-b-Isoprene) Block Copolymers and TABLE I Polystyrene Homopolymers Molecular weight an X 10-3 PS block PI block Sample code SIS 209 SIS 74 SIS 344 SIS 345 SIS 200 PS I PS I1 87 26 11 15 78 10 24 7 7 8 51 52 Total molecular PS block weight an X 230 55 30 83 210 10 24 136 22 11 17 80 % Polyisoprene 3 13 27 61 26 Journal of Applied Polymer Science, Vol.
22,719-725 (1978) 0 1978 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. 0021-8995/78/0022-0719$01.00  720 MEYER AND TRITSCHER would expect it to be so with the polystyrene blocks of the SIS copolymers.”7 If such a compatibility were reached, the resulting blend would exhibit only one transition at a higher temperature.
Logarithm of apparent modulus of rigidity vs temperature for an incompatible Noryl/SIS blend (4 Noryl731; (0) SIS 209; ( 0 ) 75 Nory1/25 SIS 209.
Therefore, no compatibility exists between Noryl and SIS 209.
Tan 6 vs. temperature for an incompatible Noryl/SIS blend: (A) Noryl731; ( 0 ) SIS 209; ( 0 ) 75 Noryl/25 SIS 209. this copolymer.
Logarithm of apparent modulus of rigidity vs temperature for compatible NoryVSIS blends: (A) Noryl731; (0) SIS 200; ( 0 ) SIS 345; ( 0 ) 75 Nory1/25 SIS 200; (D) 75 Nory1/25 SIS 345. homopolyisoprene which could migrate and form a modulus of some size.
There seems to be a “copolymer effect.” Table IT shows two other examples of incompatibility of Noryl with copolymers SIS 74 and SIS 344.
The low molecular weight of the diene block still does not allow phase formation and thus compatibility with Noryl.
On the other hand, with copolymers SIS 345 and SIS 200, compatibility is obtained, as those copolymers phase separate without difficulty.
They confirm its compatibility with Noryl.
As can also be seen, compatibility extends over the whole range of composition.
Tan 8 vs temperature for compatible Noryl/SIS 345 blends of various compositions: (A) Noryl731; ( 0 ) SIS 345; (m) 25 Nory1/75 SIS 209; ( 0 ) 50 Noryl/50 SIS 209; ( 0 ) 75 Nory1/25 SIS 209. with Noryl.
For a compatible blend, the Tg increases as expected with increasing Noryl content.
Observations Tg, "C (tan 6) 82 91 117 129 a2 143 163 compatible incompatible compatible incompatible incompatible incompatible compatible compatible mation applied and also on the arbitrarily chosen time parameter.
Nevertheless, these facts do not affect our findings about compatibility of SIS/Noryl blends.
In a forthcoming paper, we shall present some results concerning heat resistance of glass to glass joints assembled with compatible as well as with incompatible SIS/PPO blends.
The first part of this paper will be devoted to the compatibility aspects, with special attention to T,, melting, and crystallization behavior.
However, the constancy of PA6 Tg, over the whole composition range, together with the morphological and thermal analysis discussed later on, suggests that the compatibility should not be large enough to justify the observed Tg reduction.
For incompatible blends (e.g., in the very case of PAG/rubber), othersm suggest that the crystallization rate reduction is due to the increase of blend melt viscosity.
In this study, a series of maleic anhydride ABSTRACT: (MA)-grafted poly(acrylonitrile-butadiene-styrene) (ABSg-MAH) were prepared via a melt banbury process on a RM-200B torque rheometer and used as a compatibilizer for recycled poly(ethylene terephthalate)/poly(acrylonitrile-butadiene-styrene) (R-PET/ABS) blends.
The melt rheological and compatibility properties of R-PET/ABS blends were investigated.
About 1 wt % of ABS-g-MAH prethe MA optimum conditions shows good pared at compatibility for the basic blend of R-PET/ABS 85/15 w/w.
VC 2012 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 000: 000–000, 2012 Key words: R-PET/ABS blends; phase reversal; morphology property; compatibilizer rheological property; INTRODUCTION Plastic waste recycling conserves both material and energy and provides a comparatively simple way to make a substantial reduction in the overall volume of municipal solid waste.
Conventional wisdom in blending immiscible polymers states that optimum blend properties are obtained by the use of a compatibilizer, which has two or more segments, which are miscible with one of the two blend phases but not with both.
The compatibilizer may also improve adhesion between the domains and aid stress transfer between them.4 Li and Lu5 had demonstrated the melt rheological properties of HDPE/PET blends compatibilized by an ethylene-butyl-acrylate-glycidyl methacrylate compatibilizers  2 WANG ET AL.
The addition of EBAGMA enhanced the interfacial adhesion between HDPE and PET and improved the phase dispersion due to reactive compatibilization.
This work was a system of MA-grafted poly(acrylonitrile-butadiene-styrene) (ABS-g-MAH) copolymer being prepared and engineering blends being formed from the tough nonpolar thermoplastic styrenic polymer, ABS, and an oil-resistant polar semicrystalline polyester, recycled poly(ethy1ene terephthalate) (R-PET)8 using the prepared ABS-g-MAH as a compatibilizer via torque rheology.
Cook et al.10,11 have studied that the uncompatibilized PET/ABS blends were immiscible and consisted of four phases: styrene-aerylonitrile copolymer, grafted polybutadiene, amorphous PET, and small amounts of crystalline PET.
Meanwhile, uncompatibilized blends quenched from the melt showed good tensile properties, but these deteriorated during storage at room temperature because of debonding of ABS particles.
Grafting of ABS-g-MAH particles onto the PET matrix led to compatibilization, resulting in stable properties.12 The R-PET/ABS blends with ABS-g-MAH as compatibilizer might be commercially significant, and it might partially replace the more expensive PC/ABS blends being used in automotive applications.
The R-PET/ABS blends with different compositions and R-PET/ABS(85/15) w/w with different content of ABS-g-MAH compatilizer were prepared in a torque rheometer (RM-200B, China) with a 50-mL mixC and 40 rpm).
Approximately 60 g of premixed mixture was added in the intensive mixer heated at a preset C. R-PET/ABS ratio chamber temperature of 260 was changed from 95/5 to 55/45 w/w, and the content of ABS-g-MAH compatilizer was varied from 1 to 5 wt %.
Characterization of R-PET/ABS blends Melt rheology 0 0 00 00 and G ) In Figure 3, the evolution of the storage modulus (G ) of the R-PET/ABS blends and loss modulus (G without any compatibilizer is presented together C. In the whole with that of the neat polymers at 260 values of frequency range investigated, G pure ABS are found to be the highest among all samples.
The presence of ABS-g0 MAH polymer causes increase in G values over the entire frequency range, especially in the low frequency, indicating an enhanced interaction between phases due to compatibilizer.
This result suggests that the optimum concentration of ABS-g-MAH polymer used for compatibilizing R-PET/ABS blend 85/15 w/w is  1.0 wt %.10 and G and G 00 00 0 Figure 3 (a) Storage modulus and (b) loss modulus of C. ABS, R-PET, and various R-PET/ABS blends at 260 [Color figure can be viewed in the online issue, which is available at wileyonlinelibrary.com.]
RHEOLOGICAL AND COMPATIBILITY PROPERTIES OF R-PET/ABS 5 Figure 4 Changes in storage modulus (a) and loss modulus (b) as a function of frequency for R-PET/ABS blends C. with various concentrations of compatibilizer at 260 [Color figure can be viewed in the online issue, which is available at wileyonlinelibrary.com.]
It is clear that most of butanoneetched cavities give sharp boundaries and smooth surface, suggesting that there is little or no adhesion between the R-PET and ABS phase due to their poor compatibility.
the Figure 6 shows the SEM images of ABS-g-MAHcompatibilized R-PET/ABS (85/15 w/w) blends.
The R-PET/ABS (85/15 w/w) blends compatibilized by 1.0 and 3.0 wt % ABS-g-MAH show finer morphologies.
The boundaries of the cavities are obscure and seemed to be more difficult to etch, indicating that interfacial adhesion is markedly improved.21,22 However, the boundaries of the cavities are transformed distinctly when the compatibilizer content is increased to 5 wt %.
At a high-ABS-gMAH concentration, the excess compatibilizer may form the third phase in the R-PET/ABS system without transferred to interphase and cannot play as an effective role of compatibility.
Mechanical Properties of R-PET/ABS Blends TABLE II R-PET/ABS (w/w) Notch impact strength (kJ/m2) Flexural modulus (MPa) 100/0 95/5 85/15 75/25 65/35 55/45 0/100 1.7 1.8 3.9 3.0 3.6 4.9 13.3 2260 1789 2374 2432 2023 1973 1945 Figure 7(b) shows the temperature dependence of tan d for R-PET/ABS (85/15 w/w) blends compatibilized by ABS-g-MAH with various concentrations of 0.0, 1.0, 3.0, and 5.0 wt % noted as G1, G2, G3, and G4, respectively.
This result suggests the effective mixing of R-PET and ABS phases in the presence of ABS-g-MAH, and this may be due to the common connection of both polymer chains at the interphase, which eventually act as a compatibilizer.
The optimum dose of ABS-g-MAH is suggested to be 1.0 wt %, and excessive amount of ABS-gMAH leads to little effect on the compatibility of RPET/ABS (85/15 w/w) system.
Mechanical properties Tables II and III show the relationship of mass ratio and compatibilizer concentration with mechanical properties of R-PET/ABS blends.
The reduction of disperse phase particle dimension with compatibilizer can be attributed to the more effective break-up of the particles, which promote a more stable morphology and ensure improved mechanical properties.23,24 The above SEM results clearly demonstrate that ABS-g-MAH has a compatibilizing effect on the RPET/ABS blends and that the compatibilization effect becomes more distinct as the ABS-g-MAH content increased.
Dynamic mechanical analysis Dynamic mechanical analysis (DMA) was used to measure the thermodynamic response of R-PET/ ABS blends with various blending compositions and R-PET/ABS (85/15 w/w) blends compatibilized by ABS-g-MAH with various concentrations and oscillatory deformation in tension–torsion mode as a function of temperature.
The date of Table III shows that the strength and flexural modulus notch impact decrease with the concentration increase, but these values are larger than that of no compatibilizer presence.
These are attributed to the compatibilizer increase the interaction of two phase and change the stress distribution.28,29 compatibilizer CONCLUSIONS A series of MA-grafted poly(acrylonitrile-butadienestyrene) (ABS-g-MAH) blends was prepared via melt banbury process on a RM-200B torque rheometer.
And the prepared ABS-g-MAH polymer was used as a compatibilizer to fabricate recycled poly(ethylene terephthalate)/poly(acrylonitrile-butadienestyrene) (R-PET/ABS) blends.
The result of DMA shows that R-PET is partially miscible with ABS, and ABS-g-MAH has compatibilizing effects on the R-PET/ABS blends.
The rheological behavior of ABS-g-MAH-compatibilized R-PET/ABS blends shows an ABS-g-MAH content dependence.
However, increasing ABS-g-MAH content from 1 to 5 wt % is found to decrease in values of of both storage modulus G the R-PET/ABS blends, but the values are still larger than that of R-PET/ABS blend without any compatibilizer.
The SEM images of the ABS-g-MAH-compatibilized R-PET/ABS blends show a finer morphology, confirming the compatibilization effects of the prepared ABS-g-MAH.
Electrophoresis 2010, 31, 520–527 Research Article Polymer mixtures with enhanced compatibility and extremely low viscosity used as DNA separation media Poor compatibility was the major drawback of polymer mixtures when used as DNA separation media.
Using poly(ethylene oxide)-b-poly(N, N-dimethylacrylamide) (PEO44-bPDMA88) and PEO (Mw: 1.3 MDa) as an example, we demonstrated the concept that the compatibility was signiﬁcantly improved when mixing a homopolymer with its copolymer.
In semidilute or concentrated solution, viscosity measurement also suggested good compatibility between the two components.
The mixtures of polymers with different types are not commonly used, mainly because the incompatibility of the two polymers, e.g.
One approach to increase the compatibility of different polymers is to form interpenetrating networks at the expense of enhanced viscosity [55, 56].
More importantly, because both polymers contain PEO, their compatibility is signiﬁcantly improved.
In this study, the good compatibility of PEO-b-PDMA and the larger molecular mass PEO were studied by means of laser light scattering (LLS) and viscometry.
3 Results and discussion 3.1 Compatibility of PEO with PEO-b-PDMA To determine the compatibility of PEO with PEO-b-PDMA in aqueous solution, we need to know their individual behavior under the conditions for CE.
the increase in the size of The compatibility of PEO and PEO-b-PDMA was also determined from the viscosity measurements.
(6), indicating a good compatibility between PEO and PEO-b-PDMA [63].
3.2 Viscosity and dynamic coating ability of the mixture PEO and PEO-b-PDMA are compatible in dilute solution.
Nevertheless, no substantial difference in viscosity was observed from the experimental and theoretical values, indicating the good compatibility between PEO and PEO-b-PDMA at semidilute concentrations.
The driving force for the association resulted from the slight incompatibility between PEO and PDMA.
4 Concluding remarks Using PEO44-b-PDMA88 and PEO (Mw: 1.3 MDa) as an example, we proved a concept of developing polymer mixtures with enhanced compatibility.
This article was downloaded by: [University of Western Ontario] On: 11 November 2014, At: 20:52 Publisher: Taylor & Francis Informa Ltd Registered in England and Wales Registered Number: 1072954 Registered office: Mortimer House, 37-41 Mortimer Street, London W1T 3JH, UK Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition Publication details, including instructions for authors and subscription information: http://www.tandfonline.com/loi/tbsp20 Improvement of blood compatibility on cellulose hemodialysis membrane: IV.
To cite this article: Kazuhiko Ishihara , Takuya Shinozuka , Yuka Hanazaki , Yasuhiko Iwasaki & Nobuo Nakabayashi (1999) Improvement of blood compatibility on cellulose hemodialysis membrane: IV.
Terms & Conditions of access and use can be found at http:// www.tandfonline.com/page/terms-and-conditions Downloaded by [University of Western Ontario] at 20:52 11 November 2014  Improvement hemodialysis of blood compatibility on cellulose membrane: IV.
Phospholipid polymer bonded to the membrane surface ISHIHARA *, TAKUYA SHINOZUKA, YUKA HANAZAKI, IWASAKI and NOBUO NAKABAYASHI KAZUHIKO YASUHIKO Institute for Medical and Dental Engineering, Tokyo Medical and Dental University, 2-3-10 Kanda-surugadai, Chiyoda-ku, Tokyo 101-0062, Japan Received 2 March 1998; accepted 6 June 1998 Abstract-To improve the surface blood compatibility on a cellulose hemodialysis membrane, 2-methacryloyloxyethyl phosphorylcholine (MPC) polymers with a phospholipid polar group were immobilized on the surface through covalent bonding.
The modified cellulose membrane was blood-compatible, as determined by the prevention of adhesion, deformation, and aggregation of platelets after contact with platelet-rich plasma.
Based on these results, it is concluded that the MPC polymers may be a useful material for improving the blood compatibility of cellulose hemodialysis membranes.
Key words: Hemodialysis membrane; blood compatibility; phospholipid polymer; surface modification; protein adsorption; platelet adhesion.
INTRODUCTION cellulose membranes Though world because of their good permeability strength, it is necessary to infuse an anticoagulant their blood compatibility must be improved throughout of water and solutes and mechanical [1 ].
on the surface by physical in contact with blood or plasma the surfaces of biomedical blood-compatible when been carried out for modification were polymerization, dialysis membrane was masked with a polymer containing polymer was immobilized interactions to the surface was also utilized the polymer of a poly(ethylene membrane has been reported in complement studies have The polymers graft formation.
These findings strongly suggested role in blood compatibility.
can be modified with an MPC oyloxyethyl mers and show excellent blood compatibility co-n-butyl methacrylate (PRP), in the MPC unit mole fraction a 0.32 MPC mole fraction completely Moreover, BMA) was very small compared with that on poly(BMA), late), and poly(2-hydroxyethyl that MPC moieties on the surface play an important Therefore, polymer, blood compatibility if the surface of the cellulose membrane suppressed platelet adhesion the poly(MPC-co-BMA) [7, 9].
methacrylate) improvement In this communication, branes by various surface the hemocompatibility complement surface modification techniques using MPC polymers of cellulose hemodialysis memis described.
of the cellulose membrane did not decrease even Blood compatibility (the cellulose membrane modified with the M PC polymer however, from plasma on cellulose membranes In Table 4, the amount of protein adsorption 1.3 /J-g cm ?2 of plasma is summarized.
That are an excellent ultrafiltration and blood compatibility the membrane.
To prevent clot formation, infusion of the surface blood compatibilshould be improved.
There are many reports about of blood compatibil for improvement required for a hemodialysis membrane strength, for a solute, mechanical The properties rate, permeability The cellulose membranes have been continuously ever, the problems with blood compatibility and a decrease surface when blood contacts an anticoagulant, ity of the cellulose membrane the modification ity [4, 5].
Thus, membrane We prepared novel blood compatible polymers, surface constructed with phospholipids introduced an MPC polymer, with a bio[10].
The MPC polymer, the platelet adhesion and activation dramatically, polar group, phosphorylcholine, the surface of the substrate MPC polymer poly(MPC-co-BMA), and the amount of plasma proteins adsorbed on the surface of poly(MPC-co-BMA) was very small compared with that on the substrate acteristics of the MPC polymer, opment of novel blood-compatible use poly(MPC-co-BMA) cause regenerated to immobilize occurred during hemodialysis, cellulose membrane fusion of the MPC polymer on the cellulose membrane was designed the MPC polymer.
compatibility and meGrafting of MPC initiated with cerium activation, which was strongly chanical induced on the original cellulose dialysis membrane, was suppressed by grafting of on a cellulose mempoly(MPC) it brane was effective was not an easy process because system.
in improving blood compatibility reaction proceeded the grafting Downloaded by [University of Western Ontario] at 20:52 11 November 2014  281 and between intensity however, the belief the MA unit Reaction with in the polymer at 286.5 eV which after modification, the PMEM on a cellulose membrane is attributed the peak shifted analysis based on the MPC moiety covered with PMEM by the modification.
Although eluted when to provide good blood compatibility.
We of the surface of and blood compatibility for modification requires permeability concluded the cellulose permeability of solute when the membrane that PMEM is a suitable material hemodialysis membrane which of a solute.
Poly( propylene oxide) and Poly( tetramethylene oxide) A. G. MARGARITIS and N. K. KALFOGLOU,* Department of Chemistry, University of Patras, 26110, Patra, Greece Synopsis This study [Part I1 of a series dealing with the compatibility of polyalkyleneolddes with poly(viny1 chloride)] examines blends of PVC with poly(propy1ene oxide) ( P M ) and poly(tetramethylene oxide) (PTMO), covering the entire composition range.
Morphological, dynamic mechanical and thermal properties investigated indicate that PVC/PPrO blends are incompatible, whereas the PVC/PTMO system shows miscibility in the melt.
Experimental compatibility data of all polyether-PVC pairs investigated in Parts I and I1 are also used to test various blend miscibility prediction schemes, using solubility parameter theory and recent theory on copolymer-copolymer miscibility.
INTRODUCTION Polyethers in polyblends can be classified' as weak proton-acceptor partners; therefore, it is expected that in principle they may be compatible with poly(viny1 chloride) (PVC) and other polymers providing an acidic hydrogen.2 In Part I of this work3 the compatibility of PVC with lower members of the series of polyalkylene-oxides f(CH,jmO+ were examined; i.e., with poly(methy1ene oxide) (PMO) and poly(ethy1ene oxide) (PEO).
The experimental evidence presented indicated that only PEO in the melt and in PVC-rich compositions showed compatibility.
In Part I1 the compatibility with poly(propy1ene oxide) ( P M ) and poly(tetramethy1ene oxide) (PTMO) is examined.
However, the experiments were not designed to investigate compatibility, and the results (impact strength enhancement, melt index decrease, and PTMO melting point depression) could not provide an unambiguous answer with respect to mutual miscibility.
Among the thermoplastic polyesters the poly(buty1ene terephthalate) (PBT)-PTMO block copolymers were reported5s6 to exhibit partial compatibility with PVC a t room temperature, and in fact they have been classified7 as permanent PVC plasticizers.
Robeson' attributed compatibility to the protonacceptor potential of the ester carbonyl of the PBT segment by analogy to other polyester-PVC miscible blends.g* lo An analogous situation arises in the case of thermoplastic PU containing crystallizable blocks of methylene-bis-4phenylene isocyanate (MDI) combined with soft segments of PTMO.
However, both microscopy and DMA results support the view that overall the system is of a lower degree of compatibility than PEO/PVC.
Testing various compatibility prediction schemes was partially successful.
Figure 5 also predicts that PTrO will be compatible with PVC in the glassy state (more so than PEO) and that the optimum ratio CH,/O will be about 2-3.
(3) of the appropriate interaction parameters xi, yields, a t constant temperature, a zone of compatibility in a composition-composition plot (see Fig.
Polymer pairs (depicted as points in these miscibility plots) are considered miscible if located within the zone of compatibility and on its border [where f ( x , y) I 01 and immiscible outside it [ f ( x , y) > 01.
Connecticut 06269-31 36 The compatibilization by transesterification of aromatic thermotropic liquid crystal polyesters (Ar-TLCP’s) and TLCP’s containing aliphatic ethylene-terephthalate (ET) linkages has been studied.
In this work, the influence of TLCP block structure and transesterification on the compatibility of the components of the BinTLCPs is described.
The Ar-TLCP‘s, although ideally suited to the possibility of serving as an in-situ formed fiber reinforcement during melt processing of many thermoplastics, are also highly incompatible with most thermoplastics.
The partially aliphatic TLCP poly(Ethy1eneTerephthalate-HydroxyBenzoic Acid), p(ET/HBA), has been extensively studied and found to be compatible with a number of thermoplastic materials through transesterification (1-9).
can be used to induce compatibility of p(ET/HBA) to thermoplastics [7-91.
The use of compatibilized p(ET/HBA) as a coupling agent in a ternary blend, between a thermoplastic and an Ar-TLCP, may provide a method of compatibilization of Ar-TLCP’s to thermoplastics.
h!Y 14650-2129. compatibilized ternary blend with a bridging “interphase” of p(ET/HBA) should have better mechanical properties than an incompatible Ar-TLCP/thermoplastic blend.
compatible (15-19) or incompatible (19-21) blends depending on compositions and process conditions.
In a study of p(HBA/HNA) blended with p(ET/HBA), no evidence of compatibility was seen when blended at 310°C for 3 min (20).
The influences of blend temperature and a catalyst are also studied for effects on blend compatibility, in addition to the compositional differences between the Ar-TLCP‘s.
In the few studies that have investigated this TLCP, it was found to be generally incompatible with polycarbonate (PC) with a 1 mm dispersed phase and little or no interfacial adhesion (42, 43).
Increased compatibilization of 30/70 wt?h A950/Rodrun occurs with an increase in the TBOT catalyst, with increased dispersion of the A950 in Rodrun, improved interfacial adhesion, and less void formations.
While the additional aromatic moieties in the extracted fractions cannot be specifically identified because of peak overlap with HBA and HNA, we speculate that they are probably transesterified low molecular weight fractions t h a t act as interfacial modifiers capable of increasing the compatibility of the two phases.
30/70% K161 blends, either with X-7G or Rodrun, show signs of compatibilization as indicated by a shifting of the q s of both K161 and the p(ET/HBA) phases and a joining of them into one broad peak (Figs.
Addition of TBOT catalyst to the {30/70/x wtYo Vectra A950/Rodrun/TBOT) blends causes a further shift in the PET-block peak toward the HBA-block Tg, indicating a higher degree of compatibilization.
The more fundamental aspect of the compatibilization and miscibility of these constituents is the transesterification of the ET blocks of p(ET/HBA) and with certain blocks of the RD-501.
The ET blocks of p(ET/ HBAGO) further serve as a compatibilizing agent with the Ar-TLCP RD-501.
Binary blends of TLCP's can be compatibilized by transesterification reactions, dependent on the polymers used, their compositions, their block structure, and the process conditions.
Compatibility can be induced in incompatible blends by increasing the blockiness of the structure: either by the polymerization process used to make the polymer or by use of a cata lyst during the blending operation.
Additionally, polymers with certain block components are more readily able to undergo transesteritbition reactions that enhance compatibility.
Finalfy, these compatibilized BinTLCP's that include linkages (e.g.
an ET-block) that are able to compatibilize with random-coil thermoplastics by transesterification.
can be used as an intermediate to compatibilize wholly aromatic TLCPs with the random-coil thermoplastics (7-9, 14-17).
Compatibility characterization Christina P. Papadopoulou and Nikos K. Kalfoglou* DepartmentofChemistry,UniversityofPatra,26500Patra,Greece (Revised20February1998) The compatibility behaviour of melt-mixed blends of a polyester-type polyurethane (PU) with the Zn 2þ ionomer of poly(ethylene-co-methacrylic acid-co-isobutylacrylate) terpolymer (Ion., Zn 2þ) was investigated in the complete composition range.
Tensile properties were typical of a compatible system and d.m.a.
results failed to reveal the nature of the speciﬁc forces involved in bringing about compatibilization.
To obtain a compatible blend, compofunctional groups are nents are chosen so that ‘complementary dissimilar’3, or a third component is added to act as a compatibilizer4,5.
their Among the various compatibilizers used ionomers have been particularly effective6,7.
In later work10 the zinc salt of poly(ethylene-co-methacrylic acid-coisobutylacrylate) (Ion.,Zn 2þ) was employed to compatibilize poly(vinyl alcohol) (PVOH) and the incompatible PVOH/HDPE blends.
Analogous ﬁndings were reported11 for the poly(ethylene-co-vinyl alcohol) (EVOH)/Ion.,Zn 2þ and the compatibilization of the incompatible EVOH/HDPE using the same ionomer as a compatibilizer.
In this work reported in two parts, the compatibility behaviour of a polyester-type polyurethane (PU) with Ion.,Zn 2þ is examined.
Once their compatibility was established the study was extended to the application of the ionomer as a compatibilizer for the incompatible PU/ HDPE blend.
The choice of this compatibilizer was based on the fact that amide groups may interact with the ionomers ion–dipole interactions and/or via hydrogen bonding, metal–ion coordination6,13,14.
To examine the effect of the metal ion on compatibility an attempt was made to replace Zn 2þ with Hþ using an ion exchange procedure17.
In particular, data on « b, which is a sensitive indicator of component interface adhesion in the case of polymer alloys or cohesion in miscible blends, support the view that the system is mechanically compatible or miscible.
This may indicate the contributing role played by the metal ion in bringing about compatibilization when mixed with PU, in analogy to polyamide/ionomer blends.
are compatible (2) D.m.a.
Determination of compatibility by small-angle X-ray scattering method Moon Gyu Han, Seung Soon Im* Department of Fiber and Polymer Engineering, Center for Advanced Functional Polymers, Hanyang University, Seoul 133-791, South Korea Received 23 October 2000; received in revised form 23 January 2001; accepted 9 February 2001 Abstract Small-angle X-ray scattering patterns of polyaniline (PANI) complexes/polyimide (PI) blends were observed in order to analyze the compatibility between two components of the blends.
From the experimental results, it was concluded that the microphase separation or molecular level mixing, which was the re¯ection of compatibility, was dependent on the kinds of dopant (camphorsulfonic acid (CSA) and dodecylbenzene sulfonic acid (DBSA)), PANI content and the imidization state.
On the other hand, PANI±CSA/PAA blends exhibited wellmixed and high compatible morphology.
It was supposed that conversion from PAA to PI by thermal curing processes led to enhancement of compatibility probably due to higher interaction between two components.
The blends, therefore, exhibited different surface morphology, compatibility, and doping characteristics.
In this way, hence, the SAXS measurements enabled tracing morphological compatibility between two components of conductive blends.
Conclusions From the experimental results, the following conclusions can be drawn: The compatibility between two components of the PANI/PI could be determined by SAXS patterns.
The compatibility was estimated by the level of extinction of characteristic peaks as a result of molecular mixing.
The lower compatibility of PANI±DBSA/PAA blends, on the contrary to the general prediction, resulted in the reduced percolation threshold of conductivity.
Compatibility of Low-Density Polyethylene Poly( r-caprolactone) Blends NIKOS K. KALFOGLOU, Laboratory of Chemical Technology, Department of Chemistry, University of Patra, Patra, Greece Synopsis The compatibility of low-density polyethylene (LDPE)-poly(ecapro1actone) (PCL) was examined using the microscopic, the dynamic mechanical, and the DSC techniques.
Ultimate strength and elongation at break are characteristic of a mechanically compatible system at high and low PCL contents.
INTRODUCTION In this report the compatibility of low-density polyethylene (LDPE) with poly(c-caprolactone) (PCL) is examined.
More revealing on the question of compatibility were some preliminary results on the ultimate strength CTb and the relative elongation at failure f b of films, It is reported16 that among tensile properties ultimate obtained a t 3OOC.
The results shown in Figure 4 indicate that the two polymers are incompatible at  2548 KALFOGLOU Fig.
intermediate compositions, while at the extremes of composition they are “mechanically” compatible.
Dynamic mechanical and ultimate tensile properties indicate considerable “mechanical” compatibility at the extremes of blend composition, especially when specimens are severely quenched.
© 2003 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 90: 4068–4074, 2003 Key words: biomaterials; copolymerization; compatibility; synthesis INTRODUCTION Thrombosis is a major complication that occurs when a foreign substance comes in contact with the blood.1– 4 A number of chemicals, bioactive reagents, and different techniques have been investigated to obtain a nonthrombogenic surface.5–13 A number of polymer surface parameters are responsible for the antithrombogenic properties of synthetic polymer materials, including surface composition and morphology, hydrophilic/hydrophobic character, surface free energy, and surface charges.14 –19 Heparin administration is a quite successful method for preventing blood coagulation.
Therefore, another method for making polymers blood compatible is to attach heparin to the polymer surface either by ionic and/or covalent bonding.
To avoid excess heparin administration, many researchers have attached heparin to the polymer surface by ionic or covalent bonding.20 –22 Polyamidoamines (PAAs) possess the ability to selectively adsorb heparin from plasma or blood, giving stable complexes without any adverse effect on plasma proteins and blood cells.23–24 However, these materials as such have little signiﬁcance in biomedical ﬁelds because of their poor mechanical properties.25 Azzuoli et al.26 grafted PAA chains onto the surface of polyurethane, and heparin formed complexes onto the surface with PAA-g-polyurethane, which improved the blood compatibility of polyurethane.
Ishihara et al.34 recently showed that an increase in hydrophilicity did not have a similar effect on blood compatibility.
Hemolysis Hemolysis of the blood is a problem associated with bioincompatibility.36 Red blood cells hemolyse when Determination of Relative Thrombogenicity of the Materials by the Weight of the Thrombus Formed TABLE III Polymer samples PNVP PNVP–HEP Pip–MBA–NVP–HEP CHA–MBA–NVP–HEP HEP heparin.
Williams, D. F. Fundamental Aspects of Biocompatibility; CRC: Boca Raton, FL, 1990.
A PSF – PET block copolymer exhibits better compatibility.
Furthermore, the blend containing 2% PSF – PET exhibits better mechanical properties than uncompatibilized blends.
Comparatively speaking, the PSF – PHB block copolymer shows poor compatibility to PSF/TLCP blends.
The compatibility comparison of copolymers having different block lengths shows that *Correspondence: Qiuyu Zhang, Department of Chemical Engineering, Northwestern Polytechnical University, Xi’an, Shaanxi, P.R.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 312 Zhang, Xie, and Yan the compatibility of a copolymer depends on not only its composition but also its block length.
In practice, however, the properties of blends of TLCP/polymers are not ideal as the compositions of a majority of blends are incompatible.
The incompatibility between the matrix polymers and reinforcing TLCPs phase lead to poor interfacial adhesion, therefore, the reinforcing effect of TLCPs is less than that expected from the law of composites.
Among these approaches, using block copolymer as compatibilizer is an important method.
Generally, the compatibilizing mechanism of a block copolymer in blends can be compared to the emulsion action of a surface activity agent in a water/oil mixture.
In order to study the compatibilizing effects of a copolymer on in situ composites, two block copolymers were designed and synthesized in our work in order to compatibilize the blends of polysulfone (PSF)/TLCPA1.
The compatibilizing effect of these two block polymers was studied in detail.
DSC of TLCPA1 ( – ) and PSF/TLCPA1 compatibilized by PSF – PHB copolymer (-).
in this paper, only Tg changes of PSF were used to analysis the compatibility of copolymers.
DSC data of PSF, TLCPA1, PSF/TLCPA1 and blends compatibilized by copolymers.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 Compatibility of Block Copolymers 319 It can be found from Table 3 that the Tg of PSF in the PSF/TLCPA1 blend is close to that of pure PSF, only shift 1.18C to low temperature, exhibit poor compatibility.
Generally, it can not be concluded that the copolymers are effective compatibilizers to the PSF/TLCPA1 blends only by the Tgs change of the PSF, for not only the compatibilization of copolymer but also the plastization of the copolymer in blends can cause the Tg changes of PSF.
But we still can judge that the compatibilization of the copolymer exists, for the DTg of PSF in the blend containing the higher molecular weight PSF – PHB copolymer is less than that of the blend containing the less molecular weight PSF – PHB, which is opposite to the result of a plastization action.
Furthermore, the data in Table 3 indicate that the compatibility of a copolymer depends on not only its composition but also its block length.
Mechanical Properties The results of tensile strength and modulus, and bending strength and modulus of blends compatibilized by copolymers are summarized in Table 4.
The data of Table 4 show that the mechanical properties of blends compatibilized by PSF – PET is better than that of blends compatibilized by PSF – PHB.
The blend compatibilized by the PSF – PET copolymer with longer PSF chain length exhibits better properties than a copolymer with a shorter PSF chain length.
The blends compatibilized by PSF – PHB show a reverse tendency.
Only the blend compatibilized by PSF – PHB having a shorter PSF block exhibits mechanical properties similar to pure PSF; the properties of the other two blends compatibilized by PSF – PHB are poor.
Mechanical properties of PSF, PSF/TLCPA1, and blends containing copolymer compatibilizer.
Materials PSF PSF/TLCPA1¼90/10 1 2 4 5 6 TLCP Tensile strength (MPa) Tensile modulus (GPa) Bending strength (Mpa) Bending modulus (GPa) 74.6 80.9 77.9 85.0 70.5 69.2 56.6 130.0 2.21 2.97 3.14 3.31 3.24 3.19 2.97 12.0 124.9 130.4 131.3 136.5 122.2 119.9 112.3 168 1.91 2.12 2.32 2.38 2.22 2.52 2.04 11.4 the mechanical properties of blends, the mechanical property improving ability of a compatibilizer has some relation to its composition and the block length.
The worse mechanical properties of the blend compatibilized by PSF – PHB may come from either their side effect to the TLCPA1 ﬁbril formation or their lower compatibility to PSF/TLCPA1 blends.
In the blends compatibilized by PSF – PHB, the diameter of the TLCPA1 microﬁber is bigger than that in blends compatibilized by PSF – PET, similar to that of the uncompatibilized blend, and the interfacial area is also similar to that of 0 Downloaded by [Nipissing University] at 02:20 09 October 2014  ©2003 Marcel Dekker, Inc. All rights reserved.
SEM micrographs of the uncompatibilized and compatibilized blends (a, : the transect and vertical section of injection sample of the PSF=TLCPA1 ¼ 90=10 0 a blend; b, b the PSF=TLCPA1 ¼ 90=10 blend compatibilized by PSF – PET; c, c : the transect and the PSF=TLCPA1 ¼ 90=10 blend vertical compatibilized by PSF – PHB).
the transect and vertical section of injection sample of injection sample of section of : 0 (Continued) the uncompatibilized blend.
So it can be concluded that the PSF – PET block copolymer with a larger block length beneﬁts by forming a larger aspect ration TLCPA1 microﬁber, improving the interfacial interaction of blends, and the PSF – PHB is ineffective both in exhibits better compatibility.
increasing the aspects ratio of TLCPA1 microﬁber and in improving the interfacial adhesion of the blend; the compatibility of PSF – PHB is poor.
Analysis of Compatibility of Copolymer Generally, the compatibility of a copolymer mainly arises from its two actions in the interface of the blends.
a bridge between two phases of incompatible blends and improve adhesion of the interfacial area.
It is well known that the compatibility of a copolymer is related to many factors such as its block structure, its resolution parameters and functional group, etc.
According to the general rules of compatibility theory, two copolymers synthesized by us would be a good compatibilizer.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 324 Zhang, Xie, and Yan compatibilizing effect; the compatibility of PSF – PHB, having a longer or a shorter block length, was worse than our expectation.
This indicates that the composition and block length are important factors to the compatibility of a copolymer.
The poor compatibility of PSF – PHB may be related to their rigid molecular structure and resulted as in worse distributing and bridging ability.
On the contrary, with PSF – PHB it is difﬁcult to get an ideal distribution in the matrix and the TLCP phase, so it cannot provide a larger “anchored” force between the matrix and the TLCP phase and shows worse compatibility.
Because the compatibility of a copolymer is related to its interface action in a blend, a copolymer with a longer block length would provide a larger “anchored” force between the matrix and the TLCP phase, so it is easy to understand why the PSF – PET, having a longer PSF block, exhibits a better compatibilizing effect than a shorter one does.
Otherwise, it is not a good compatibilizer.
This can be conﬁrmed by the results of the compatibility of PSF – PHB with different block lengths—the higher the molecular weight, the poorer the compatibilizing effect.
The PSF – PET block copolymer with a larger block length exhibits better compatibility.
The compatibility of a copolymer depends on not only its composition 4. but also its block length.
In order to get ideal compatibilizing effect, a copolymer must have a suitable composition and block length.
To cite this article: M. Niwa , H. Kawakami , M. Kanno , S. Nagaoka , T. Kanamori , T. Shinbo & S. Kubota (2001) Gas transfer and blood compatibility of asymmetric polyimide hollow fiber , Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition, 12:5, 533-542, DOI: 10.1163/156856201300194261 To link to this article: http://dx.doi.org/10.1163/156856201300194261 PLEASE SCROLL DOWN FOR ARTICLE Taylor & Francis makes every effort to ensure the accuracy of all the information (the “Content”) contained in the publications on our platform.
Gas transfer and blood compatibility of asymmetric polyimide hollow ber , M. KANNO 1, S. NAGAOKA 1, ¤ M. NIWA 1, H. KAWAKAMI 1; T. KANAMORI 2, T. SHINBO 2 and S. KUBOTA 3 1 Department of Applied Chemistry, Tokyo Metropolitan University, Hachioji, Tokyo 192-0397, Japan 2 Department of Polymer Engineering, National Institute of Materials and Chemical Research, Tsukuba, Ibaraki 305-8565, Japan 3 Department of Surgery, St. Marianna University School of Medicine, Kawasaki, Kanagawa 216-8511, Japan Received 14 August 2000; accepted 4 January 2001 Abstract—We have fabricated an asymmetric polyimide hollow ber for use as a membrane oxygenator.
The blood compatibility of the polyimide hollow ber has been evaluated in vitro and in vivo.
The polyimide had an excellent blood compatibility when compared with PDMS.
Key words: Fluorinated polyimide; hollow ber; membrane oxygenator; blood compatibility; brinogen; platelet.
A key step for the advancement of the membrane oxygenator clinically used during a long-term period is to develop a novel membrane material with excellent gas transfer and blood compatibility.
The gas transfer and the blood compatibility of the hollow ber have been investigated.
QN2 Another problem for long-term ECMO or PCPS is poor blood compatibility of the polymer materials.
These results indicate that 6FDA– 6FAP is an excellent candidate for bloodcompatible materials.
It was also found that the polyimide membranes exhibited excellent blood compatibility in vitro and in vivo.
I HUA JIADONG, WU RUOFENG, LIU LU, and YU PEIRONG, Department of Chemistry, Shanghai University of Science and Technology, Shanghai, China Synopsis An attempt was made which expressed in a compatibility rule not only the polymer effect but the solvent effect in a given polymeric catalyst system.
Here the compatibility refers to interaction energy effects among the polymer backbone, substrate, and solvent, which can be measured by cohesive energy density or the solubility parameter.
It seems likely that the absorption or desorption in a solid catalytic process is related to the compatibility between the polymer catalyst and the substrate or the solvent.
A good compatibility of a polymer catalyst with a substrate can create a higher concentration around the active site of Journal of Applied Polymer Science, Vol.
In addition, the reaction rate is also related to the compatibility between the solvents and the substrates.
According to solution theory, the compatibility can be measured by solubility parameters of various mixing components.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Interaction Energies and Compatibilities among Mixing Components At present, the cohesive energy density is used as the underlying points for the discussion of compatibility among mixing components.
When the difference between the solvent and the polymer solubility parameter is equal to zero, indicating a good compatibility between like components.
Hence a good compatibility of a polymer catalyst with a substrate is able to create a good environment, i.e., a higher concentration around the active site of the polymer catalyst than in the solvent, increasing the catalytic reaction rate.
These phenomena are interpreted in terms of compatibility of component species.
This partition depends on compatibilities determined by difference between the solubility parameters of the substrate and the polymer catalyst, and various solvents.
From the standpoint of compatibility, it is easy to explain those phenomena above.
Compatibilities among Components and Design of a Polymer Catalyst The aim of this article is an attempt to seek to express, in the compatibility rule among mixing components, not only the polymer effect but also the solvent effect in a given polymeric catalysis system.
The compatibility refers to interaction energy density measured by solubility parameter.
It seems successful more or less that the compatibility rule was utilized for explaining the polymer effect in this catalytic system using the polymeric catalyst.
As a result, it is hoped that the compatibility rule in this polymeric catalyst system  POLYMER CATALYST-SUBSTRATE-SOLVENT 1217 perhaps likely induces one to seek designing a polymeric catalyst having a high activity for a given substrate.
Second, the difference of solubility parameters between the substrates and a selected solvent required increasing to maximum as much as possible except that the substrate and the solvent are incompatible with each other.
In addition, it is known that multifunctional monomers that form crosslinked polymers are limitedly compatible with their own polymer [12, 13].
For limitedly compatible systems, the characteris(cid:2) tic distribution of the Gibbs energy has two local min(cid:2) ima [16], unlike that in the case where the PPC is a true solution throughout the polymerization process (Fig.
Here, we can identify three ranges of a constant sign of this parameter: In the initial (con(cid:2) version varies from 0 to P1) and final (P2 < P < 1) ranges of conversion, takes positive values; that is, here, the β(cid:2) components of the composite are compatible.
Switching to the parameter β, we should take into account that, in addition to the compatibility of the monomer and the polymer, parameter β decreases with an increase in the viscosity of the com(cid:2) posite (with a decrease in diffusion coefficient D) dur(cid:2) ing polymerization (Eq.
The limited compatibility of the components of the composite additionally has an effect on the dynamics of variation in ρ (Fig.
In a limit(cid:2) edly compatible system, dependence ρ(〈P〉x') mono(cid:2) tonically increases: In the region of the heterophase state of the environment, ρ decreases.
CONCLUSIONS The effect of the kinetics of polymerization on the development of concentration heterogeneities in PPCs depends on the thermodynamic compatibility of the monomer–resulting(cid:2)polymer system.
ABSTRACT: To investigate the interfacial compatibility of wood flour/polypropylene (PP) composite, compressive stress relaxation curves at different temperatures (26, 40, C) were determined at various wood contents (0, 20, and 60 30, 40, 50, 60, and 70%) without coupling agent and further determined at wood contents of 50 and 60% by using maleic anhydride grafted polypropylene (MAPP) and silane as coupling agents.
E of wood flour/polypropylene composites without coupling agent showed the highest value at wood content of 40%, suggesting that the best interfacial compatibility between wood and PP occurred at 40% wood content.
Within all investigations on wood flour/polymer composites, interfacial compatibility is always the key problem that calls for solution.1–4 Many researchers have discussed the mechanisms of coupling agent modified wood flour/polymer composites by various methods such as environmental scanning electron microscope (ESEM),5 electron spectroscopy for chemical analysis (ESCA),1 dynamic mechanical analysis (DMA),6 scanning electron microscope (SEM),7 differential scanning calorimetry (DSC),8 wide-angle X-ray diffraction (WAXD),9 and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).10 It was found that coupling agent can form chemical bonds on the surface of wood and the interface between wood and polymer and it can well infiltrate the surface of wood, which Correspondence to: J. Cao (caoj@bjfu.edu.cn).
Higher apparent activation energy corresponds to the requirement of more energy to get the stress relaxed, which means a better internal bonding and compatibility between the molecules in the composite.
With silane interaction between wood flour and PP improves and the internal structure becomes more compact, but excessive silane molecules may also weaken the compatibility and bonding force between wood flour and PP, which is similar to MAPP.
Besides, the residual silanol groups in the wood flour will further condense with each other and the covalent ASiAOACA bonds may not be stable.32 As a result, the negative effect of excessive silane molecules on the interfacial compatibility between wood flour and PP becomes obvious.
Binary blends of L2, D2, L3, and D3 are compatible and form isomorphous mixed crystals at all compositions, whereas other pairs, with the exception of Ll/D1, are incompatible.
The AA separation originates from incompatibility of the polymers.
It was found that L2 and L3 (or D3) were compatible at all compositions, whereas other pairs were not.
investigated the phase behavior of ternary systems consisting of a solvent and two incompatible semirigid polymers, such as dimethylacetamide/cellulose acetate/hydroxypopyl cellu10se~~ and CHCl JLl/ poly(hexy1 isocyanate) (PHIC).28 They observed the IIA region and suggested that another triphase (IAA) region was probably adjacent to the IIA region.
The phase behavior of these systems involving incompatible polymers may be described by incorporating a positive polymer-polymer interaction parameter into the Abe-Flory theory.
As described above, the L2 (D2) and L3 (D3) polymers were compatible and formed isomorphous mixed crystals at all compositions.
DISCUSSION Demixing in CHCl / D3 / Ll The phase behavior of CHC13/D3/L1 is elucidated by taking into account the incompatibility of the polymers.
Above an even higher concentration, the separation into two A phases originates from incompatibility of the polymers.
Ternary System Involving Incompatible Polymers Marsano reported the IIA and IAA triphase regions for the ternary system CHC13/L1/PHIC.28 He evaluated a phase diagram according to the Flory-Matheson theory 39 applicable to the system containing semirigid poly  646 SASAKI ET AL.
This incompatibility, rather than semirigidity, is considered to be responsible for the triphase regions.
Compatibility Studies on Some Solutions of Rubber Blends by Ultrasonic Techniques M. A. SIDKEY, A, M. ABD EL FATTAH,* and N. S. ABD EL ALL National Institute for Standards, Cairo, Egypt SYNOPSIS The degree of compatibility of the blend solutions, SBR-NR, SBR-BR, and SBR-NBR, dissolved in toluene was studied using ultrasonic methods.
The variation of longitudinal ultrasonic velocity with composition is linear with SBR-NR and SBR-BR blends indicating compatible systems.
For SBR-NBR the plots of ultrasonic velocity versus composition deviates from linearity according to the degree of compatibility of this blend system.
However, the gain in newer properties depends on the degree of compatibility of the polymers at a molecular level.
Many experimental and theoretical studies reported in the literature include methods of determining the degree of compatibility.
Among these methods are viscometric measurements, dynamic mechanical response, electron microscopy, glass transition temperatures, and infrared spectroscopy.’ More recently, many workers ’-’ report that the ultrasonic velocity measurements may reveal the extent of compatibility in highly viscous or solid forms of polymer blends.
Detailed ultrasonic velocity studies indicated that, in compatible polymer blends, the ultrasonic velocity varies linearly with composition while it deviates from linearity in the incompatible blends.
New approach to the study of compatibility of polymer blends using ultrasonic attenuation was offered by Arman et al., lo Belaribi l1 and his co-workers, and Schneider.” Arman reported that bad adhesion between the matrix and * To whom correspondence should be addressed.
Schneider reported that compatible polymer blends exhibit specific glass transition composition behavior.
Measurements of mixing enthalpies in polymer-polymer pairs is also of interest in arriving at criteria for compatibility.
Moreover, they found that systems that separate into phases ( incompatible blends) are characterized by positive values for heat of mixing ( A H > 0 ) while systems that do not separate into phases (compatible blends) are characterized by negative values for heat of mixing (AH < 0 ) .
Shneier  suggested an equation for heat of mixing for two-component blend systems, either compatible or incompatible, given in the form where X, p, and Mare the weight fraction of polymer, density, and monomer unit molecular weight, respectively; 6 is the solubility parameter of the polymer.
Singh and Singh' calculated the heat of mixing of some polymer blends using the Schneier equation and reported that heat of mixing with values below a limiting value of 4.185 X J/mol indicate compatible blends while values for heat of mixing for incompatible blends are mostly above this limiting value.
with composition in the two concentrations indicating clearly the compatible miscibility in all compositions.
Values of the heat of mixing of these blends are found to lie between 0.358 X J/mol, i.e., well below 4.185 X lO-'J/mol, the figure considered to be the upper limit of compatibility.
The relation is linear and is represented by a straight lines characterizing compatible behavior.
584 SIDKEY, ABD EL FATTAH, AND ABD EL ALL Although some of the values for heat of mixing lie above the upper limit of compatibility, we can presume that the blends are compatible since many values for heat of mixing are less than limiting values.
It is clear that the relation is linear, which predicts the compatibility manner of this blend system.
The second region also shows the same behavior emphasizing the incompatibility of the blends.
The presence of more than one maximum indicates phase inversion and consequently incompatible blend system.
cules in the mixture are in disordered state and the incompatibility of this blend system may be due to the differences in their nature.
On the basis of values of heat of mixing, linearity of ultrasonic velocity versus composition, the existence of one single maximum in attenuation-composition plot and linearity of adiabatic compressibility versus composition SBR-NR, and SBR-BR blends are predicted to be compatible over the entire range of composition while blends of SBR-NBR are predicted to be incompatible.
For compatible and incompatible systems, the present ultrasonic results agree with the observations made by Yahia'' and his co-workers who reported viscometric results for compatible and incompatible systems.
The present investigation indicates clearly that the compatibility of rubber blends may be studied by ultrasonic techniques.
It may be concluded that the simplest measurements of ultrasonic velocity and ultrasonic attenuation presents clues to the compatibility of blends, which is in general obtained by sophisticated techniques.
INTRODUCTION Equation (1) provides a value whose magnitude apparently differentiates as either compatible as solids or in between polymer mixtures l i ~ t e d ~ .
compatible: A H , = ( ~ i M i ~ i ( & 62)2[x2/(1 22)M2~2 + (1 x i ) M i p ~ I ~ ) ~ ’ ~ (1) where x refers to the weight fraction of components 1 and 2 present in the mixture (x1 + x2 = 1.0), and M , p , and 6 , refer, respectively, to the molecular weight of an average monomer unit, polymer density, and solubility parameter.
(1) in pointing up polymer pairs compatible as solids was tested’ using the data of Bohn2 and M01au.~ Using these lists as criteria, eq.
(1) appears useful in providing the investigator a basis for differentiating between polymer pairs that may or may not be compatible as solids.
Bohn2 and Krause3 have assembled lists of polymer pairs on which compatibility studies have been reported.
The lists contain polymer pairs for which, according to them, compatibility as solids may be considered to be definitely established at least in some regions of proportions.
The system poly(methy1 methacrylate) (PR,IMA)/poly(vinyl acetate) (PVAc) is listed as incompatible by Bohn2 and borderline by K r a ~ s e .
(l), the system would be expected to be compatible as solids.
Friese5 reported that homogeneous solutions and transparent films were obtained with mixtures of PMMA and PVAc when chloroform or toluene were used as solvents, but that phase separation and noncompatible films were obtained when ethyl acetate, benzyl acetate, or dimethylformamide were used.
Based on these results, Bohn2 classified the system as being incompatible as solids.
It has been mentioned previously' that in Bohn's list, in most instances, compatible polymer pairs have been prepared in the melt.
Mixing in the melt is not a necessary condition, nor does it assure obtaining polymer pairs compatible as solids.
For example, for the di-alkyl phthalate series (Table I ) , the X parameter decreases as the molecular weight is increased, indicating an improved polymer-plasticizer compatibility.
J Solid State Electrochem (1998) 2: 257–261  Springer-Verlag 1998 Wu Xu á Zheng-Hua Deng á Xiao-Zheng Zhang Guo-Xiang Wan The in¯uence of the compatibility of plasticizers with polymer ionic conductors on ionic conduction Received: 2 September 1997 / Accepted: 14 January 1998 Abstract 
The inﬂuence of the compatibility of plasticizers on the aggregated structure and the ion-conductive behavior of poly(ethylene oxide)/lithium methoxy di (ethyleneoxy) phenylsulfonate (EO2PSLi) complex were studied using two plasticizers with dierent polarity, cbutyrolactone (BL) and 2,5-di(methyl diglycol)-1,4;3,6dianhydrous sorbitol ether (DGS), a novel pincer-like plasticizer synthesized in this paper.
Key words Compatibility á Plasticizer á Ionic conduction á PEO á Lithium oligoether phenylsulfonate Introduction light weight, Solid polymer electrolytes (SPEs) have been given extensive attention since they were reported by Wright [1] and Armand [2] owing to their desirable characteristics such as easy ﬁlm-formation, good compatibility with lithium metal, no leakage and low self-discharge when used in batteries.
have poor compatibility with polymer matrixes.
This poor compatibility in turn inﬂuences the stability of the ionic conductivity of the polymer electrolytes.
This also demonstrates that the compatibility of DGS with PEO is better than that of BL with PEO.
This also demonstrates that the compatibility of DGS with PEO is better than that of BL with PEO.
The above results indicate that the dierence of the ionic conduction in DGSand BL-plasticized PEO/ EO2PSLi complexes chieﬂy results from the dierence of the compatibility of these two plasticizers with the polymer matrix PEO.
However, because of the poor compatibility of BL with PEO, BL and PEO form two separate phases which do not completely dissolve in each other.
Inﬂuence of DGS-BL mixture on ionic conductivity of PEO/EO2PSLi complex The good compatibility of DGS plasticizer with PEO/ EO2PSLi complex can eectively decrease the crystallinity of PEO and the migration of the plasticizer out of the polymer electrolyte.
When the plasticizer has good compatibility with the polymer matrix, it is favorable to degrade the shortrange interaction between polymer chains and in turn to improve the ionic conductivity.
This result is consistent with the values of the Tgs, the microscopy study, and the measured extrudate swell ratios which show that compatibility increases more in the PET-rich compositions than in the PC-rich compositions.
Also, the Flory-Huggins polymer-polymer interaction parameter (x12) between the two polymers was determined by the T, Several technique^^*"-^^ can be used to study the compatibility of miscible blends.
Only a few methods have been developed, however, which can be applied to incompatible polymer blend systems, such as the ternary solution method5.15 and gel permeation chromatography (GPC).16-20 In our present study we are examining the miscibility of the blends of PC and PET by *Present address: Research Institute of Industrial Science and Technology, Pohang, South Korea 790330.
From the microscopy samples, it appears that the compatibility increases more in the regions of  1424 KIM AND BURNS I 2.0 0 0.0 0 6 0.2 0.4 0.8 WEIGHT FRACTION PET, ABS OR KODAR A I 5 0 3 1.0 Fig.
The maximum in the extrudate swell ratio at a certain composition is behavior typical of incompatible blends.
From the above results it can be concluded that the blends of PC-PET are mechanically compatible for 0.70, 0.80, and 0.90 weight fractions PC but that these blends are not thermodynamically miscible.
This result is consistent with the values of the T's and the microscopy study which have shown that compatibility increases more in the PET-rich compositions than in the PC-rich compositions.
It can be surmised that if x12 < ( x , , ) ~ is observed, then the polymers are compatible with each other and there will be no phase separation.
From the values of the Tgs of PC-PET blends, it is concluded that the compatibility is higher in the PET-rich compositions than in the PC-rich compositions.
In the study of morphology by scanning electron microscopy and the result of extrudate swell with various compositions, it is concluded that compatibility is achieved for compositions 0.70,0.80, and 0.90 weight fraction PET of the PC-PET blends, but that these blends are not microscopically miscible.
H. J. Karam, in Polymer Compatibility and Incompatibility, K. Solc, Ed., Chur, Harwood Academic Publishers, MMI Press Symp.
Effect of Fillers on the Compatibility of Polymer Blends NIKOS K. KALFOGLOU, Department of Chemistry, University of Patra, 26110 Patra, Greece Synopsis The effects of carbon black, talc, and ultrafine silica filler, at different filler loading, on the compatibility of two binary blends was examined.
These were, the mechanically compatible polyurethane (PU)/poly(vinyl chloride) (PVC) at 25/75 weight ratio, and the poly( c-caprolactone) (PCL)/styrene-acylonitrile (SAN) copolymer (with 30% AN content), at the 50/50 blend composition.
Overall, the fillers had no compatibilizing effect on the blend.
The aim of this experimental work was to focus on the question whether fillers can promote compatibility in polymers.
There has been a suggestion in the literature',2 that such an effect has been observed, and most recently Lipatov and co-workers3 reported that introduction of a filler enhances the thermodynamic compatibility of a binary polyethylene-polyurethane blend.
It should be pointed out that if compatibilization can be achieved by the addition of suitable fillers, it would constitute a major technical achievement.
The systems chosen were the mechanically compatible blend of a rubbery polyurethane (PU)/poly(vinyl chloride) (PVC) studied before4 and the binary blend poly( c-caprolactone) (PCL)/styrene-acrylonitrile copolymer (SAN) containing 30 wt % acrylonitrile (AN).
It is known that carbon black has free radicals interacting with the II electrons of the double bonds.23 Notwithstanding these matrix-filler interactions, examination of the loss moduli spectra indicates that both binary blends remain incompatible.
Addition of fillers of varying surface area to a mechanically compatible or to a binary blend near its miscibility region does not lead to compatibility as conventionally defined.
Viscosity-Morphology-Compatibility Relationship of Polymer Blends LINE-HWA CHU,' SHANG-HER GUO,' WEN-YEN CHIU,'** and HSIENC-CHENG TSENG* 'Institute of Materials Science and Engineering, National Taiwan University, and *Department of Chemical Engineering, National Taiwan Institute of Technology, Taipei, Taiwan, Republic of China SYNOPSIS To investigate the correlation of viscosity-morphology-compatibility of polymer blends, polystyrene, polybutadiene, and styrene /butadiene triblock copolymer were selected as our materials.
The rheological properties of blends may depend heavily on the mutual compatibility and morphology in the molten states of the parent polymers.
It is concluded that the crystallization of PCL is markedly inhibited due to association of the TBSAN with PCL chains in the compatible amorphous phase.
The present experiments were performed in order to determine the effects of molecular weight and temperature on these limits of miscibility or compatibility.
This model, then incorporates the dependence of compatibility on molecular weight.
Thus, the cloud point at elevated temperatures occurs at lower total polymer concentration because of both the basic chemical nature of the polymers and the fact that lowering the molecular weight does less to enhance the compatibility at elevated temperatures for these two polymers.
This decrease in compatibility with increasing temperature is consistent with the slightly exothermic heat of mixing of benzene solutions of polystyrene and poly (methyl met hacrylate).
on their compatibility or, to be more precise, on their thermodynamic afﬁ nity.
In the present report an attempt is made to assess the effect of the compatibility of resorcinol–formaldehyde resin with PETP on rubber-to-polyester cord bond strength.
The compatibility of resin with PETP was assessed from the parameter [3, p. 11] β =(δp – δr)2 where δp is the solubility parameter of PETP [3, p. 217], and δr is the solubility parameter of resorcinol– formaldehyde resin.
Polymer 41 (2000) 4803–4809 The effect of compatibility on toughness of PPS/SEBS polymer alloy T. Hisamatsua,*, S. Nakanoa, T. Adachib, M. Ishikawab, K. Iwakurab bDepartment of Material Engineering, Faculty of Engineering, Yamagata University, 4-3-16 Jonan Yonezawa 992-8510, Japan aYamagata Research Institute of Technology, 2-2-1 Matsuei Yamagata 990-2473, Japan Received 4 February 1999; received in revised form 6 May 1999; accepted 21 June 1999 Abstract The effect of compatibility on the improvement of the toughness of polyphenylenesulﬁde (PPS) blended with styrene–ethylene–butylene– styrene block copolymers (SEBS) has been studied.
In PPS/SEBS polymer alloy having SEBS, which was highly modiﬁed by maleic anhydride, it was conﬁrmed that the elastomers were dispersed ﬁnely because of high compatibility with the PPS matrix, and the toughness was improved efﬁciently by the release of constraint of the strain due to void formation in the elastomer particles.
On the contrary, the states of dispersion of the elastomer are considerably affected by the compatibility and the difference of viscosity between the matrix polymer and the elastomer [7,8].
The purpose of this study is to examine the effect of compatibility between polyphenylenesulﬁde (PPS) as a matrix polymer and styrene–ethylene–butylene–styrene block copolymers (SEBS) as elastomers on the improvement of toughness of the PPS/SEBS polymer alloy.
SEBS increases with the decrease in compatibility of the PPS/SEBS polymer alloy, and as the increase in the content of the elastomer, it is difﬁcult to divide rod-like SEBS into spherical particles, and consequently SEBS easily forms the state of orientation.
Whereas our study shows that though the elastomer and the matrix are equal in viscosity, the states of dispersion are affected by both compatibility and content of the elastomer.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 154 Abd-El-Messieh The compatibility study undertaken by using either dielectric or viscosity techniques led to the conclusion that PS/PVC blends free from MA and those containing 5% MA are incompatible.
On the other hand, the addition of MA with concentration 10% and 20% could solve to some extent the problem of phase separation (i.e., improve the compatibility of PS/PVC blends).
Many authors have studied the compatibility of polymer blends with including the relaxation method.
This different dielectric methods, dynamic method needs intensive work to be carried out because a rapid dielectric method was recently proposed to study such compatibility.
Viscosity technique has been also applied to investigate the compatibility of polymeric blends in dilute solutions.
This work studies the compatibility of PS/PVC blends by using two different techniques—the viscosity and dielectric methods—in addition to the calculation of heat of mixing.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 Dielectric Relaxation and Compatibility of PS/PVC Blends 159 Compatibility Study Heat of Mixing The calculation of heat of mixing is considered to be a tool for determination of the degree of compatibility between polymer blends.
It was noted that the polymer compatibility in the solid state might occur if the heat of mixing lies below 4:185 £ 1023 Joule=mole:[33] The heat of mixing was calculated for the system under investigation using the following equation[33]: DHm ¼ {X1M1r1ðd1 2 d2Þ2½X2=ð1 2 X2ÞM2r2 þ ð1 2 X1ÞM1r1Þ2}1=2 Where X, r, and M are the weight fraction of polymer, density, and monomer unit molecular weight, respectively, and d is the solubility parameter of the polymers.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 160 Abd-El-Messieh Viscosity Measurements Viscosity techniques have been applied to investigate the compatibility of PS/PVC blends in dilute solution.
The degree of compatibility of the polymer blends can be deduced from[18]: ðhsp=CÞ ¼ ½hi þ K½hi2C where hsp is the speciﬁc viscosity, C is the concentration in g/100 mL, hi is the intrinsic viscosity and K is a constant.
The deviation from linearity could lead to a conclusion that PS/PVC blends are incompatible.
This deviation, which indicates that the investigated blends are incompatible[15 – 17] is in good agreement with the trend given in the case of viscosity measurements.
PS/PVC Blends with Maleic Anhydride Maleic anhydride was chosen as a low molecular weight additive and added to PS/PVC blends (0/100, 80/20, 60/40, 40/60, 20/80, and 100/0) with different percentages ranging from 5% to 20% as a trial to improve the compatibility of such blends.
To check on the compatibility after the addition of MA, the 1 0 is plotted graphically versus the PS content at f ¼ 1 kHz in Fig.
This deviation could indicate that PS/PVC blends with 5% MA are still incompatible.
This means that the addition of MA with a concentration 10% or more to the investigated blends improves to some extent the degree of compatibility in PS/PVC blends.
It is clear that the values of hi do not coincide with the line connecting the two individuals, only for blends containing 5% MA, which indicates some sort of incompatibility in such blends.
This material may not be used or reproduced in any form without the express written permission of Marcel Dekker, Inc. MARCEL DEKKER, INC. (cid:127) 270 MADISON AVENUE (cid:127) NEW YORK, NY 10016 168 Abd-El-Messieh considered to be the reason for the compatibility improvement—but only for concentrations 10% or more.
To get a compatible PVC/PS blend that is characterized by a good insulating properties, the MA added to this blend should not exceed 10%.
The addition of MA with concentrations of 10% or more could improve, to some extent, the compatibility of such blends.
The compatibility was examined by measuring thermal properties such as melting point and crystallization temperature.
Polymer incompatibility arises from the very small entropy gains when the different kinds of long chains are mixed.
Via the it is reported that a compatibilized PVC-acrylic polymer latter, for example: can be obtained by blending the mixture of poly(ethylhexy1 acry1ate)-g-PMMA copolymer and homopolymers with PVC.
DOI:10.1002/pat.317 Studies on the Rheological Properties and Compatibility of Low Molecular Weight PC and PS Polymer Alloy† Jun Liu* and Ji-Gui Zhang School of Material, Wuhan University of Technology, Wuhan 430070, China ABSTRACT 
The rheological properties and compatibility of PC/PS containing SMA are determined and the possibility of the alloy being used as a new disc material is also discussed in this paper.
The influence of SMA added into PC/PS on the compatibility was also studied.
The results showed that SMA has compatibilization, apparent viscosity a of the systems could be lowered by the addition of the compatibilizer, and the results of DSC showed that the Tg of the PC phase got closer to the Tg of the PS phase, until it has only one Tg.
It indicated compatibilization was better, consistent with the result of DSC.
Finally, it is discussed whether the PC/PS alloy systems with the compatibilizer could be used as the substrate material for optical disks.
Low molecular weight polycarbonate (PC) is widely used as an optical disc substrate material.
The rheological properties and compatibility of PC/PS containing SMA are determined and the possibility of the alloy being used as a new disc material is also discussed in this paper [3±7].
The glass-transition temperature (Tg) is relevant to the degree of compatibility of polymer alloys, and the compatibility can be investigated by DSC.
The presence of graft polymer improves the compatibility of PC with PS.
4a, in the fragment of the alloy without SMA, the PS dispersed phase shows larger diameter, uniform distribution, as a result of brittle fracture due to the poor compatibility.
While in the presence of compatibilizer SMA (Fig.
the fragment is rough, resembles ductile fracture, and micropores of continuous phase PC are obviously reduced, so the compatibility of PC and PS is markedly increased.
The shows that compatibilization is better, consistent with the result of DSC.
The study reveals that low molecular weight PC/PS alloy with SMA has high mobility and fine compatibility.
Detection of one or two glass transition regions was used to classify the blends as compatible or incompatible.
The compatibility of poly(2,6-dimethyl-l,4-phenylene oxide) (PPO) and polystyrene (PS) has been the subject of many investigations.
Further, compatibility studies of chlorinated polystyrene derivatives with PPO and PS have also been reported .
This paper describes the preparation and analysis of p-fluoroand o-fluorostyrene homopolymers and poly(styrene-co-p-fluorostyrene) containing 46 mol 96 of pFS (SP46) and poly(styrene-co-o-fluorostyrene) with 49 mol 5% of oFS (S049) and the compatibility of these systems with PPO and with PS.
This single glass transition temperature may or may not be indicative of compatibility; the ambiguity is due to the very close Tg's of the respective components.
Copolymers of styrene-p-fluorostyrene show one Tg, but additional proof (3) (4) is necessary to show that this is a compatible blend.
The variation of the longitudinal ultrasonic velocity with the d ratios was linear, indicating a compatible system in comparison with the same system without epoxidation (natural rubber/ethylene–propylene diene monomer), which was incompatible.
2002 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 86: 2816–2819, 2002 INTRODUCTION The ever increasing demand for polymer blends spells the need for monitoring the blend properties, such as compatibility and morphology, that dictate most of the physical properties of the end product.
A new approach to the study of polymer blend compatibility with ultrasonic attenuation was investigated by Arman and coworkers.12–14 They reported that poor adhesion between two polymers led to high values of the attenuation coefﬁcient.
Singh and coworkers studied the ultrasonic velocity for compatible, semicompatible, and incompatible polymeric blends, and they found that in compatible blends, the ultrasonic velocity varied linearly with composition.
In contrast, the ultrasonic velocity deviated from linearity, depending on the degree of compatibilization.
A criterion for polymer miscibility (compatibility) based on fundamental thermodynamics states that ⌬G m should be negative.
Schneier16 calculated the heat of mixing (⌬H) for a number of compatible and incompatible blends and suggested an equation based on the formulation of Gee:17 ⌬H 再X1M1␳1共␦1 ⫺ ␦2兲2 ⫻冋 X2 共1 ⫺ X2兲M2␳2 ⫹ 共1 ⫺ X1兲M1␳1 册 2冎 1/2 where X៮ , ␳, and M are the weight fraction of the polymer, the density of the monomer unit, and the molecular weight, respectively.
However, Singh and Singh6 calculated ⌬H for some compatible blends with the Schneier equation.16 They reported values of ⌬H below a ﬁgure considered to be the upper limit of compatibility: 4.185 ⫻ 10⫺2 J/mol.
Because ultrasonic and Mooney viscometry studies on the compatibility of epoxidized natural rubber (ENR)/ethylene–propylene diene monomer (EPDM) rubber blends have not received enough attention and clear investigation, we decided to use both ultrasonic  COMPATIBILITY OF NR/EPDM VIA NR EPOXIDATION 2817 velocity and Mooney viscometry techniques to investigate the degree of compatibility between ENR and EPDM rubber.
Also, we aimed to improve the degree of compatibility between natural rubber (NR) and EPDM rubber through NR epoxidation.
Also, the compatibility or afﬁnity of ENR to be mixed with EPDM can be determined by the linearity behavior of these curves.
In contrast, Sideky et al.21 reported that NR/EPDM without NR epoxidation was an incompatible system over the entire range studied.
The shape of the curve is almost linear, which conﬁrms the compatibility of this system over a certain range of blend compositions.
This means that ENR has stronger interparticle interactions than EPDM because of the presence of epoxide groups in NR.22 This may increase the compatibility of ENR with EPDM in the blend.
When the percentage of EPDM increases above a certain range, the degree of compatibility between ENR and EPDM decreases because of the existence of ethylene–propylene units in EPDM.
The glass-transition results agree with those results shown in Figures 1, 2, 4, and 5; this means that the compatibility of this blend system was improved after the NR was transformed into ENR.
The measurements of the ultrasonic absorption, ultrasonic velocity, heat of mixing, Tg, and Mooney viscosity of the ENR/EPDM blend system provide clues to the compatibility of rubber blends.
Also, they may improve the degree of compatibility in this blend system through the epoxidation of NR and increase its dispersion in the blend.
From a thermodynamic point of view, it can be concluded that the ENR/EPDM rubber blend is compatible in comparison with the NR/ EPDM blend without epoxidation.21 One can see from these results that the epoxidation of NR forms epoxy groups.
These active sites24 are able to improve the degree of compatibility in the ENR/EPDM blend system with respect to the unmodiﬁed system.
All the samples prepared in this study were found to be optically clear unlike the higher molecular weight poly (propylene glycol) -2000 (PPG-2000) system which required a minimum salt concentration to compatibilize a specific amount of PMMA with PPG.
The mechanisms by which the salt holds the otherwise incompatible polymers together in a single phase have been investigated by FT-IR.
0 1992 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. Keywords: poly (propylene glycol) poly (methyl methacrylate) LiCF3S03 compatibility INTRODUCTION The unique property of polyethers especially poly ( ethylene oxide ) and poly ( propylene oxide ) in solvating ion charge carriers (alkali metal salts) has and is being thoroughly studied during the development of solid polymer electrolytes.
The scope of the work described in this article has been to develop transparent blends of PPG/ PMMA with a wider window of compatibility for the above mentioned application.
The interactions of the salt with the polymer pair responsible for compatibilization has also been investigated by Fourner transform-infrared spectroscopy ( FT-IR) .
The detector was connected to an IBM compatible microcomputer for data acquisition.
These results were different from those observed for PPG-2000 system which required an O/M ratio of 18 for obtaining a transparent blend of 4% PMMA in PPG and this ratio decreased with increasing PMMA content indicating more salt was needed to compatibilize the ~ystem.
'~ The effect of IONIC CONDUCTIVITY AND COMPATIBILITY 2027 the molecular weight of the components on the "window of compatibility" is known from the literature for polymer blends such as poly (ethylene oxide) /PMMA.14 The wider window of compatibility observed with this system allowed us to carry out a more detailed study in order to understand these systems.
The fact that the polymer blend remains transparent in the presence of LiCF3S03 and that the salt need not be added to the system prior to the polymerization but has the same effect even when added to the cloudy polymer blend,13 clearly indicates that the salt plays an important role in compatibilizing the polymers.
It is expected that the lithium cations could be weakly interacting with the ester groups of PMMA as well resulting in the compatibilization of the blend.
The interactions of the salt with the polymer pair is thus presumed to be one of the reasons for compatibilization of the blend.
The PMMA/PPG-425/LiCF3S03 system exhibited a much wider window of compatibility than the PMMA/PPG-2000/LiCF3S03 system.
The role of the salt in compatibilizing the polymer pair was investigated by FTIR which indicated interactions of the Li complexed to PPG with ester groups of PMMA.
DOI 10.1007/s00289-017-1916-3 O R I G I N A L P A P E R Effect of the ionized carboxyl group on the water compatibility and the antifungal activity of the benzimidazole-grafted polyurethane Yong-Chan Chung2 Jae Won Choi1 • Ha Youn Kim1 • Byoung Chul Chun1 • Received: 6 July 2016 / Revised: 18 December 2016 / Accepted: 17 January 2017 Ó Springer-Verlag Berlin Heidelberg 2017 of (PU) series containing polyurethane Abstract Two 2,2-bis(hydroxymethyl)propanoic acid (DMPA) and the grafted benzimidazole (BI) were prepared to compare their antifungal activities.
In this study, DMPA was included in PU to improve the water compatibility of PU and the DMPA carboxyl group was ionized to carboxylate form using a strong base or a weak base.
The degree of carboxyl group ionization will decide the water compatibility and the antifungal activity because the close contact between the grafted BI on PU and the fungi decides the antifungal activity and the grafted BI content is ﬁxed for all of the PUs.
Therefore, the effect of the DMPA carboxyl group ionization on water compatibility, thermal and physical properties (tensile strength and shape recovery), and the antifungal activity of the PUs will be mainly investigated.
 Structure of unmodiﬁed PU (L), b grafting of BI onto water-compatible PU and ionization, c chemical cross-linking with MDI-3, and d deprotonation of water-compatible PU using strong base (NaOH) or weak base (Et3N) 123  Polym.
The DMPA that was incorporated into PU in the previous study to increase the water compatibility of PU decreased the tensile properties if its content increased too high.
Therefore, the DMPA was ionized in this investigation to maximize the water compatibility at lower DMPA content considering the optimal thermal, mechanical, and antifungal properties.
The water compatibilities of PU surfaces after deprotonation were compared by the water contact angle results of two PU series (Fig.
Interestingly, the contact angles of BT series are not signiﬁcantly different from that of L. Therefore, the deprotonation of DMPA carboxyl group by a strong base such as NaOH can increase the water compatibility of the PU surface but the deprotonation by a weak base such as triethylamine is not effective as much.
However, the fungal growth of BN125 is more clearly controlled than BN75 (compare BN125 and BN75) due to better water compatibility of BN125 as shown in the contact angle results in Fig.
The antifungal test results demonstrated that the complete ionization of DMPA carboxyl group played an important role in controlling the fungal growth at the same BI content, suggesting that the water compatibility of PU surface was required for the close contact between the grafted BI and the fungi to exhibit full antifungal activity.
Conclusions Two PU series containing the DMPA as chain extender and water compatibilizer and the BI as antifungal agent, one with fully ionized DMPA carboxyl group (BN series) and the second with partly ionized DMPA carboxyl group (BT series), were compared with the unmodiﬁed PU (L) to examine their antifungal activities.
The BI content was ﬁxed, and the ionized DMPA content was increased to improve the PU water compatibility that was analyzed using the water contact angle measurement.
The BN series exhibited higher antifungal activity than the BT series due to the fully ionized DMPA carboxyl group and the resulting better water compatibility.
Chung YC, Kim HY, Choi JW, Chun BC (2015) Preparation of water-compatible antifungal polyurethane with grafted benzimidazole as the antifungal agent.
Polymer compatibility enhancement via ion-ion and ion-dipole interactions: Ternary blends of polyurethane, poly(vinyl chloride) and poly(styrene-co-maleic anhydride) Hasan A. Al-Salah Polymer Science and Technology Research Laboratory, Chemistry Department, Mu’tah University, Mu’tah, Jordan Received: 14 December 1997/Accepted: 3 February 1998 Summary Ternary polymer blends (TPB) based on polyurethane (PU) containing tertiary amine, poly(vinyl chloride) (PVC), and poly(styrene-co-maleic anhydride) (SMA) containing 6.25% maleic acid were prepared via solution technique.
The amorphous phase of PVA is at least partially compatible with both the disordered hard and the soft domains of the ionomers.
Hourston et al 30 discussed the compatibility of the ternary blends of PVC, PU, and Hytrel.
It is evident that the TPBs were at least significantly compatible as they exhibited only one major Tg whose position on the temperature scale changes with composition.
Recently, in a study on compatible polystyrene-poly(vinylmethyl ether) linear blends, Kwei et al.
European Polymer Journal 37 (2001) 241–246 Compatibility and mechanical properties of polyamide-6/ polystyrene/diblock poly(styrene-b-ethylene oxide) copolymer blends Tian-Ying Guo *, Mou-Dao Song, Guang-Jie Hao, Bang-Hua Zhang The State Key Laboratory of Functional Polymer Materials for Adsorption and Separation, Institute of Polymer Chemistry, Nankai University, Tianjin 300071, People’s Republic of China Received 16 December 1999; received in revised form 18 April 2000; accepted 12 May 2000
Abstract Dynamic mechanical studies indicate that poly(styrene-b-ethylene oxide) (SbEO) diblock copolymer can be utilized to achieve compatibility in blends of incompatible polymer pairs, polyamide-6/polystyrene (PA6/PS).
This problem can be alleviated by the addition of suitable compatibilizers or interfacial active agents.
The use of such compatibilizers ensures optimum bonding at the interface and thus improves the mechanical performance of the blends.
anhydride) PA6 (40/60 wt/wt) blends compatibilized by poly(styrene-co-maleic (SMA), poly(styrene-coacrylonitrile) (SAN) and poly(styrene-b-ethylene-cobutylene)-b-styrene) (SEBS) [3].
studied PS/PA6 blends with poly(styrene-g-ethylene oxide) (SEO) as the compatibilizer [4], and the elongation at break and impact strength of the blends PS/PA6 (50/50 wt/wt) was increased obviously.
According to the dierences in composition between the block chains and the homopolymer molecular chains with which they are blended, the diblock copolymers used as compatibilizers can be divided into A–B, A–C and C–D types.
In this work, well-deﬁned diblock copolymers (SbEO) with PS and PEO chains were used as compatibilizing additives in PA6/PS blends.
This demonstrates that SbEO macromolecules migrate to the interface between the two phases of PA6/PS blends, and enhance the interaction between the two incompatible phases.
Although an investigation of the inﬂuences of the molecular weight of diblock copolymer on compatibilizing eects has been reported [20], there is no deﬁnite conclusion because the inﬂuential factors are very complicated.
The compatibilizing eect is also inﬂuenced by the conﬁguration and sequential distribution of dierent structural units in the compatibilizer molecules [21].
Therefore, there is an insu(cid:129)cient amount of SbEO copolymer at the interface between PA6 and PS, to act as the compatibilizer.
Thus, the compatibilizing eect of the additive in the blends is improved.
The uncompatibilized blend, seen in Fig.
The compatibilizing e(cid:129)cacy of SbEO copolymer is dependent on the actual amount of the compatibilizers in the boundary region of PA6/PS blends.
The molecular structure of SbEO has an important inﬂuence on its e(cid:129)cacy in compatibilizing PA6/PS blends.
When the molecular weight is appropriate ((cid:25)1 (cid:2) 105) and ethylene oxide block length in SbEO is more than that of styrene, the compatibilization is more e(cid:129)cient for PA6/PS (80/ 20) blends.
Abstract Blends of polyamide-6 (PA-6) and high-density polyethylene (HDPE) with blend ratios of 80/20 (wt/wt) and 20/80 (wt/wt) were studied using zincneutralized maleic anhydride (MAH) grafted HDPE as compatibilizers.
MAH groups were hydrolyzed and neutralized with different amounts of zinc acetate dihydrate in a twin-screw extruder to produce different levels of zinc-neutralization (0, 14, 41, 69, and 95 %) at one and ten parts per hundred of resin of compatibilizer.
SEM micrographs showed a large reduction in the dispersed phase size in the compatibilized blends.
Tensile measurements showed improvement of tensile strength for all compatibilized blends; moreover, the elongation at break of compatibilized blends at 10 phr of compatibilizer was improved.
A signiﬁcant increase in melt viscosity of the compatibilizer was found with zinc addition and adding compatibilizer increased the viscosity of the blends.
However, the addition of zinc to the compatibilizer did not change the viscosity in the PA-6-rich blends and actually led to a decrease in viscosity in the HDPE-rich blends.
The properties of immiscible blends can be enhanced by adding a third termed a compatibilizer.
Frequently, polymeric materials based on derivatives of carboxylic acid groups are used as compatibilizers.
In this case, compatibility of the blend is achieved by interactions of the carboxylic acid and the active functional group of one or both of the polymers.
These compatibilizers promote reactions between amine groups (terminal –NH2 or –RNH) of PA-6 with carboxylic acid functional groups and/or interactions between carboxylic acid groups and these polyamide functional groups [3, 4, 18–20].
Ionomers are a particularly attractive way of compatibilizing polyamide and polyethylene because the amide functional groups in the former can interact with the ionomer via hydrogen bonding (H-bonding), ion–dipole interaction, or/and metal ion coordination during melt blending.
The aim of this study was to study the effect of zinc-neutralization of hydrolyzed anhydride acid groups in MAH grafted HDPE (MAH-gHDPE) with respect to the efﬁciency of compatibilization.
The levels of compatibilizer used in these studies were 1 and 10 part per hundred of resin (phr).
Crystallinity for each polymer component of the compatibilized blends was determined from knowledge of the ratio of the melting enthalpy for 100 % crystallinity of pure components.
PA-6/HDPE blends with MAH-gHDPE Morphology of blends Figures 3 and 4 show SEM micrographs of both PA-6/HDPE 80/20 (PA-6-rich blend) and PA-6/HDPE 20/80 (HDPE-rich blend), respectively, with various MAHgHDPEs as compatibilizers.
Without compatibilizers (Fig.
All the compatibilized blends showed dramatic decreases in dispersed phase sizes.
Figure 5a, b shows the number average of dispersed phase size of minor phase of both PA-6-rich blends and HDPE-rich blends with different zinc-neutralization level MAH-gHDPE as compatibilizers.
At a level of 1 phr, 14 and 41 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE compatibilizer caused a larger reduction in dispersed phase size as opposed to the unneutralized compatibilizer for both blend compositions with a higher reduction for the HDPE-rich blend.
When 10 phr of 0, 14, and 41 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE compatibilizer was added, Table 1 DSC experiment data for MAH-gHDPE and their zincneutralized MAH-gHDPE Zinc-neutralization (%) MAH-gHDPE 0 14 41 69 95 Tm (°C) Tc (°C) vc,i (%) 129.94 132.54 134.21 130.02 130.62 116.27 114.60 110.27 111.39 111.31 58.40 56.01 47.94 48.88 47.92 123  300 Polym.
a Uncompatibilized, 1 phr of b 0 %, d 14 %, f 41 %, and h 95 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE, and 10 phr of c 0 %, e 14 %, g 41 %, and i 95 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE 123  Polym.
a Uncompatibilized, 1 phr of b 0 %, d 14 %, f 41 %, and h 95 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE, and 10 phr of c 0 %, e 14 %, g 41 %, and i 95 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE 123  302 Polym.
5 Number average particle diameter of dispersion phase size for a PA-6-rich blend and b HDPErich blend with different compatibilizers (W/O blends without compatibilizer) there was a further reduction in phase size of the minor phase, but at 10 phr the unneutralized material yielded the smallest dispersed phase.
For both the PA-6and the HDPE-rich blend with 95 % zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE, the dispersed phase size was larger than blends made with unneutralized MAH-gHDPE compatibilizer.
These observations are consistent with one theory of compatibilization in these materials, namely, that compatibilization is caused by carboxylic acids reacting with the amine or amide groups of the polyamide with zinc serving as a catalyst.
At 95 % neutralization, there are no carboxylic acid groups present which in turn reduces the compatibilizer effect while at high compatibilizer levels, the catalytic effect is not 123  Polym.
(2013) 70:293–309 303 needed to get sufﬁcient reaction and hence compatibilization is simply driven by the concentration of carboxylic acid groups.
All compatibilized blends show higher tensile strengths than the uncompatibilized blends; however, elongation at breaks was only higher for the 10 phr samples.
Other striking results show signiﬁcant increases in elongation at break at 10 phr added compatibilizer versus 1 phr added compatibilizer, which is consistent with the reduction in phase size.
At 95 % neutralization, there is a reduction in elongation as opposed to blends compatibilized with partially neutralized materials, which is consistent with the changes in dispersed phase size.
Another observation is that the tensile strength drops for the PA-6-rich blend made with compatibilizer having 69 and 95 % zinc neutralization, while such an effect is not apparent for the HDPE-rich blend.
Tensile moduli are basically unaffected by the addition of compatibilizer.
Melting temperature (Tm) for the HDPE component clearly increases when blended with the polyamide for the HDPE-rich blend, the increase is about 2 °C and does not depend on whether a compatibilizer is present.
At 10 phr compatibilizer at the crystallization temperature could not reliably be determined.
The increases ranged from 2 to 4 °C for the compatibilized blends, with no clear dependence on compatibilizer type or level.
The highest crystallization temperature was found for the uncompatibilized PA-6-rich blend, an increase of nearly 5 °C.
These increases are clear evidence of nucleation by the polyethylene for the reduction upon compatibilization is likely due to reduced chain diffusion caused by interfacial reactions [9, 15, 28].
In this case, the PA-6-rich blend with no compatibilizer had the smallest increase in Tc.
The higher compatibilizer level showed a smaller crystallinity, with no consistent effect of neutralization level on the crystallinity.
A decrease in crystallinity upon introduction of compatibilizer would be consistent with a grafting reaction between the PA-6 and the ionomer.
The increase in polyethylene crystallinity as compared to unblended HDPE in the PA-6-rich blend was signiﬁcant the 10 phr material with no change at 1 phr compatibilizer.
Uncompatibilized material had the smallest HDPE fractional crystallinity with a value 4 % smaller than the pure HDPE.
6 Tensile properties for PA-6-rich blend and HDPE-rich blend with different compatibilizers (W/O blends without compatibilizer) PA-6 had a high variability meaning that no conclusions could be made, while the HDPE fractional crystallinity was unaffected by blending.
DMA of blends DMA spectra of PA-6/HDPE blends with MAH-gHDPE and 95 % zinc-neutralization of MAH-gHDPE compatibilizers are presented in Fig.
The apparent shear viscosity of PA-6-rich blend without compatibilizer was almost the same as that of pure PA-6.
However, the apparent shear viscosity in the PA-6-rich blend with MAH-gHDPE compatibilizer increased proportionally to the amount of MAH-gHDPE compatibilizer which we attribute to the formation of covalent bonds between amine or amide groups in PA-6 and carboxylic acids in MAH-gHDPE.
Surprisingly, the melt viscosity increase at a given compatibilizer level did not depend on the neutralization level.
7 DMA spectra showing storage (E0) and loss (E00) modulus for a, b PA-6-rich blend and c, d HDPE-rich blend with compatibilizers 95 % neutralization, we expected to see a smaller viscosity versus that at lower neutralization levels due to less covalent bond formation as evidenced by poorer mechanical and larger dispersed phase sizes, but no change in viscosity was found.
An increase in viscosity with an increase in compatibilizer level was found for the HDPE-rich blend as well; however, the viscosity decreased as the neutralization level increased as opposed to staying constant in the PA-6-rich blends.
Note that this behavior is exact opposite of the viscosities of the pure compatibilizer, where an increase in neutralization leads to an increase in melt viscosity.
A number of possibilities could explain this inconsistency; for example, changes in miscibility of the compatibilizer with the HDPE upon neutralization, or a change in interface partitioning with neutralization.
a Neat PA-6, HDPE, and PA-6/HDPE: 80/20 (PA-6-rich blend) both within and without MAH-gHDPE, b neat HDPE and PA-6/HDPE: 20/80 (HDPE-rich blend) both with and without MAH-gHDPE, PA-6 rich blend with c 1 phr and e 10 phr zincneutralized MAH-gHDPE, HDPE-rich blend with d 1 phr and f 10 phr zinc-neutralized MAH-gHDPE Dispersed phase sizes decreased with added compatibilizer, with 10 phr compatibilizer showing much smaller dispersed phase sizes than 1 phr compatibilizer.
Compatibilization improved the mechanical properties, and the improvement at 10 phr compatibilizer for elongation at break was much more dramatic versus 1 phr compatibilizer.
Melt viscosity results showed that level increased the melt viscosity of the high PA-6 content blend signiﬁcantly; consistent with the conclusion that covalent bonding between the PA-6 and the compatibilizer increased compatibilizer 123  308 Polym.
The neutralization level behavior was unexpected in the PA-6-rich blend and did not affect the melt viscosity, while in the HDPE-rich blend the viscosity decreased as the neutralization level increased even though pure compatibilizer showed the opposite trend.
Overall, the addition of zinc did have some effect on the compatibilization capabilities of the MAH grafted material; which was the same conclusion reached when zinc oxide rather than zinc acetate dihydrate was used to neutralize the compatibilizer [28].
Wills JM, Favis BD (1988) Processing–morphology relationship of compatibilized polyoleﬁn/polyamide blends.
Part 1: the effect of an ionomer compatibilized on blend morphology.
Filippi S, Chiono V, Polacco G, Paci M, Minkova LI, Magagnini P (2002) Reactive compatibilizer precursors for LDPE/PA6 blends, 1 ethylene/acrylic acid copolymers.
Qiu W, Mai K, Fang K, Li Z, Zeng H (1999) Morphology and thermal behavior of PA1010/LLDPE blends using PE-g-AA as a compatibilizer.
Chandramouli K, Jabarin SA (1995) Morphology and property relationships in ternary blends of polyethylene/polyamide-6/compatibilizing agents.
Guruprasad R, Chanda M (1999) Solution Grafting of maleic anhydride onto polyethylene and compatibilization of polyethylene-nylon blends.
Jiang C, Filippi S, Magagnini P (2003) Reactive compatibilizer precursors for LDPE/PA6 blends.
Yao Z, Yin Z, Sun G, Liu C, Tong J, Ren L, Yin J (2000) Morphology, thermal behavior, and mechanical properties of PA6/UHMWPE blends with HDPE-g-MAH as a compatibilizing agent.
Kudva RA, Keskkula H, Paul DR (1999) Morphology and mechanical properties of compatibilized nylon 6/polyethylene blends.
Chatreenuwat B, Nithitanakul M, Grady BP (2007) The effect of zinc oxide addition on the compatibilization efﬁciency of maleic anhydride grafted high-density polyethylene compatibilizer for high-density polyethylene/polyamide 6 blends.
Conclusions: In porcine coronary arteries the SYNERGY stent, and its biodegradable polymer at 3x safety margin, demonstrated vascular compatibility similar to bare metal stent controls.
Polymer International 34 (1994) 417-424 Microstructure and Compatibility of PVDF/PS Blends in the Presence of PVA C. del Rio & J. L. Acosta* Instituto de Ciencia y Tecnologia de Polimeros (CSIC), c/Juan de la Cierva, 3 28006 Madrid, Spain (Received 6 December 1993; revised version received 8 February 1994; accepted 3 March 1994) Abstract: This research refers to a compatibility study of binary and ternary PVDF blends with PS and PVA by means of the determination of the polymerpolymer interaction parameter x , 2 .
'V2 One inconvenience, however, in the obtention of monophasic systems from this polymer is its incompatibility with most conventional polymers.
Thus a great number of research programs have attempted to compatibilize certain blends by means of more or less conventional mechanism^.^ One of the presently most widely used of such mechanisms consists of adding a third polymer to the blend to trigger specific interactions with one or the other of the two blend components, thus achieving system compatibilization.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Flory-Huggins interaction parameter One of the routes to study the compatibility of two polymers is based on the interpretation of the FloryHuggins polymer-polymer interaction parameter z1 , by means of melting point depression analysis of the crystalline polymer in the blend.
A large positive xI indicates unfavourable interaction and high molecular weight polymer mixtures are incompatible.
polymer compatibility.
Table 3 proves the PVDF/PS interaction parameter to be positive, (x12 = 0.021), corresponding to the acknowledged incompatible nature of the Regarding the system PVDF/PVA, addition of the amorphous polymer PVA causes the PVDF melting point to decrease at high PVA concentrations.
The fact that G decreases inversely proportionate to PVA content is indicative of compatibility between the two polymers in the molten state.
In the case of the incompatible system PVDF/PS, the nucleation factor decreases drastically with increasing PS concentration.
For the compatible system PVDF/PVA, k, also diminishes with greater PVA portions, although the k, values for this latter system are considerably higher than those of PVDF/PS.
The degree of compatibility of blends was characterized by the use of the parameter Ab, as derived by Krigbaum and Wall.
If one considers the use of PET powder as a filler in the PVC / PET composite system, the incompatibility of the components prevents the system from having satisfactory mechanical properties.
50, 1747-1752 (1993) 0 1993 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. CCC 0021-8995/93/101747-06 faces, interfaces, and/or interphases to enhance compatibility in order to produce better composite systems, which may help to decrease the waste PETPVC problems in the environment.
~ In this study, low temperature plasma was used to influence and modify interfaces to increase the degree of compatibility.
A viscometric method has been used by several author^^-^ to study the interaction of polymers in solution and, hence, to characterize polymer blends for their compatibility.
tems with incompatible polymers, while positive values refer to the attractive interactions and compatibility?
Considering the higher Tg of PVC, an increase in the Tg of MPET is expected if more PVC molecules are thought to be forced to enter the MPET regions, (i.e., an increase in compatibility).
So “Plasma Glow Discharge” could be a method to increase the compatibility between immiscible polymers.
Thus, a simple viscometric technique is useful in studying polymer compatibility as a measure of solid state compatibility.
Box 9192, 13083-970 Campinas, S~ao Paulo, Brazil bS Supporting Information ABSTRACT: Successful blending of diﬀerent polymers to make a structural or functional material requires overcoming limitations due to immiscibility and/or incompatibility that arise from large polymer polymer interfacial tensions.
’ INTRODUCTION Miscibility and compatibility are essential issues in the development of polymer blends since they determine the blend ﬁnal properties.
Moreover, high interfacial tension leads to low interfacial area, low domain adhesion, and ﬁnally poor mechanical properties.1 Many eﬀorts have been done to overcome compatibility problems in polymer blends since these are very attractive for making new materials.2 Several blending strategies were developed based on the control of chemical and physical interactions between blend components.3 7 Latex blends are especially interesting because the interfacial properties can be controlled in many diﬀerent ways, depending on the dispersant and stabilizers used in the blended latex dispersions.
This behavior is not often observed in immiscible polymer blends, and it suggests high compatibility between the two polymer phases.
The electric potential differences between the phases allow us to conclude that this unexpected phase compatibility and the 15203dx.doi.org/10.1021/la2029998|Langmuir2011,27,15199–15205LangmuirARTICLE Figure 5.
The diﬀerence in electric charge excess between coexisting phases in a polymer material provides an additional attractive force between domains, which reduces the interfacial tension, increases compatibility, and improves the bulk mechanical properties.
The compatibility of the blends is studied by viscometry and Fourier transform IR.
This compatibility is believed to play a key role in the good pervaporation behavior of CA/PVB blend membranes.
However, most polymer–polymer blends are immiscible thermodynamically or conditionally compatible.3 As is well known, cellulose acetate (CA) is one of the most important materials for membranes; poly(vinyl butyral) (PVB) is an alcohol-soluble polymer that is also used as a membrane material.12 In the present study a trial was made to prepare a new CA/PVB blend system, examine their compatibility, and investigate the pervaporation behavior of their membranes for a methanol/methyl tert-butyl ether (MTBE) mixture, which is an important system for separation in industry.
A positive deviation is demonstrated at the lower weight fraction region of PVB (WPVB ⬍ 0.4), which reﬂects the expanding of both coil dimensions of CA and PVB because of strong intermolecular interaction or compatibility between them; negative deviation is displayed at the higher weight fraction region of PVB (WPVB ⬎ 0.4), which means the shrinking of both coil dimensions of CA and PVB that is due to incompatibility between them.21–28 In other words, low [␩] values of the blends are connected with a low degree of overlapping of unlike polymer molecules, indicating that repulsive interactions between the two polymers prevail over attractive interactions.
Figure 2 FTIR spectra in the carbonyl absorption region for CA/PVB blends with WPVB 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, 0.6, 0.7, and 1.0. pole interactions and result in the compatibility of polymer blends.
Therefore, the negative additive law of the permeate ﬂux of the blend membrane with lower WPVB is assigned to the strong intermolecular interaction or compatibility between CA and PVB molecules in the CA/PVB blends with lower WPVB.
By contrast, the positive additive law of the permeate ﬂux of the blend membrane with higher WPVB is due to the lack of intermolecular interaction or incompatibility between CA and PVB molecules in the CA/PVB blends with higher WPVB, which results in the dissolving of the PVB component in the CA/PVB blend membranes in methanol (negative DS, Fig.
The CA/PVB blends with a lower weight fraction of PVB (WPVB ⬍ 0.4) are compatible according to the [␩] and FTIR of the blends.
The high separation and low permeate ﬂuxes of the CA/PVB blend membrane for the methanol/MTBE mixture are related to the compatibility of the CA/PVB blends and vice versa for the incompatibility of the CA/PVB blends.
The compatibility of CA/PVB is favorable to resistance to methanol for PVB because of the intermolecular interaction between CA and PVB molecules.
These results suggest that even when considering MOFs surfaces with drastically diﬀerent morphologies, ﬁnding a highly compatible MOF/polymer pair for rigid polymers remains challenging.
These parameters are analyzed together to predict the degree of MOF/polymer compatibility.
This scenario of non-optimal MOF/polymer compatibility[8] was also observed for other MOF/rigid polymer systems, such as Adv.
[9] This correlation between good experimentally measured mechanical properties and the absence of microvoids/presence of strong intermolecular interactions at the MOF/polymer interface in our simulations, further validates the reliability of our computational approach to predict MOF/polymer compatibility.
Such an ideal MOF/polymer pair is yet to be found, and this motivated the work undertaken in this contribution to assess the compatibility between a series of MOFs with distinct surface morphologies and a model rigid polymer.
Our simulations revealed that the polymer partially penetrates the ﬁrst pore layer in the ftw-MOF-BPTC-based composite, a microscopic scenario that would make this composite attractive in terms of the compatibility between the two components at a ﬁrst glance.
These results suggest that overall none of the MOF/polymer pairs studied exhibits an optimal MOF/polymer compatibility, and thus ﬁnding a highly compatible MOF/polymer pair when a rigid polymer is considered remains highly challenging.
Polymer penetration was previously observed for other MOF/polymer pairs, such as UiO66/PVDF and UiO-66/PEG,[4,6] and was one of the structural features that was used to provide a microscopic explanation of why these pairs formed highly compatible composites.
Even though the visual inspection analysis may lead us to believe that the ftw-MOF-BPTC–based composite is the best candidate out of the three studied in terms of the MOF/polymer compatibility, further more quantitative analyses are required to provide further insight.
Conclusion applied a recently derived methodology to model We MOF/polymer interfaces in order to predict the degree of MOF/polymer compatibility in three composites that have in common 6-FDA-DAM as the polymer and diﬀer in the ultra-microporous MOF (ftw-MOF-ABTC, ftw-MOF-BPTC, and Adv.
Based on the analysis of the microscopic scale structure features of the interfaces, we predict that the MOF/polymer compatibility will not be optimal for any of the three MOF/polymer pairs studied.
This systematic computational exploration of the interfaces formed by the same rigid polymer and distinct MOFs paves the way toward a rationalized choice of the most compatible MOF/polymer pair prior to the synthesis and characterization of the composites.
The inﬂuence of the MOF surface morphology/chemistry on the compatibility of binary composites including non-rigid polymers will be the subject of further studies.
Keywords atomistic models, mixed matrix membranes, MOF/polymer compatibility, MOF/polymer interfaces, molecular dynamics Received: June 14, 2019 Revised: July 30, 2019 Published online: The model for the interface was built by combining the MOF surfaces and polymer after a preliminary equilibration of the pure polymer.
The compatibility of the bioblends was studied by different methods, such as Fourier transform infrared and Raman spectroscopy, micro-Raman imaging, thermogravimetric analyses, differential scanning calorimetry and scanning electron microscopic analysis.
Speciﬁc interactions between carbonyl and methyl groups of the PMMAco-BMA structure and methyl, amine and amide groups of chitosan are responsible for the observed compatibility.
Polymer blends containing at least one biodegradable polymer component are referred to as bioblends[6], which have properties of the natural component (good mechanical properties, easy processability, low production and transformation costs and biocompatibility), typical for biopolymers[7].The polymeric bioblends have been used as matrices for delivery systems[8], membranes[9] and materials for agriculture[10].
The ﬁnal properties of the polymer blends depend on the properties of their components, the composition and especially the compatibility of polymers; for most polymer blends is caused by speciﬁc interactions[11], such as dipole-dipole, ion-dipole and hydrogen bonding interactions[12].
The compatibility of the bioblends has been investigated by means of Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, Raman spectroscopy, micro-Raman imaging, thermogravimetric analyses, differential scanning calorimetry and scanning electron microscopic analysis, in order to evaluate the compatibility as well as the supramolecular interactions between these two polymers.
However, if the polymers are compatible, interactions in the blends will result in clear differences in the spectra[22].
Previous similar works investigating a polymer with a chemical structure analogous to PMMAco-BMA by means of Raman spectroscopy, have also showed a relationship between the formation of hydrogen bonds and the compatibility of the polymers[28,33].
It can be observed in Figure 3 the presence of both bands in all the analyzed polymeric surfaces; this result indicates the homogeneity in the polymeric bioblend, which is related to its compatibility between the polymers[39].
Differential Scanning Calorimetry According to literature, a polymeric blend can be considered compatible, only if a new Tg (glass transition temperature) can be observed between the original Tgs of the components.
On the other hand, they are partially compatible only if the resulting blends would have two Tgs related to each component, but with different values when compared to the pure polymers[43].
The results obtained through DSC strongly suggest a compatibility between the polymers, which is probably due to the existence of intermolecular interactions between the individual polymers[46].
The DSC curves corresponding to pure polymers present a single change in slope at 37C for the chitosan and Scanning Electron Microscopic Analysis Scanning electron microscopic analysis is a common qualitative technique for visual identiﬁcation and estimation of bioblend compatibility[47].
This last comment also strongly suggest a good compatibility between the two polymers, which is in a good agreement with literature[48].
CONCLUSIONS of The compatibility chitosan=PMMA-co-BMA bioblends has been studied by methods such as infrared and Raman spectroscopy, micro-Raman imaging, thermogravimetric analyses, differential scanning calorimetry and scanning electron microscopic analysis.
Through the spectroscopic analysis of the polymer bioblends it was found that the compatibility of these materials is due to speciﬁc supramolecular involving the carbonyl and methyl groups of PMMA-co-BMA and the methyl, amide and amine groups of chitosan.
DSC conﬁrmed that the compatibility of the bioblends due to presence of only one glass transition temperature.
The present results show that the production of new polymer bioblends obtained from a natural and a synthetic polymer in different concentrations originate new properties, such as mechanical properties, which are closely related to the degree of compatibility between the individual polymers.
Parashar, P.; Ramakrishna, K.; Ramaprasad A.T. A study on compatibility of polymer blends of polystyrene=poly(4-vinylpyridine).
Structure and properties of PPO=PP blends compatibilized by triblock copolymer SEBS and SEPS.
Permeability and blood compatibility properties of chitosan-poly(ethylene oxide) blend membranes for haemodialysis.
Poly (acrylic acid) and poly (sodium styrenesulfonate) compatibility by Fourier transform infrared and differential scanning calorimetry.
Compatibility Studies on Blends of Poly(ethy1ene Ortho-phthalate) and Poly(viny1 Acetate) H. VAZQUEZ-TORRES and C. A. CRUZ-RAMOS, Applied Chemistry Department, Centro de Investigacibn Cientifica de Yucathn A.C., Apartado Postal 87 Cordemex, M&ridu, Yucathn, Mkico 9731 0 Synopsis Blends of poldethylene ortho-phthalate) (PEOP), and poly(viny1 acetate) (PVAc), appear to be compatible at all compositions, from visual examination at room temperature and differential scanning calorimetry tests.
It is suggested that compatibility is produced because of possible specific interactions between the aromatic group of PEOP and the ester carbonyl on PVAc, which is not sterically hindered as is the corresponding moiety on PMMA.
INTRODUCTION The search for compatible polymer alloys continues to be one of the most important activities within the field of polymer blends.
Undoubtedly, one of the main attractions in this area is the potential accessibility to a wide variety of properties which can be tailored from the simple physical combination of two compatible polymeric components.
It has been found that an exothermic heat of mixing of the analogs usually implies a high degree of compatibility between the polymers.9 Flory, Simha, and 0the1-s.~~~ Following this line of thought, reports in the literature,8-11 show that the presence of a carbonyl moiety on one polymer, coupled with the presence of a phenyl ring on the other is a favorable situation for compatibility.9 Thus, the prediction of likely candidates to form compatible polymer alloys Journal of Applied Polymer Science, Vol.
Drawing conclusions about the compatibilty of two polymers from statistical thermodynamical methods such as Flory’s new equation of state4 is a highly complex task requiring both sophisticated calculations l9 and accurate experimental information, which sometimes is incomplete or totally unavailable.
Thus, as pointed out by Somani and Shaw, Flory’s equation of state requires, for compatibility between two polymers: (i) If the characteristic temperatures for the poly  COMPATIBILITY STUDIES ON BLENDS 6103 mers are such that T I * > Tz., the relation between the corresponding characteristic pressures must be P*, > Pt2, and (ii) the absolute value of the difference between T*, and T*z must not exceed 200°K.
Thus, incompatible systems should come out of these mixtures, which is in agreement with our experiments.
It is evident that these results are only approximate but, at the same time, show that it seems feasible to make an a priori qualitative assessment of compatibility, following the simple method used by Somani and Shaw.
It has been observed that carbonyl-containing low molecular-weight compounds, such as ketones and esters, show exothermic behavior when mixed with a number of phenyl or phenylene derivatives, similar to the PEOP repeat unit.26 Hence, a specific interaction between the carbonyl group of one polymer, and the phenylene ring of the other, has been suggested to be a determinant factor for compatibility in a number of polymers.” Although both PVAc and PMMA have carbonyl groups, it is apparent that the possible positive inductive effect from the methyl group forming A P I H ,’ PVA c \ PMMA Fig.
It is found that the heat capacity of SBR, assumed to be a compatible system, with melt-state temperatures can be estimated by the following equation, that is, the additive rule of segment-number frac CpC SBR) = ( Z P S / ~ ) Cp( PS) + (~BFtP)Cp(BR) ( 7 ) z = ZpS + Z B R where, Zi is segment number of component i.
For SBS, an incompatible system, the heat capacities can be fitted more suitably by the following equation (Fig.
( 8 ) Thus, from Figures 2 and 3, the heat capacities of molten SBR (compatible system) and SBS (incompatible system) closely fit eqs.
Effect of the Compatibility on Toughness of InjectionMolded Polypropylene Blended With EPR and SEBS Yushi Matsuda, Masao Hara Technical Research Center, Mazda Motor Corp., Shinchi 3-1, Fuchu-cho, Aki-gun, Hiroshima 730-8670, Japan Tsuyoshi Mano, Kenzo Okamoto, Masaru Ishikawa Department of Polymer Science and Engineering, Faculty of Engineering, Yamagata University, Jonan 4-3-16, Yonezawa, Yamagata 992-8510, Japan The effect of the compatibility between a dispersed phase and a matrix polymer and the annealing on improvement in the toughness of injection-molded isotactic polypropylene (i-PP) blended with elastomers was studied.
In the case that the elastomers are incompatible with the matrix polymer, it is well known that the lower strength elastomer should be able to improve the toughness effectively.
Therefore, the compatibility level, cooling processes, and other conditions affect the morphology of the blend.
The second is to discuss: 1) the effect of the compatibility and annealing on the phase separation behavior of the dispersed phase, and 2) the toughness of the blends based on the toughening mechanism of relaxing the strain constraint.
Two types of copolymer, EPR (JSR, Japan) and SEBS (Asahi Kasei, Osaka, Japan), were used as elastomers in order to control the compatibility to the i-PP.
fractured specimens in order to make evaluations on the compatibility between the elastomer and the i-PP.
Usually, the lower strength of the dispersed phase results in a high efﬁciency of toughness improvement in the case that a matrix polymer and an elastomer are incompatible.
This mechanism is well known to improve in the case that the matrix polymer and elastomer are incompatible.
It was found that EPR(B) and i-PP are compatible in the molten state from observation of Fig.
The craze strength is proportionate to the blend ratio in a compatible blend.
Consequently, the blend is partially compatible, the efﬁciency of toughness improvement is decreased because of the decreased volume fraction of the dispersed phase, the increased strength of the dispersed phase, and the decreased strength of matrix polymer.
Polymer Degradation and Stability 72 (2001) 99±108 www.elsevier.nl/locate/polydegstab On the compatibility of polysaccharide/maleic copolymer blends I.
Thermal behaviour of dextran containing blends Gina-Gabriela Bumbu, Cornelia Vasile *, Gabrielle Charlotte ChitË anu, Adrian Carpov Petru Poni Institute of Macromolecular Chemistry, 41 A Grigore Ghica Voda Alley, Ro 6600 IasË i, Romania Received 9 August 2000; accepted 8 October 2000 Abstract The compatibility of dextran (D) with maleic acid±vinyl acetate copolymer (MAc±VA) in the solid state as a thin ®lm has been studied by coupling thermogravimetry and dierential scanning calorimetry with infrared spectroscopy.
It has been established that blends with a content of dextran higher than 85 wt.% exhibit good compatibility, the morphology of the blends being a homogeneous ®ne particle dispersion, while blends with a prevalent MAc±VA copolymer content exhibit a tendency to phase separation.
This paper deals with a study of the compatibility of dextran/maleic acid±vinyl acetate copolymer blends in the solid state and the eect of intermolecular interactions on the thermal properties.
4), we can not establish the compatibility of the blends on the basis of this criterion, because the dierence between the glass transition temperatures of the partners is too small.
Therefore at least the blends with a high dextran content exhibit a good compatibility according to TG/DTG results, probably due to the interaction of components.
Preparation of Cellulose Graft Copolymers Having Polypeptide Side Chains and Their Blood Compatibility TAKEAKI MIYAMOTO, SHIN-ICHI TAKAHASHI, SIN-ICHI TSUJI, HIRAKU ITO, and HIROSHI INAGAKI, Institute for Chemical Research, Kyoto University, Uji, Kyoto 611, Japan, and YASUHARU NOISHIKI, Institute for Thermal Spring Research, Okayama University, Misasacho, Tohaku-gun, Tottori 682-02, Japan synopsis Blood compatibility of cellulose graft copolymers with poly(y-benzyl-L-glutamate) and poly(N6-2hydroxyethyl-L-glutamine) (Cell-g-PBLG and Cell-g-PHEG) was examined in uiuo blood tests.
Tests for blood compatibility, in uiuo, were made by a method of peripheral vein indwelling suture which was developed by one of the authors.
This paper deals with the preparation and characterization of Cell-gPBLG graft copolymers and their blood compatibility.
Tests for blood compatibility, in UEUO, were made by a method of peripheral vein indwelling multifilament.
Blood Compatibility Tests The test, in uiuo, for blood compatibility was performed according to a method of peripheral vein indwelling multifilament which was developed by one of the authors (Y. N.).1°J7 In this test, a piece of polyester suture coated with a desired polymer was implanted into a jugular and femoral  2306 MIYAMOTO ET AL.
Blood Compatibility The results on the blood compatibility of the graft copolymers with PBLG are shown in Tables V and VI.
It can be seen 'that the graft copolymers examined here have an excellent blood compatibility.
However, the results also indicate that the blood compatibility depends not only on the PBLG content of the graft copolymers but also on the coating conditions of the sample.
Table VI also shows the results on the blood compatibility of Cell-g-PHEG graft copolymers.
It can be seen that these copolymers also exhibited an excellent blood compatibility.
The implantation time in this work was relatively short, i.e., 24 h. To elucidate the biocompatibility of these graft copolymers, it is necessary to In Viuo Results on Blood Compatibility of Cell-g-PBLG and Cell-g-PHEC Graft Copolymer Films Cast from Formic Acid Solutions TABLE VI Sample code Regenerated cellulose Cell -PBLG10 Cell-PBLG-20 Cell-PBLG-30 Cell PHEG10 Cell PHEG-30 a See text for symbols.
Macroscopic views of polyester sutures coated with Cell-g-PBLG graft copolymer (a) and PBLG homopolymer ($1 after inplantation in the jugular vein of dog for 1 day: (a) no thrombus was observed around the suture (S): 03) in this case, the blood compatibility was evaluated as +++.
observe the blood compatibility at various time intervals after implantation.
The Flory-Huggins interaction parameter &, computed using a standard procedure, and also the interaction parameter BZ3 showed that BR and NBR are incompatible in all compositions and that incompatibility increases with nitrile content.
1995 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. INTRODUCTION Inverse gas chromatography technique (IGC) is one method of studying thermodynamic compatibility of polymers.
It was perhaps the first study of thermodynamic compatibility between a plastomer and elastomer, and resulted in interesting findings which prompted us to study an industrially important system comprised of two elastomers: polybutadiene ( BR) and nitrile rubber with different nitrile contents ( 18% and 34% ) , designated NBR-18, and NBR-34 in this paper.
In view of the above, it was thought worthwhile to study compositionally dependent thermodynamic compatibility between BR and NBR by the IGC technique.
The temperature chosen for compatibility studies-was 80"C, i.e., about 150°C above the Tg of either component of the blend.
Thus, Axli values should give a fair indication of compatibility.
The value of Axli increases with the nitrile content, and it may be inferred that the degree of incompatibility increases with the nitrile content of NBR.
Even NBR-18 shows incompatibility with BR, as seen from the 1 Ax I data.
Plot between apparent BZ3 values against corresponding solubility parameter compatibility.
: however, evolved another method for selecting the probe for more accurate evaluation of interaction parameters to interpret compatibility.
It has been suggested by the author that the probe having a solubility parameter nearest to that of the solubility parameter of blend is most appropriate and that the values of X ; a obtained from that probe should be used to interpret thermodynamic compatibility.
In general, the downward deviation in such plots indicates the compatibility in blend components.
Since the values of the interaction parameters are very high, the polybutadiene / NBR blends should be considered incompatible for all compositions of the blend system.
Interaction Parameter Based on Munk’s Analysis Munk has utilized the term “interaction parameter BZ3” to understand the compatibility of the polymer  lb 13 12 11 E .
incompatibility increases with nitrile content as indicated earlier.
CONCLUSION Inverse gas chromatographic studies on thermodynamic compatibility of polybutadiene and nitrile rubber, and computation of Flory-Huggins interaction parameters obtained using the net retention volume of 12 probes having wide ranges of polarity, show a definite trend in incompatibility that increases with the nitrile content of NBR.
It has been extremely useful in troubleshooting production boards and pre-production boards for Electromagnetic compatibility for automotive applications.
Solid State Ionics 147 (2002) 275 – 280 www.elsevier.com/locate/ssi Inf luence of polymer I–polymer II compatibility on conductivity in low-dimensional polymer electrolyte blends F.S.
The compatibility of the blends was studied by FT-IR, Raman spectroscopy, micro-Raman imaging and thermogravimetric analysis.
Graphical Abstract KEYWORDS: Cytotoxicity; Poly(ε-caprolactone); Poly(methyl methacrylate-co-butyl methacrylate); polymer blends; compatibility INTRODUCTION The biocompatibility of synthetic materials is a complex phenomenon, with both material composition and size affecting the ability of the material to induce a cellular response in vivo [1].
Thus, materials that are considered biocompatible at the macro scale may become bioactive and initiate an inflammatory response when present in particles sufficiently small to be internalized by macrophages.
One of the first steps taken to assess the biocompatibility of a material and the feasibility of its usage for biomedical applications is the determination of its cytotoxicity.
Poly (methyl methacrylate) (PMMA) is an acrylate polymer, widely used owing to its excellent physicochemical properties, transparency,weather resistance, easy handling and processing, and low cost, and it is generally regarded as biocompatible [8].Therefore, it has been used for several biomedical applications, including dental fillings, bone cement, drug delivery vehicles, wound healing devices and intraocular lenses [9].
The aim of this study was to prepare and characterize films composed of PCL and PMMA-co-BMA polymer blends and analyze the compatibility and supramolecular interactions between the polymers in the blend, as well as the existence of any cytotoxic effect on bovine fibroblasts.
However, if the polymers form a compatible blend, chemical and/or physical interactions in the blend will result in spectral changes.
Based on the spectroscopic data, we can infer that these two polymers form compatible blends most likely due to intermolecular interaction between the hydrogen atoms of PCL and the carbonyl groups of PMMA-co-BMA.
This result strongly indicates high surface homogeneity in the polymer blends, which is related to the compatibility between the constituent polymers [31].
The increase of the maximum decomposition temperature is also related to the compatibility and existence of intermolecular interactions between the two polymers [33].
The polymer blends at all composition ratios showed no 10   cell toxicity, indicating that the presence of PMMA-co-BMA does not affect the biocompatibility of PCL, which is already known to be non-toxic for the cells.
CONCLUSIONS In this study, we have studied the compatibility of PCL/PMMA-co-BMA blends by FTIR and Raman spectroscopy, micro-Raman imaging, and TG analysis.
Based on the spectroscopic analysis, the compatibility was found to be the result of specific interactions between the carbonyl group of PMMA-co-BMA and the hydrogen atoms present in the polymeric chain of PCL.
Finally, the obtained materials showed no toxicity to bovine fibroblasts, which indicate their biocompatibility and the possibility of their usage in cattle veterinary devices.
Biocompatibility testing of novel starch-based materials with potential application in orthopaedic surgery: a preliminary study.
Sharma, J.; Zhang, X.; Sarker, T.; Yan, X.; Washburn, L.; Qu, H.; Guo, Z.; Kucknoor, A.; Wei, S. Biocompatible electrospun tactic poly(methyl methacrylate) blend fibers.
The influence of the AN content in SAN copolymer upon blend compatibility.
This article was downloaded by: [The University of Manchester Library] On: 20 December 2014, At: 18:39 Publisher: Taylor & Francis Informa Ltd Registered in England and Wales Registered Number: 1072954 Registered office: Mortimer House, 37-41 Mortimer Street, London W1T 3JH, UK Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition Publication details, including instructions for authors and subscription information: http://www.tandfonline.com/loi/tbsp20 Evaluation of functions and tissue compatibility of poly (D,L-lactic-coglycolic acid) seeded with human dermal fibroblasts Won-Sun Yang , Hye-Won Roh , Won Kyu Lee & Gyu Ha Ryu Published online: 02 Apr 2012.
To cite this article: Won-Sun Yang , Hye-Won Roh , Won Kyu Lee & Gyu Ha Ryu (2006) Evaluation of functions and tissue compatibility of poly (D,L-lactic-co-glycolic acid) seeded with human dermal fibroblasts, Journal of Biomaterials Science, Polymer Edition, 17:1-2, 151-162, DOI: 10.1163/156856206774879108 To link to this article: http://dx.doi.org/10.1163/156856206774879108 PLEASE SCROLL DOWN FOR ARTICLE Taylor & Francis makes every effort to ensure the accuracy of all the information (the “Content”) contained in the publications on our platform.
Compatibility in biobased poly(L-lactide)/polyamide binary blends: From melt-state interfacial tensions to (thermo)mechanical properties Amulya Raj,1,2 Kalappa Prashantha ,1,2 Cédric Samuel 1Département Technologie des Polymères et Composites & Ingénierie Mécanique (TPCIM), Ecole Nationale Supérieure Mines Telecom Lille Douai, Institut Mines Telecom Lille Douai (IMT Lille Douai), 941 rue Charles Bourseul, Douai, F-59508, France 2Université de Lille, Lille, F-59000, France Correspondence to: C. Samuel (E-mail: cedric.samuel@imt-lille-douai.fr) 1,2 ABSTRACT: The melt compatibility between poly(L-lactide) (PLA) and polyamides (PAs) with related thermomechanical properties is addressed.
PLA/PA blend morphologies without a compatibilizer are ﬁrst revealed by scanning electron microscopy.
Ductilities, toughnesses, and thermal resistances of PLA/PA blends are evaluated up to 40-wt % PA. Brittle-to-ductile transitions are observed for PA content higher than 30-wt % with the highest ductility for PLA/PA12, in accordance with their enhanced compatibility.
KEYWORDS: biobased polymers; interfacial tension; poly(L-lactide); polymer blends; thermomechanical properties Received 7 May 2019; accepted 31 July 2019 DOI: 10.1002/app.48440 INTRODUCTION Poly(L-lactide) (PLA) is one of the most promising biobased polymers due to its inherent renewability, biodegradability, good transparency, high modulus, and biocompatibility.1–9 These pronounced properties make PLA a potential replacement for many of the engineering polymers.
Several types of PLA/PA blends have been reported in the recent years such as PLA/PA6, PLA/PA6-10, PLA/PA10-10, and PLA/PA11.11–17 Immiscible blends with characteristic matrix/ droplet or cocontinuous morphologies are encountered and various compatibilizers have been successfully employed such as the poly(ethylene-co-octene) elastomer grafted with pendant maleic anhydride moieties, poly(ethylene-co-glycidyl methacrylate-graft-styreneco-acrylonitrile), and epoxide-based compounds.11,17,18 This later Additional Supporting Information may be found in the online version of this article.
2019, DOI: 10.1002/APP.48440  ARTICLE WILEYONLINELIBRARY.COM/APP strategy has been efﬁciently developed on PLA blends with 50 wt % of partly biobased PA6-10 to form an in situ copolymer at the PLA/PA6-10 interface during melt blending in an extrusion process.11 Improved tensile strength, elongation at break, ﬂexural strength, and unnotched impact strength are reported with high concentrations of epoxy compatibilizer (approximately 3 phr).
In particular, high interfacial tensions (γ12) tend to generate weak interfaces and might result in a poor blend with detrimental properties, whereas low γ12 values induce broad interfaces and optimal interfacial adhesion.12 Interfacial tension values for PLA/PA systems in the melt state remain largely unknown and only PLA/PA11 has been recently considered by various authors.13,21,24,29,30 Conﬂicting results are obtained ranging between 0.8 and 5.6 mN/m at 200–220 level of compatibility between PLA and PA11 blends in the melt state, in agreement with solid-state properties.12 However, PLA/PA interfacial tensions need to be reﬁned and extended to various PA grades/types to get reliable information about PLA/PA melt compatibility.
Considering the recent developments of biobased PA with melting/processing to the one of PLAs (in particular PA10-10, PA11, PA10-12, and PA12), signiﬁcant modiﬁcations of the PLA/PA melt compatibility are also probable in PLA/PA associations and interfacial tensions in the melt state could help to select PLA/PA grades for future applications.
C indicating a signiﬁcant temperatures close Hence, in an effort to improve (thermo)mechanical properties of PLA by melt-blending with PA using extrusion technologies, the melt-state compatibility between PLA and (biobased) PA is ﬁrst investigated.
Several PLA/PA blends are prepared (i.e., PLA/ PA10-10, PLA/PA10-12, PLA/PA11, and PLA/PA12) without the use of any compatibilizers.
The dispersion of PA droplets within a PLA matrix (i.e., 20-wt % PA) is addressed by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and interfacial/surface tensions in the melt state are subsequently assessed for these associations to get quantitative analysis of the melt compatibility.
Results are discussed based on various hypotheses with a speciﬁc focus on the PLA/PA compatibility level.
Xc−PLA = ΔHm−PLA −ΔHcc−PLA ΔH0 m × 100 ð5Þ with Xc the degree of crystallinity, ΔHm-PLA the melting enthalpy of PLA, ΔHcc-PLA the cold crystallization enthalpy of PLA during 48440 (3 of 11) J.APPL.POLYM.SCI.2019, DOI: 10.1002/APP.48440  ARTICLE WILEYONLINELIBRARY.COM/APP heating, and ΔHm talline PLA (93 J/g).34 0 the melting enthalpy of fusion for 100% crysRESULTS AND DISCUSSIONS Melt-State Compatibility of PLA/PA Blends The ﬁrst major focus of this study was the investigation of the meltstate compatibility between PLA and various commercially available (biobased) PAs (PA10-10, PA10-12, PA11, and PA12).
Actually, interfacial tension data between PLA and as-selected PA could not be found explicitly in literature and only PLA/PA11 were investigated with some contradictory results.13,21,24,29,30 In this context, interfacial tensions were addressed for further selection of an appropriate PA grade/type and development of highly compatible PLA/PA blends with optimized morphologies/interfaces.13 From previous studies by our group, a rheological method based on the emulsion model for viscoelastic ﬂuids was used to measure the interfacial tension with a precision close to 20%.35,36 Interfacial tension (γ12) can be evaluated from the eq.
Consequently, a clear trend appears in terms of interfacial tension in the melt state and subsequent melt compatibility with the highest compatibility between PLA and PA12.
The compatibility in the melt state could also be approached by a careful evaluation of the surface tension of neat polymers with indirect correlations to their interfacial tension.36 Surface tensions were subsequently evaluated by the pendant drop technique in N2 and pendant drop proﬁles are displayed in Figure 3.
The clear correlation with previous interfacial tensions conﬁrms the enhanced compatibility between PLA and PA12 in the melt state.
This obvious correlation also tends to prove the absence of intensive exchange reactions during extrusion leading to in situ compatibilization.
It should be noted that other mechanical parameters (Young’s modulus and stress at yield) display classical evolutions with balanced stiffness and tensile strength but no clear trend could be extracted in term of PLA/PA compatibility.12–14,20,21 As a conclusion on tensile properties of injection-molded PLA/PA, brittle-toductile transitions are observed for all PLA/PA for PA content higher than 30 wt %, but a speciﬁc enhancement is highlighted with the use of PA12HV.
This effect seems to be consistent with previous trends on PLA/PA compatibility (PA12HV displayed the best compatibility with PLA), indicating that the interface quality could play an important role on tensile mechanical properties.
In this context, the formation of highly elongated and partially continuous PA structures probably controlled the brittle-to-ductile transition but PLA/PA compatibility and interface quality also play a major role on the ﬁnal ductility of PLA/PA blends with a maximal impact using PA12HV.
To stress the inﬂuence of the PLA/PA compatibility on tensile mechanical properties, additional experiments were performed to test various hypotheses (i.e., modiﬁcation of the PA continuity and presence of elongated structures).
The PLA/PA compatibility could play a key role on the ﬁnal impact strength of PLA/PA blends but, here, highly elongated morphologies with an orientation perpendicular to the impact test could also bring beneﬁcial effects.
The PLA/PA compatibility clearly plays a minor role on the ﬁnal thermomechanical properties and a careful investigation of the peculiar/additional crystallization of PLA in the presence of PA is required in near future.
for high-performance The study focused on the development of PLA/PA binary blends using twin-screw extrusion technologies in the absence of compatibilizer Several PAs (PA10-10, PA10-12, PA11, or PA12) were selected and the PLA/PA compatibility in the melt state was ﬁrst investigated.
PLA/PA10-10 binary blends clearly displayed the lowest compatibility (high PA droplet sizes, intensive interfacial debonding, and a high interfacial tension in the melt state close to that of 9 mN/m).
The PLA/PA compatibility level clearly increased with the length of the PA aliphatic sequence compatibility was undoubtly concluded for and the best PLA/PA12 binary blends.
This interesting result about the enhanced PLA/PA12 compatibility probably found a thermodynamic origin (free volume, PA polarity, and so on) and future investigations in that way will be conducted for an advanced tuning/optimization of the PLA/PA compatibility.
However, the highest ductilities were obtained for PLA/PA12 blends (approximately 170% at 40-wt % PA12) indicating that the PLA/PA compatibility played a key role on tensile mechanical properties.
However, the impact strength only increased by a factor 2 compared with neat PLA and the PLA/PA compatibility seemed to play a minor role on impact properties.
Despite a minor impact of the PLA/PA compatibility on ﬁnal thermomechanical properties, such high crystallinity value is clearly of prime importance for engineering hightemperature applications and detailed scientiﬁc/technological investigations will be conducted in a near future on the crystallization behavior of PLA in the presence of PA and on creep/fatigue behavior at temperatures above 100 C. Among all investigated blends, PLA/PA12 consequently represents the most promising association with the highest compatibility, good interface, and highest tensile mechanical properties.
In addition, their compatibility with the main energetic components of 2,4,6-trinitrotoluene-based melt-cast explosives were also evaluated by the non-isothermal differential thermal analysis method.
These polymers have good thermal stability and feasible compatibility with various explosives.
Usually, compatibility can be evaluated from DTA or DSC curves by studying the effect of the contact material on the exothermic  202 DONGSHI SHAN et al.
The compatibility of PVMNB-GAPs with the main energetic components of TNT-based melt-cast explosives was determined by DTA [37].
The evaluated standards of compatibility for explosives and contacted materials [38] are listed in Table 2.
According the evaluated standards of compatibility in Table 2, PVMNB-4#GAP has good compatibility with TNT, TATB, and HMX PVMNB-4#GAP/RDX, or DTA (b) 30 15 0 −15 −30 200 150 100 50 0 −50 −100 247°C 228°C 100 200 300 400 500 600 (d) 220°C 228°C 2 3 1 700 2 3 100 200 300 400 500 Temperature, °C 1 700 600 Fig.
Standards of compatibility for explosives and contact materials Criteria (ΔTp, °C) Less than or equal to 2 3 to 5 6 to 15 15 and above Ratinga A B C D Compatible or good compatibility Slightly sensitized or moderate compatibility Sensitized or poor compatibility Hazardous or bad compatibility aA: safe for use in any explosive design; B: safe for use in testing, when the device will be used in a very short period of time, not to be used as a binder material, or when long-term storage is desired; C: not recommended for use with explosive items; D: hazardous, do not use under any conditions.
It means poor compatibility between PVMNB-4#GAP and RDX.
So the compatibility testing results indicate that PVMNB-4#GAP can be safely used in TNT, TATB and HMX, but cannot be used in RDX.
The compatibility that PVMNB-4#GAP has good compatibility with TNT, TATB, and HMX, while its compatibility with RDX is poor.
This is also in agreement with our previous works on blends or PET and PBT; this binary polyester system has been found to be compatible (but readily reactive!).
However, the higher of the two T,‘s for the copolymer, referred to POB-rich copolymer, was found to be independent of composition, indicating incompatiblity of this phase with PBT.
With this limited compatibility, the melting point of PBT was not depressed by mixing with the copolymer.
Thus, in spite of fractional compatibility, the fractional crystallization of PBT is not significantly affected in amount by the presence of copolymer for these test conditions (see Table I); otherwise the elastic moduli would have been high.
Introduction Studies have shown that there would be considerable advantage to using polymer matrix composites (PMCs) as a lighter weight and possibly lower cost option for the structure in cryogenic tanks for launch vehicles.1-4 A number of research efforts have targeted the design of composites with greater ignition resistance,5-6 the properties of polymer matrices versus oxygen compatibility7, and the approach to testing composites for LOX compatibility.8 However, much is still not understood about the ignition mechanisms specific to composites.
As mentioned, this material was chosen because the literature contains significant data showing that, among PMCs, it is has good resistance to the formation of damage networks due to thermo-mechanical cyclic loading at cryogenic temperatures that could lead to excessive permeability in a pressure vessel application.12-13 Consequently, IM7 / 977-2 is a leading candidate for use in liquid hydrogen (LH2) tank applications (where compatibility with LOX is not an issue).
But, since the material already addresses the issue of damage at cryogenic temperatures it would be ideal if it could be altered in some manner in order to pass D2512 (and the other LOX compatibility tests) or if a logical argument could be made for a modified suite of tests that could be conducted to show it to be safe to use in LOX.
This inconsistency in the results suggests that increasing the sample size is not likely to be a reliable method of improving LOX compatibility but a similar series of tests with multiple impacts should be done before making this conclusion.
Consequently, investigating further changes to the lay-up as technique for influencing LOX compatibility may be worthwhile.
Modiﬁcation and orientation could signiﬁcantly enhance the blood compatibility of PLLA by prolonging clotting time and decreasing hemolysis ratio, protein adsorption and platelet activation.
for a biomedical implant material to be in contact with blood, the blood compatibility is another one of the most important properties in order to ensure the security of clinical practice [5].
On the other hand, to improve the blood compatibility of PLLA, surface coating and surface modiﬁcation, such as chemical modiﬁcation with drugs and endothelial cell seeding, are the most general approaches.
And in our previous work, through solid hot drawing technology, highly oriented PLLA/MWNTs composites and PLLA/TPU blends were prepared successfully and the most interesting ﬁnding was the fact that the oriented samples showed obviously enhanced in vitro blood compatibility as well as mechanical properties [12].
Compared with other most general used approaches such as surface chemical modiﬁcation with drugs and endothelial cell seeding, formation of highlyoriented ﬁbrillar structure to improve the blood compatibility of PLLA presented the advantages of high efﬁciency, low costs and signiﬁcant enhancements in the mechanical properties.
Therefore, for oriented neat and chain extended PLLA, it was thought that the different blood compatibility may be due to their different surface properties.
Blood compatibility of oriented PLLA blood and g p where gd blood are the dispersion and polar surface tension p of the blood, respectively.
The amount of protein adsorbed on the specimens is reported to be one of the most important factors in evaluating the blood compatibility of materials because protein adsorption is the ﬁrst event in blood-material interactions [41].
Platelet adhesion and activation on the surface of a biomaterial is the most essential character in determining the blood compatibility of a biomaterial.
Hemolysis ratio Hemolysis of the blood is an extremely serious problem associated with the bio-incompatibility of materials faced by biomaterial researchers.
Therefore, in evaluating blood compatibility and biocompatibility, it is of vital importance to investigate the hemolysis ratio of the material.
As to the surface of chain extended PLLA before drawing, an obviously less hemolysis rate was obtained indicating that the chain extension would improve the compatibility of the PLLA when contacting with bioﬂuids.
Therefore, leading to less damage of red blood cells, the oriented neat and chain extended PLLA exhibited desirable blood compatibility.
From the material science point of view, a native blood vessel is the best blood compatible material.
This micro topography of the blood vessel was believed to play an important role in blood compatibility because this kind of structure leading to hydrophobicity of surface and a low chance for contact with platelets.
The results of in vitro blood compatibility showed that, compared with neat PLLA, oriented samples after chain extension exhibited lower hemolysis ratio, longer clotting time and less platelet and protein adhesion, indicating that the samples with highly molecular orientation exhibited an appreciably better blood compatibility than neat PLLA.
In the present communication attention is focused on a commercial rigid polyurethane foam (PUF) with respect to its compatibility or otherwise with liquids.
As indicated in the Introduction, incompatibility rather than favourable interaction is desirable between the PUF and a liquid with which it may be in contact for its end-use.
4, 1994  Compatibility of polyurethane foam with liquids at diflerent temperatures 41 1 not measured at T < 298K, the linear plots indicate that for methanol incompatibility may be enhanced also at low temperature.
incompatibility is greatest for the combination of PUF with the most polar liquid, water, as evidenced by the uniformly high value 16, 6, I in Fig.
(iv) From the change in 16, 6, I with T, incompatibility increases with increasing temperature for water and methanol.
I. Poly( methylene oxide) and Poly( ethylene oxide) A. G. MARGARITIS and N. K. KALFOGLOU,* Department of Chemistry, University of Patras, 261 10 Patra, Greece Synopsis The compatibility of poly(viny1 chloride) (PVC) with linear polyethers is examined over the entire composition range.
INTRODUCTION The study of polymer compatibility is of major importance in theory and practice.
There are various types of polymer-polymer intera~tions',~ that may lead to compatibility defined in the most general sense;' e.g., hydrogen b ~ n d i n g , ~ .
Thus it is presently recognized that a rational approach to achieve polymer compatibility is through a suitable choice of polymer partners to ensure a negative or near-zero heat of mixing.
Other studies on compatibility based on interaction due to structural features may be found in recent books and review^.^,'^-'^ In this study we report on the compatibility of poly(viny1 chloride) (PVC) with linear polyethers of the general formula €(CH2)m-O-#n, with rn = 1,2,4.
This observation led us to study the compatibility of epoxidized poly(hydrocarbons) with chlorinated polymers, and in most cases they were found to be miscible.
However, on the basis of the data reported, no definite conclusions could be obtained on compatibility; too many additives were used, and no diagnostic tests for compatibility were carried out.
In blends, except for a decrease in the p relaxation (dilution effect), no significant feature of the PMO component could provide a clue as to the state of blend compatibility.
© 2002 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 83: 2322–2330, 2002 Key words: compatibility; viscometry; ultrasound; mechanical properties INTRODUCTION Polymer blending is one of the most commercially signiﬁcant areas for the development of new polymeric materials.
If the polymers comprising the mixture have a strong afﬁnity for one another, they will be compatible and mutually soluble.
Although high compatibility is desirable for ease of blending, some degree of incompatibility often leads to useful properties.
Development of newer properties depends on the degree of compatibility of the polymers at the molecular level.
The compatibility of binary blend systems was analyzed by using ultrasound technique.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Viscosity Studies The basis for using dilute solution viscosity as a parameter for compatibility determination of polymer blend lies in the fact that while in solution, the repulsive interaction may cause shrinkage of the polymer coils, resulting in a change in the viscosity of the polymer components, on the assumption of additive law.
At very low concentrations (0.1%), both b12 and ⌬b (Table II) show negative values at all blend compositions except at 70 : 30 and 50 : 50, suggesting that there is a Table II ⌬b Values for PS–PnBMA System The blend compatibility of PS : PnBMA under various compositions is analyzed on the basis of ultrasound analysis.
The relation between composition, ultrasound velocity, and attenuation reﬂect whether the blend system is compatible, semi-compatible, or incompatible.
ultrasound velocity varies linearly with composition in compatible blends.
In the case of incompatible systems, the nature of the curve is S type, and for semicompatible blends, the nature of curve is in between a straight line and an S type of curve.
According to Singh et al.19,20 and Sidkey et al.,3,4 the presence of one maximum reﬂects the mutual solubility of components and the fact that they are compatible.
The presence of more than one maximum indicates phase inversion, and consequently, the blend formed is incompatible.
Analytica Chimica Acta 362 (1998) 193–202 Effect of plasticizer-polymer compatibility on the response characteristics of optical thin CO2 and O2 sensing ﬁlms Andrew Mills*, Anne Lepre, Lorraine Wild University of Wales Swansea, Department of Chemistry, Singleton Park, Swansea SA2 8PP, UK Received 27 August 1997; received in revised form 22 December 1997; accepted 12 January 1998 Abstract A homologous family of dialkyl phthalates has been used to investigate the effect of plasticizer/polymer compatibility on the response characteristics of transparent, plastic, thin optical gas sensing ﬁlms for CO2 and oxygen.
Plasticizer/polymer compatibilities were determined through the value of the difference in solubility parameter, i.e.
for the plasticizer and polymer with a (cid:1)(cid:14) value of zero indicating high compatibility.
A strong correlation was found between plasticizer/polymer compatibility and sensitivity in phenol red/ethyl cellulose CO2-sensitive ﬁlms and this relationship extended to CO2-sensitive ﬁlms based on other polymers such as polystyrene and poly(methyl methacrylate).
Other results from the CO2-sensitive ﬁlms in different polymers indicated that the ﬁlm sensitivity is largely independent of the polymer matrix regardless of its inherent gas permeability, when a sufﬁcient quantity of compatible plasticizer is present.
There are several different semi-empirical ways of predicting plasticizer/polymer compatibility but most are based on the simple concept that ‘like dissolves like’.
Different materials are mutually compatible when they have similar values for (cid:14) and it is generally accepted [16] that for compatibility the parameter, [(cid:1)(cid:14)(cid:136)(cid:14)(polymer)(cid:255)(cid:14)(plasticizer)] should be <(cid:6)3.7 (J cm(cid:255)3)1/2.
difference solubility the in the extent two major compatibility (i.e.
Identifying compatible plasticizer/polymer systems based on solubility parameter values is less successful if interactions not due to dispersion alone are involved, such as induction, dipole–dipole and hydrogen bonding interactions.
types will have different therefore, In an attempt to more properly address the issue of the effect of plasticizer/polymer compatibility on ﬁlm sensitivity, this paper describes the results of a detailed study aimed at probing the relationship in:  A.
Plasticizer/polymer compatibility in ethyl cellulose-based CO2-sensing films In order to compare the effects of the different members of the dialkyl phthalate family on the response characteristics of the optical CO2-sensitive ﬁlms, an initial experiment was conducted to identify a suitable plasticizer concentration which would give the maximum increase in sensitivity.
polymer become more compatible) %CO2(R(cid:136)1) decreases (i.e.
From the results of this work it appears that the better the polymer/plasticizer compatibility, i.e.
It should be noted, however, that even outside the (cid:1)(cid:14)3.7 (J cm(cid:255)3)1/2 range, which is generally taken to be the compatibility range, the plasticizer still enhances the sensitivity compared to a non-plasticized ﬁlm; thus, even with DIDP ((cid:1)(cid:14)(cid:136)6.4), %CO2(R(cid:136)1) is decreased twofold, from 23.3 to 11.4% (no plasticizer).
The most dramatic change in sensitivity is, however, associated with the highly compatible plasticizers.
It might therefore be expected that, while addition of any of these plasticizers will enhance the accessibility of CO2 to the ﬁlm, addition of particularly compatible ones, which should be homogeneously dispersed within it, will be especially favourable.
3 that the rate of the diffusion of CO2 into the ﬁlm is high and largely independent of polymer/plasticizer compatibility.
Plasticizer/polymer compatibilities in CO2 sensing films in other polymer matrices Although CO2 sensing ﬁlms have traditionally been formulated using an ethyl cellulose matrix, there are various other cellulosic and non-cellulosic polymers which are available and which are already widely used in thin ﬁlm O2 sensors.
The high %CO2(R(cid:136)1), associated with DEP in this ﬁlm, is perhaps surprising as its (cid:1)(cid:14) value of (cid:255)2.0 (J cm(cid:255)3)1/2 lies within the accepted (cid:6)3.7 (J cm(cid:255)3)1/2 compatibility range.
However, conﬁrmation of the compatibility problems associated with this ﬁlm was provided by its tacky ﬁnal appearance even when supposedly dry.
3 and 4) implies that if a sufﬁcient quantity of a compatible plasticizer is present the sensitivity of the ﬁlm is largely independent of the polymer matrix.
The equilibrium process (1) may, under conditions of high levels of highly compatible plasticizer, take place in a ‘sea’ of plasticizer.
three polymers for all From the foregoing results it appears that, with this set of plasticizers in this type of CO2 sensing ﬁlm, the dependence of the sensitivity of the ﬁlm on the plasticizer/polymer compatibility is a general phenomenon.
Plasticizer/polymer compatibility in other thinfilm optical gassensing films If the polymer/plasticizer ﬁlm sensitivity relationship is applicable to different polymer systems for the CO2-sensitive ﬁlm, it does not seem unreasonable to suppose that it will also apply to other optical gas sensors where diffusion of the gas to the probe molecule is important.
Examples of such sensors include those for ammonia [22] and oxygen [23] and indeed, in the latter case, we already have some evidence that plasticizer/polymer compatibility inﬂuences ﬁlm sensitivity.
there is a clear correlation between plasticizer/ polymer compatibility and the ﬁlm sensitivity.
Conclusions The results have shown that, for this family of dialkyl phthalate plasticizers, there is a positive correlation between plasticizer/polymer compatibility and sensitivity, but not between response and recovery times, for plastic, thin-ﬁlm optical gas-sensing ﬁlms.
Results show that a sequential polymerization gives a more incompatible system (i.e., it enters the metastable region at lower conversions) than a simultaneous polymerization starting from the same monomers.
In every case, a semi-IPN is shown to be more compatible than an IPN owing to the fact that the average size of the bifunctional monomer increases less with conversion than the size of the trifunctional monomer.
Thus, systems will be called compatible or incompatible, from a thermodynamic point of view, depending on which side of the binodal they are located.
At this point, phase separation is Then, for most cases it severely retarded by diffusional restricti~ns.~*~>~ suffices to analyze the thermodynamic compatibility in the pregel stage.
Only in the particular case of a sequential IPN the analysis will be extended to the postgel stage, to show that compatibility is not only enhanced by diffusional restrictions but also from thermodynamic principles.
Moreover, an increase in the thermodynamic compatibility of the sol-gel mixture, after the gel point, may be expected.
At the same p2, a higher value of N (or pl) means a corresponding increase in the average size of component 1, leading to less compatibility (smaller value of x,).
An increase in the initial size of one of the monomers (2) with respect to the other (1) decreases the entropy of mixing, leading to less compatibility (a decrease in the xc value).
After gelation, the system increases its compatibility due to the decrease both in the sol fraction and its average size 2% with conversion.
The fact that the sequential polymerization leads to more incompatible systems than the simultaneous procedure has already been stated on theoretical grounds.8p'8 Figure 5 shows the effect of the interaction parameter on the placement of the binodal curve in the pregel stage.
The semi-IPN shows a continuous decrease in compatibility for all the conversion range, due to the continuous increase of the average A, size.
However, as in the case of the simultaneous procedure, the semi-IPN is more compatible than the IPN in its pregel stage ( p , < 0.5).
It is convenient to emphasize the fact that the term compatible has been used to designate a homogeneous mixture; i.e., a system lying outside the binodal curve.
In this sense, a semi-IPN is always more compatible than an IPN, provided the only difference between both systems is the average molar size attained for a given conversion.
In this case both systems are incompatible, and the shift in Tgs may be explained by different reasons as the relaxation to equilibrium from an IPN frozen in a nonequilibrium state.
THERMODYNAMIC COMPATIBILITY OF IPNs 1749 CONCLUSIONS The following thermodynamic trends have been shown: A sequential polymerization gives a more incompatible system (i.e., it enters the mestastable region at lower conversions) than a simultaneous polymerization starting from the same monomers.
After gelation of the second component in a sequential polymerization, the remaining sol will be more compatible with the mixture of gels, as conversion increases.
Both in simultaneous and sequential polymerizations, a semi-IPN is more compatible than an IPN in the pregel region.
Correlation of blood compatibility with morphological and surface energetic properties of the block copolymer film was investigated.
Key words: poly(ether urethane)-nylon 6 block copolymer, antithrombogenicity, blood compatibility, thrombus formation, crystallite size.
Another working hypothesis has been formulated, suggesting that surface energetic properties of polymeric biomaterials closely relate to the blood compatibility.
Baier5 suggested that materials which possess a critical surface tension in the range 20-30 dyne/cm would be more blood compatible than those with either lower or higher critical surface tensions.
Kaelble & Moacanin’ emphasised that materials with high dispersion and low polar surface free energies would be more blood compatible than those with low dispersion and high polar surface energies.
have suggested that a balance of polar and apolar sites on a surface might be important for its blood compatibility.
Thus, the structural property responsible for the blood compatible behaviour of polymeric biomaterials is somewhat obscure.
When the crystallisable component Blood compatibility Tensile testing Uniaxial stress-strain and ultimate property measurement were made using a standard Instron testing machine (Model 1123) employing a cross-head speed of 5m/min.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION The blood compatibility of the block copolymer films cast from formic acid solution was evaluated by estimating the amount of thrombus formed on the block copolymer surface according to the in-uitro method reported by Imai & Nose."
The block copolymer exhibited a suppressing effect on the thrombus formation compared with Biomer@, which is commercially available as a blood compatible material.
2, 1994 The blood compatibility of the PEU-nylon 6 block copolymer film was tested by estimating the amount of thrombus formed on the block copolymer surface according to the in-vitro method.
Factors affecting the blood compatible behaviour of the block copolymer in terms of the morphological and surface energetic properties were also investigated.
From the WAXD and ESCA data, it is suggested that controlling the crystallite size of the nylon 6 block in the block copolymer by regulating the copolymer composition is an important factor in achieving blood compatibility.
No correlation between the surface free energy and the blood compatibility was found this block copolymer system.
0 1994 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. Keywords: polydimethylsiloxanes macromonomers polyamide-acids polyimides side chain compatibility INTRODUCTION In the molecular composite concept first proposed by Takayanagi' and Helminiak,' one of the most important factors is the perfect dispersion of the rigid-rod molecules in the matrix.
Efforts to improve the compatibility of the rigid molecule to the matrix include the use of block copolymers of the poly(pphenylene terephthalamide) (PPTA) and the matrix nylon,' metalation of PPTA to make it ~oluble,~ in situ polymerization of acrylamide by the anion of PPTA to form a graft copolymer together with nylon-3 homopolymer, in situ direct polymerization of wholly aromatic polyesters or polyamides in the solution of the matrix polymer^,^^^ in situ simulta * To whom all correspondence should be addressed.
ITOH AND MITA matic rigid-rod polyimides (PIS) with phenyl substituents are reported by Harris and co-workers" and Schmidt and co-workers, l2 but more soluble rigid-rod PIS reported contain a terphenyl unit having two dodecyl groups on each phenylene In addition to improving solubility, attaching flexible side chains of the same chemical structure as the matrix polymer will increase the compatibility of the rods to the matrix.16 Thus, rigid-rod polymers bearing polysiloxane side chains have been selected as the present molecular design for compatible rigidrods to silicone matrices.
Work on rigid-rod polymers with flexible side chains includes aromatic polyesters with alkyl side chains attached directly, 17,18 attached via ~ x y g e n , ' ~ ~ ~ and via ester linkage; 19,23 aromatic polyesters having polystyrene side chains; l6 PIS bearing a l k ~ l , ' ~ , ' ~ and a l k ~ x y ~ ~ azoles with alkoxymethyl side chains.25 Semi-rigid PIS having polydimethylsiloxane ( PDMS ) side chains are also reported for separation membrane application.26 side chains; and polyarylene-1,2,4-oxadi In the present work synthesis and characterization of rigid-rod PIS with PDMS side chains ( SCPIs) and their compatibility with linear PDMSs have been studied to examine the possibility of dispersing a rigid-rod polymer in a silicone matrix.
In addition to the three homopolymers of different side chain length, VII a-c and VIII a-c, two copolymers which contained the n = 12.1 and the n = 46.2 side chains but in different ratios, d and e, were prepared for compatibility studies as we will discuss later.
The compatibility after the imidization is summarized in Figure 6.
In the figures, the n values for copolymers VIIId and e are the average of the two different length side chains, “separated” means that the PDMS and the SCPI is separated (no compatibility), “paste-like,’ means that they are compatible and the blend is paste-like, “solid” means that the blend is rather a solid, and the PI content is calculated as follows: PI content (Weight of the SCPI Weight of the PI backbone + Weight of the matrix PDMS) x 100 For PDMS-A matrix, the side chain length of n = 46 was necessary for the compatibilization for the homopolymer.
The more viscous and higher molecular weight PDMSB thus made a better matrix for the compatibilization.
The data at n = 29 and PI content of 2-4% for PDMS-B show that the homopolymer of this side chain length, VIIIb, is incompatible whereas the copolymer with the same average side chain length, VIIIe, is compatible.
However VIIId with the average n value of 19 exhibited worse compatibility.
Homopolymer, separated; ( 0 ) homopolymer, compatible and the blend was paste-like; ( 0 ) homopolymer, compatible and the blend was solid; (0) copolymer, separated; (+) copolymer, compatible and the blend was paste-like; (+) copolymer, compatible and the blend was solid.
Polymer International Polym Int 52:81–85 (2003) DOI: 10.1002/pi.1026 Preparation and blood compatibility of phosphorylcholine-bonded O-butyrylchitosan Aiping Zhu, Bing Shan, Youling Yuan and Jian Shen* Department of Polymer Science and Engineering, Nanjing University, Nanjing 210093, People’s Republic of China Abstract: 2-Methacryloyloxyethyl phosphorylcholine (MPCE) was synthesized using phosphorus trichloride, ethylene glycol, 2-hydroxyethyl methacrylate and triethylamine, and then used in the preparation of O-butyrylchitosan-bonded MPCE (MPCE–BCS) by Michael addition of MPCE to amino groups of O-butyrylchitosan.
The blood-compatibility of MPCE–BCS was evaluated by means of blood clotting and platelet adhesion assays.
The blood-clotting assay indicated that O-butyrylchitosan was haemocompatible.
It has been generally accepted that MPC copolymers have biocompatibility and, moreover, haemocompatibility10–12; however, the synthesis of MPC is very complicated and difﬁcult.
It is a kind of biocompatible natural polymer.14–18 Due to its special biological, chemical and physical properties, chitosan has been widely used in a number of biomedical applications.19 To enhance the anticoagulant properties of chitosan, its derivatives such as the sulfated compound and N-acylated chitosan have been researched.20–22 As an alternative strategy for incorporating the PC functional group into natural polymer to promote the antithrombogenicity of chitosan, we prepared a kind of PC-based chitosan derivative, MPCE–BCS, by Michael addition of MPCE to the amino groups of O-butyrylchitosan.
The adsorption of globular proteins at the hydrophilic solid interfaces is reversible, which beneﬁts to maintain the natural conformation of globular proteins and results in blood-compatibility.
The excellent antithrombogenicity of MPCE–BCS, into which has been incorporated PC functional groups, is due to the good blood compatibility of MPCE molecules.
From the above results it can be concluded that it is the PC functional group in MPCE molecules that brings excellent blood-compatibility to butyrylchitosan.
From the comparison of the phase diagram for the isotactic polystyrene-containing blend with that of the atactic-containing blend, it can be concluded that in the amorphous state polystyrene with a regular configuration is slightly less compatible with the P( 0-CIS-co-p-CIS) than is polystyrene with random configuration.
In particular the aim of this study is to analyze the influence of blend composition and thermal history on crystallization, melting behavior, and compatibility in iPS/(COP85) blends.
As discussed above, the systems iPS/COP85 and aPS/COP85 may be compatible or phase separated depending on T, and blend composition.
The compatibility behavior of PVC/CR20gp-SVAAN (1:l:l) blends has been reflected in the ultrasonic velocity and absolute viscosity vs. composition plots of the blend.
The results have been discussed on the basis of compatibility, stabilizing, and destabilizing behavior of various component polymers with PVC matrix.
INTRODUCTION Recently, Singh and Singhl-3 have studied the thermal and compatibility behaviour of PVC/chlororubber-20-graft polyblend-ethyl acrylate-acrylonitrile (2:l) and PVC/chlororubber-20-graft polyblend-styrene-acrylonitrile (2:l) blends.
Thus, compatibility of the system becomes prime factor which controls the thermal behavior of the polymer blends because of the involvement of various phases in thermal degradation process.
The present paper discusses the compatibility and thermal behaviour of PVC/chlororubber-20-graft polyblend-styrene-vinyl acetate-acrylonitrile (1:l:l) [PVC/CR-20-SVAAN (1:1:1)] blend system.
Tetrahydrofuran (AR, BDH; double distilled) was used in blend preparation for compatibility studies.
PVC blends with CR-20gp-SVAAN (1:l:l) for compatibility measurements were prepared by dissolving the requisite proportions of both the constituents in THF separately and then by thorough mixing of the polymer solutions.
The compatibility was determined by the ultrasonic velocity at 2 MHz, and absolute viscosity of blend solutions at room temperature as discussed earlier.5-7 Thermal Stability Measurements.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION The compatibility of chlororubber with PVC has not been extensively studied.
Singh et al.5 and Singh and Singh617 have observed that the ultraonic velocity and absolute viscosity vary linearly with composition in the solution of compatible blends while these quantities deviate from linearity for incompatible blends.
The same techniques for compatibility measurements have been applied for the compatibility study of the present system.
The transparency of the films show compatible nature of the system while the yellow color indicates specific interaction between constituent polymer^.^ At higher concentrations of modifiers, transparency of films reduces indicating the development of microheterogeneity.
Differential thermal analysis of PVC/CR-20gp-SVAAN ( 1:1:1)2 also supports the above-stated compatibility behavior.
The grafted nature of polystyrene macromolecules helps the stabilization process due to their uniform distribution in PVC matrix, which is otherwise incompatible.
Box 272, Beijing University of Chemical Technology, Beijing 100029, China Received 23 January 2001; accepted 21 May 2001 ABSTRACT: A novel polymerization procedure, the concentrated-emulsion graft polymerization of styrene monomer with poly(butyl acrylate) seed, was proposed for the production of a self-compatibility macromolecule alloy.
Scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy, and impact strength were used to characterize the microstructure and mechanical performance of the self-compatibility macromolecule alloy.
The results showed that increasing the butyl acrylate content, reducing the sodium dodecyl sulfate concentration, and improving the polymerization temperature all favored an increased graft ratio, which resulted in increased impact strength of the self-compatibility macromolecule alloy.
© 2002 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 83: 2915–2920, 2002; DOI 10.1002/app.10288 Key words: acrylate); alloys; blends concentrated emulsion; graft; self-compatibility; polystyrene; poly(butyl INTRODUCTION Nowadays, different techniques are used to improve the compatibility of multiphase polymer blends.1–3 For the processing of polymer blends, primary methods include the addition of compatibilizers, group reaction, and reaction extrusion.4 – 8 Of course, processing methods play an important role in morphology and physical properties, and each method has its own advantages.
John Wiley & Sons, Inc. sents the most compact arrangement of spheres of equal size) and can be as large as 0.99.9 –14 In a previous article,15 a novel procedure for the selfcompatibilization of polymer blends prepared via functionalized concentrated-emulsion polymerizations was proposed.
During the mixing and subsequent polymerization, reactions between the carboxyl groups of the acrylic acid and the glycidyl groups of the glycidyl methacrylate occurred, and some kinds of graft and/or block copolymers were generated, which constituted the compatibilizers 2915  2916 LI, DU, AND HUANG of the system.
With PBA as the dispersed phase and PS as the continuous phase, better compatibility between the two phases resulted in a higher compact strength.
Therefore, the effect of compatibilization can be characterized by the impact strength of a sample, which constitutes a measure of its toughness.
The small amounts of the graft copolymers, as compatibilizers, reduced the interfacial tension and increased the compatibility between the PS and PBA phases.
Effect of the Polymerization Temperature on the Microstructure and Impact Strength The compatibilizing effect is revealed clearly by the morphologies of the PS–PBA alloys.
The graft copolymers, as compatibilizers, dispersed uniformly between the PS and PBA phases; this was very helpful for the compatibility of the PS and PBA phases.
Therefore, one can conclude that compatibilization between the PS and PBA phases can be obtained with an increased reaction temperature during concentrated-emulsion polymerizations.
An excellently combined self-compatibilized alloy was thus obtained.
A high polymerization temperature was necessary to ensure good compatibilization, which made the domain of the PBA phase ﬁner and improved the impact strength of the self-compatibilized alloy.
POLYMER BLENDS Improved Compatibility of Blends between Recycled Polypropylene and Polyamide 6 by the Products of Degradation1 Shuai Jiaa, Shuanli Dua, Yingchun Lib,*, Nuo Caoc, Maoyong Heb, and Yufei Kongb aSchool of Chemical Engineering and Environment, North University of China, bSchool of Materials Science and Engineering, North University of China, Taiyuan, 030051 China Taiyuan, 030051 China cChina Electrical Science Research Institute Co., Ltd. , Guangzhou, 510000 China *e-mail: liyingchun@nuc.edu.cn Received December 13, 2016; Revised Manuscript Received July 20, 2017 Abstract—The compatibilization of recycled polypropylene in blends with polyamide 6 prepared via twin screw extruder was investigated.
Reactive compatibilization between the recycled polypropylene and polyamide 6 was studied by “Molau test” and FTIR, the results showed the formation of copolymers during blending.
Morphology analysis revealed the diameter of recycled polypropylene dispersed in polyamide 6 matrix decreased markedly and the boundary was obscure compared with the uncompatibilized blends by scanning electron microscopy.
In recent decades, extensive interests concentrate on the use of functional polymers, like pre-grafting a small quantity of polypropylene with reactive monomers [2, 3], to compatibilize PP/PA6 blends.
In general, maleic anhydride [4–7], acrylic acid [8–10] and glycidyl methacrylate [11–13] belong to reactive monomers, which can accomplish chemical compatibilization during melt mixing owing to the interactions 1 The article is published in the original.
According to above facts, partially degraded PP may compatibilize PP/PA6 blends, which is possibly ascribed to the interactions including hydrogen bonds and chemical reactions.
Therefore, the compatibility of blends between recycled PP mainly from the household appliances and PA6 was investigated in terms of SEM, FTIR-ATR test, stress-strain behavior, “Molau test” and DMA.
The so-called Molau test is performed to verify the formation of the graft or block copolymers and the compatibility of polymer components [21–23].
The copolymers can decrease the interfacial tension and enhance the interfacial adhesion for compatibilized blends, keeping stability of the heterophase structure [32–34].
Hence, this behavior verifies the possibility of the compatibilization effect of rPP and the results of FTIR.
Tensile Test As is well known, the compatibilization process has a significant effect on the yield stress, tensile strength and elongation at break values of blends, because these properties of the blends are directly related to the level of interfacial adhesion between the dispersed phase and matrix [35].
This behavior is typical for incompatible blends with poor interfacial adhesion.
In rPP/PA6 blends, however, the decreased elongation at break values as a result of compatibilization originates from the increased yield strength owing to the reinforcing effect of PA6 particles [36].
In general, the Δ Tg will decrease at improving compatibility.
So, it is clear that the Δ Tg in rPP/PA6 is slightly lower than that of mPP/PA6 blends, reflecting the compatibization effect indirectly and improving the adhesion of different phases.
CONCLUSIONS In this article, the compatibility between the rPP and PA6 was studied and that of corresponding mPP and PA6 was investigated as comparison.
Therefore, the partially recycled PP could serve as a new agent to compatibilize PP/PA6 blends and the defects of recycled PP are not neglected.
(2012) 69:455–469 DOI 10.1007/s00289-012-0748-4 O R I G I N A L P A P E R Effect of secondary forces in the compatibility of two incompatible biodegradable polymers P. M. Chou • M. Mariatti • A. Zulkiﬂi • M. Todo Received: 26 December 2011 / Accepted: 24 March 2012 / Published online: 23 May 2012 Ó Springer-Verlag 2012 Abstract Poly(ethylene adipate) (PEA) and polytetramethylene ether glycol (PTMEG) were used as compatibilizers in the biodegradable polymer blend of poly(L-lactic acid)/poly(butylene succinate-co-L-lactate) (PLLA/PBSL).
The compatibilization between PEA and PTMEG on the blends was measured using thermogravimetric analysis (TGA), ﬂexural test, ﬁeld emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy.
(2012) 69:455–469 PLLA has been studied extensively due to its biodegradability, biocompatibility, and processability.
The miscibility of an immiscible blend can be improved by using a compatibilizer, which is usually a block copolymer containing blocks that are chemically identical to the constituting polymers of the blend [10].
A compatibilizer of similar chemical structure should allow for the formation of a good interaction, either physically or chemically, between both polymers in the blend, thereby improving the miscibility of the blend.
This has been the general strategy in designing suitable compatibilizers to improve several immiscible blends [11–13].
Examples of the compatibilizers used in PLLA/PBSL blends are diglycerine tetraacetate [14], lysine triisocynate (LTI) [15], and polyethylene oxide–polypropylene oxide–polyethylene oxide (PEO–PPO–PEO) triblock copolymer [16].
No study on the compatibilization of the PLLA/PBSL blend with these two materials has been reported yet.
The effectiveness of compatibilization between the two compatibilizers (i.e., PEA and PTMEG) and the blend was assessed by Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy, ﬂexural test, and ﬁeld emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM).
Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy A Perkin-Elmer Spectrum One FTIR spectrometer was used to obtain the FTIR spectra of the PLLA/PBSL blends containing different compatibilizers.
However, the decomposition temperature at weight loss of 50% (Td50%) of the blend containing PEA is slightly higher than that of the uncompatibilized blend.
3, the doublet found in the DTG curve of uncompatibilized PLLA/ PBSL blend indicates that the sample experienced two steps of thermal degradation, wherein the ﬁrst peak corresponds to the decomposition of PLLA while the second peak is attributed to the decomposition of PBSL.
Apparently, all of the blends containing PTMEG exhibited lower decomposition temperature range compared to the uncompatibilized 75/25 blend, as shown in Fig.
The decomposition temperature at weight loss of 50 % (Td50 %) of the blend containing PTMEG was about 11 °C lower than that of the uncompatibilized blend, indicating that the addition of PTMEG reduced the thermal stability of the PLLA/PBSL blend.
5, it is worth noting that DTG curve pattern of the blend containing PTMEG are similar to that of uncompatibilized PLLA/PBSL blend, which exhibited two peaks.
This implies that PTMEG is not an effective compatibilizer for PLLA/PBSL blend.
5 DTG curves of 75/25 blends containing different contents of PTMEG Flexural properties Figure 6 shows the ﬂexural strength and modulus of the PLLA/PBSL blends as a function of compatibilizer content.
The ﬂexural strength value of the PLLA/PBSL containing 2 phr of PEA is almost similar to that of the blend without the compatibilizers, whereas the addition of 2 phr of PTMEG resulted in an approximately 20 % drop in ﬂexural strength.
As a result, the interfacial bonding between PLLA and PBSL phases is relatively weak as compared to that of PLLA/PBSL blend compatibilized with PEA.
Furthermore, the blends compatibilized with PEA showed a relatively abrupt drop in stress as the strain increased compared with the blends compatibilized with PTMEG, which displayed a gradual decrease in stress at higher strains.
The deformation behavior of the latter is notably similar to that of the PLLA/PBSL blend without a compatibilizer.
This implies that PTMEG acts as a plasticizer rather than a compatibilizer in the PLLA/PBSL blend.
This is corroborated by the FESEM micrographs of the morphology of the PLLA/PBSL blends with and without the compatibilizers as shown in Fig.
It is observed that cryofractured surface of the PLLA/PBSL blend without any compatibilizer exhibited almost no microvoids but only some degree of phase separation between the two phases.
9b, the uncompatibilized PLLA/PBSL blend exhibited a doubled peak in the region of 1,700 and 1,800 cm-1, corresponding to the carbonyl group of the PBSL (1,722 cm-1) and PLLA (1,748 cm-1).
8 FESEM images of the cryofractured surfaces of the PLLA/PBSL blend a without compatibilizer, b containing 2 phr PEA, c 2 phr PTMEG, d 4 phr PEA, e 4 phr PTMEG, f 6 phr PEA, and g 6 phr PTMEG slightly coalesced.
On the contrary, the FTIR spectra of the blend added with varying content of PTMEG are almost identical to those of the blend that was not compatibilized, as 123  Polym.
In contrast, PTMEG did not act as a good compatibilizer in the PLLA/PBSL blend.
Therefore, the general strategy of designing an effective compatibilizer is to introduce a chemical structure that is identical to those of the blend components.
Horak Z, Hlavata D, Hromadkova J, Kotek J, Hasova V, Mikesova J, Pleska A (2002) Effect of selected structural parameters of styrene–butadiene block copolymers on their compatibilization efﬁciency in polystyrene/polybutadiene blends.
The compatibility of pullulan with maleic acid/vinyl acetate copolymers in the solid state in the form of thin ﬁlms was studied with thermogravimetry, differential scanning calorimetry, infrared spectroscopy, and optical microscopy.
Although the potential of pullulan in plastics or as coatings and ﬁlm-forming materials has been recognized,1 its compatibility with other components and its phase behavior in multicomponent systems have not been widely explored.
In our previous studies,4,5 we prepared new potential biomaterials based on mixtures of poly(vinyl chloride) (PVC) and pullulan with different maleic anhydride (MA) copolymers as compatibilizing agents.
We found that the mixtures compatibilized with alternating MA/styrene and MA/methyl methacrylate copolymers or with an ethylene/propylene copolymer grafted with MA (Exxelor) exhibited a higher hydrophilicity and biocompatibility than the pullulan/PVC mixture (Exxon Chem., Houston, TX).
This article deals with the study of the compatibility of blends of pullulan and maleic acid (MAc)/vinyl acetate (VA) copolymers in the solid state.
The compatibility and degradation behaviour of the blends were investigated.
This discrete PCE phase was incompatible with the PP matrix.
Consequently, the MA-compatibilized PP/PCE 75/25 blend experienced signiﬁcant losses in weight and tensile strength, compared with uncompatibilized PP/PCE 75/25 blend, after immersion in a buffer solution (pH (cid:136) 6.0) at 458C for extended periods of time.
Water sorption and contact angle measurements also revealed that MA-compatibilized PP/PCE 75/25 blend is more hydrophilic than the uncompatibilized counterpart.
The effect of the compatibilizing agent on the morphology and degradation behaviour of PP/PCE blends is discussed.
take places is a non-toxic aliphatic polyester with compatibility, permeability and capacity of blending with various polymers.
and poly(styrene-co-acrylonitrile) PCL is compatible with many polymers such as poly(vinyl chloride), chlorinated polyethylene, polycarbonate, poly (amide-6), ethylene terephthalate–caprolactone copolyester [8–13].
As blends of PCE and polyoleﬁns are immiscible, compatibilization is needed to improve adhesion between the components.
[19] reported that maleic anhydride (MA) can be grafted to PCL and the copolymer produced can be used as a compatibilizing agent for polymeric materials.
Tjong and Bei prepared MA-compatibilized low-density polyethylene (LDPE)/PCE blends.
The results showed that the maleated LDPE/PCE blends degrade substantially upon immersion in buffer solution, while the uncompatibilized LDPE/PCE blends are relatively unaffected [20].
In this study we have attempted to prepare degradable polypropylene (PP)/PCL ﬁlm specimens by compression moulding and studied the effect of MA compatibilization on the morphology, degradation, static and dynamic mechanical behaviour of PP/PCE blends.
For comparison, uncompatibilized and MA-compatibilized PP/PCL blends are also prepared and their various properties are investigated.
This implies that both phases are incompatible.
In this respect, the compatibility between PP and PCL phases is improved by incorporating PP-grafted maleic anhydride in the blend.
This broad peak tends to become sharper in the loss modulus spectrum of the MAP/ PCL 75/25 blend, indicating that the compatibility between PP and PCL phases is improved considerably by grafting PP with maleic anhydride.
A similar reducing trend is observed between the Tgs of PP and PCE in the compatibilized MAP/ PCE 75/25 blend (Fig.
For the MAP/PCE 75/25 blend, it is observed that the compatibility Fig.
The degradation of both uncompatibilized and MAcompatibilized PP/PCL and PP/PCE blends is evaluated by changes in the mechanical strength of the blends and in the weight loss of the polymers.
It can be seen that loss increases rapidly for both the compatibilized and uncompatibilized PP/PCE blends during the ﬁrst month of immersion in buffer solution.
This compatibilizer effectively improves the hydrophilicity of the blends by increasing the amount of water absorbed during immersion, as discussed in the next section.
However, spallation of the surface layer occurs in the compatibilized MAP/PCE 75/25 blend because the ﬁne cavities tend to link together to form larger voids.
Water sorption and contact angle measurements indicated that the MAcompatibilized PP/PCE 75/25 blend is more hydrophilic than its uncompatibilized counterpart.
It is noted that the MA-compatibilized PP/PCE and PP/PCL blends have smaller contact angles than their corresponding uncompatibilized counterparts.
This implies that the MA-compatibilized their uncompatibilized counterparts.
Replacing the rubber by poly(acrylonitri1e-cobutadiene) containing 30 percent acrylonitrile, shows that these three polymers, in which each pair is incompatible or at most partially compatible, also form compatible ternary blends.
Numerous tudies on compatibility in polymer blends have been publications appear in the literature and have been compiled by Krause (1).
Discovering compatible pairs is mainly dependent on experimental efforts.
Studies on compatible blends are extensive for binary system, but are rare for ternary system.
The latter two constitute an incompatible pair, but can be brought together by the former to form compatible ternary blends.
In a patent publication (4), it is disclosed that poly(viny1idene chloride-co-vinyl chloride) (PVdC-VC) and poly(acrylonitri1e-co-butadiene) (NBR) are incompatible but can be brought together by poly(viny1 chloride) (PVC) to form compatible ternary blends.
The criterion of compatibility used was optical clarity of the films.
In this paper, we investigate the compatibility in binary and ternary blends composed of these three polymers using dynamic mechanical spectrum and differential scanning calorimetry.
PVC and NBR-40 (NBR containing 40 percent by weight of acrylonitrile) are incompatible and partially compatible respectively with P(VdC-VC), but blends composed of the former two (which constitute a compatible pair) are compatible with P(VdC-VC) to form a ternary blend.
Replacing NBR-40 by NBR-30, which is only partially compatible with PVC and P(VdC-VC), results in ternary blends that are also compatible.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Binary Blends Before studying the ternary blends, it is necessary to understand compatibility in each polymer pair.
1 and TubZe 1 indicate that P(VdC-VC) and PVC are incompatible, for the two Tg's in the blend are the same as those of the pure components.
P(VdC-VC) and NBR-40 are partially compatible, for Tg)s of the two phases in the blend shift toward each other by -9°C and +11"C respectively in comparison to the TB)s of the pure components.
PVC and NBR-40 are compatible as indicated by a single Tg (5).
2 and Table 2 dynamic mechanical properties of the binary blend containing NBR-30 indicate that both the P(VdC-VC)/NBR-30 and PVC/NBR-30 pairs are partially compatible as indicated by the shifting of P ( V d c K ) m m 4 0 s-1 s-2 s-3 s-4 s-5 s-6 1 / 0 / 0 0 / 1 / 0 0 / 0 / 1 l / l / Q l / O / l 0 / 1 / 1 E' 4 10 'O8 5 ~6 8 01 t W lo9 8 6 c 2 2 lo8 -20 0 20 40 T ('C ) 60 80 loo 2 On B 6 4 2 lo9 8 6 4 2 2 10' N 5 .
This implies that NBR-30 has higher degree of compatibility with P(VdC-VC) than NBR-40.
This is probably due to P(VdC-VC) chains located at crystallite surfaces, which are less ordered than those in the crystalline phase, and are more compatible with NBR chains than with crystalline P(VdC-VC) chains.
This indicates that amorphous P(VdC-VC) (amp-P(VdC-VC)) chains, PVC and NBR-40 can form compatible blends.
In these ternary blends, PVC and NBR-40 are incompatible and partially compatible respectively with P(VdC-VC), but their mixtures are compatible.
Since PVC and NBR-40 are compatible, it can be conceived that their mixtures act as a material having intermediate properties compatible with amp-P(VdC-VC).
Blend 12 having a higher PVC content has a broader E" curve, indicating a higher degree of heterogeneity and a lower degree of compatibility.
This indicates that addition of PVC/NBR-40 to the amp-P(VdC-VC) phase will increase the compatibility of the amorphous phase with P(VdC-VC) chains located at the crystallite surface; the resulting mixture will be less compatible with crystalline P(VdC-VC) chains causing these chains to be more ordered.
6 and Table 2, all ternary blends investigated show a single To, indicating that NBR-30, PVC and amp-P(VdC-VC) are compatible.
It is to be noted that even each pair composed from these three components is not compatible, but they do form compatible ternary blends.
Compatibility with Solubility Parameters and Spatial Configurations The solubility parameter has been used as a powerful tool for predicting the polymer solubility in pure organic and mixed organic liquid (8), but is not successful in predicting polymer compatibility(1).
This is probably due to molecular contacts in polymer solutions and in compatible polymer blends being different.
Thus, a solubility parameter is insufficient to characterize the polymer compatibility.
The listed values are not able to satisfy these two compatibility sequences.
Although it is possible to adjust values of the solubility parameters for PVC and amp-P(VdC-VC) so that they satisfy the above two sequences of compatibility, this will prejudge the solubility parameter method to be sufficient for polymer compatibility prediction.
However it is reasonable to say that, in the absence of specific interactions, polymers having similar values of solubility parameter could be more compatible.
From structures of these polymers, it is probable that spatial configuration also plays a role in compatibility.
It is probable that conditions for compatibility require proper spatial configuration in addition to similarity in polarity and/or specific interaction.
Compatibility and Morphology Studies of PPO Multicomponent Blends BORUN LIANG' and LIHUA PAN Department of Polymeric Materials Engineering, China Textile University, Shanghai 200051, People's Republic of China SYNOPSIS The compatibility and phase morphology of poly(pheny1ene oxide) (PPO) multicomponent blends with poly(ethy1ene terephthalate) (PET) and polystyrene (PS) were studied using differential-scanning calorimetry (DSC), dynamic mechanical analysis (DMA), and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) methods.
The effect of glycidyl methacrylate-styrene copolymer (GMS), as a compatibilizer, on the morphology of the PPO blends has also been studied in detail.
The influence of the molecular weight of PET and the synergetic effect of the compatibilizers of GMS and phenoxy (PN) on the morphology were examined.
A significant improvement of the compatibility was achieved for the PPO multicomponent blends because of the synergetic effect of GMS and phenoxy.
0 1994 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. INTRODUCTION The compatibility of multicomponent blends has been a basic problem to be investigated in the development of new polymeric alloys because it dominates their phase morphologies and closely correlates with the ultimate mechanical properties of the polymer blends.
For many incompatible polymer blend systems of interest, they often possess high interfacial tension and weak adhesion at the interfaces between the dispersed phases and matrix, forming very coarse morphologies with, as a result, inferior mechanical properties.
A general route to enhance the adhesion at the interfaces of two incompatible polymeric components is by adding a third one having affinity with both of them, namely, the compatibilizer.
Much attention has recently been focused on seeking the efficient compatibilizers for the incompatible blend systems.'
The compatibility of PPO binary blends or modified PPO with PS and other polymeric components has also been studied extensively over the past year^.^-^ For further improving the processibility, oil-resistance, and impact-resistance of PPO blend materials, there were many recent patents involved in the PPO multicomponent blends containing some incompatible components, such as nylon 6,6,' nylon 6,' poly(buty1ene terephthalate)," and PET," as well as a small amount of compatibilizer.
'~,~~ In this article, the compatibility and phase morphology of PPO binary and multicomponent blends have been studied in detail.
The effect of the composition, the molecular weight of PET, and the compatibilizers on the morphology of the blends has been addressed.
RESULTS AND DISCUSSION Compatibility Analysis The compatibility of the polymer blends can be sensitively probed by their thermal and crystallization behaviors based on the DSC and DMA measurements.
For an incompatible blend system, the glass transition corresponding to the individual components will be detected, while for a miscible blend system only one glass transition exhibited a temperature between them.
Moreover, the crystallization characteristic of the crystallizable component in the incompatible blends usually remains.
The addition of GMS is expected to somewhat improve the compatibility between PPO and PET, however, PET still exhibit a distinct Tg in the ternary blends of PPO/PET/GMS with various content of GMS [Fig.
The DMA results are more sensitive to reveal the compatibility of the multicomponent blend system.
The effects of GMS, as a compatibilizer, on the morphology of PPO/PET blends are shown in Fig  PPO MULTICOMPONENT BLENDS 1951 (4 (b) Figure 5 5 GMS/10 PS; ( b ) 45 PP0/30 PET/5 GMS/20 PS.
With further substituting PET by 5 and 10 wt 7% GMS, respectively, the dimensions of the dispersed phases became smaller and smaller; moreover, it showed more irregular shape with good adhesion at the interfaces, indicating GMS is a quite good compatibilizer for the PPO/ PET blend system.
Phenoxy was also patented as a compatibilizer for the PPO/PBT blend system.I5 We considered that phenoxy has significant interaction with PET, but not with PPO.
GMS is more compatible with PPO than PET.
Comparing the morphology of 50 PP0/40 PET/ 10 PN composition with that of 50 PP0/40 PET/ 10 GMS, we can conclude that as a compatibilizer for this blend system, GMS is much better than PN, because the latter shows a rather coarse morphology with unscored voids.
CONCLUSIONS Synergetic Effect of the Cornpatibilizers It is well-known that PET is compatible with phenoxy due to the specific interaction between the hy The PPO/PET binary blend system is incompatible because of their large difference in solubility parameters, the morphology of which is markedly depen  1952 LIANG AND PAN Figure 6 Synergetic effect of GMS and phenoxy on the morphology of PPO/PET blends: ( a ) 50 PP0/40 PET/10 PN; ( b ) 50 PP0/40 PET/5 GMS/5 PN; (c) 50 PP0/35 PET/5 GMS / 10 PN.
J. R. Fried, G. A. Hanna, and H. Kalkanoglu, in Polymer Compatibility and Incompatibility, K. Solc, Ed., Hawood Academic Pub., New York, 1982, p. 237.
F. E. Karasz and W. J. MacKnight, in Polymer Compatibility and Incompatibility, K. Solc, Ed., Hawood Academic Pub., New York, 1982, p. 165.
Enhanced Compatibility of SAN and PC in Their Blends Exposed to Extremely High Shear Field HIDEROH TAKAHASHI, TAKAAKI MATSUOKA, TAKASHI OHTA, KENZO FUKUMORI, TOSHIO KURAUCHI, and OSAMI KAMIGAITO, Toyotu Central Research and Development Laboratories, Inc., Nagakute-cho, Aichi-gun, Aichiken, 48011, Japan Synopsis Originally incompatible blends of SAN 30% and PC 70% were extruded with extremely high shear rate up to lo7 s-l as a typical example of the blends.
These show that some of SAN is mixed with PC in a compatible form.
This result shows the compatibility of SAN with PC is enhanced in extremely high shear rate processing.
Among the blends, some of them are incompatible, and others are partially compatible.
The reason for this separation of the compatible blend from the incompatible one is not fully Some studies have been made on the influence of processing on the blend.5 However, that of the extremely high shear rate above 1 X lo4 s-l has not been made yet.
In this work, the extremely high shear rate processing is applied to the incompatible blend, and some typical characters and properties are investigated in relation to the shear rate.
Therefore, the blend used in this study is considered to be incompatible essentially in conventional processing.
The decrease of the fractional volume of SAN means that SAN must be dispersed in PC like a compatible constituent.
Then the small particle a t the dimple bottom must be PC, which suggests that PC is also dispersed in SAN like a compatible constituent in the blend exposed a t the extremely high shear rate.
From these observations, formation of mutual compatibility among SAN and PC is suggested.
This suggests that the constituents become mutually compatible.
The variation of each T, with N means that both materials, SAN and PC, are modified by each other, which also means that the blends are forced to be compatible to each other by the high shear.6 This result is consistent with the results obtained through SEM observation and dynamic loss tangent measurement.
Originally incompatible blends of SAN 30% and PC 70% were extruded with an extremely high shear rate up to lo7 s-'.
The decrease of the fractional volume of SAN means that SAN must be dispersed in PC like a compatible constituent.
This suggests that also PC is dispersed in SAN like a compatible constituent in the blend exposed to the extremely high shear rate.
This also suggests that the constituents are forced to be mutually compatible.
These show that some of SAN is mixed with ' PC in a compatible form.
It is concluded by this study that compatibility of SAN with PC is enhanced in extremely high shear rate processing.
A Fast Economical Method for Chemical Com patibility Determinations* Leroy C. Oberholtzer Rockwell International Collins Division Cedar Rapids, Iowa 52498 In my 30 plus years of mechanical engineering practice, I have found that the two conditions that cause unsatisfactory plastic applications are differential coefficient of expansion and chemical incompatibility between two adjoining materials.
This paper will describe a method, not new by any means, that will establish the degree of compatibility between a plastic material and one with which it will be brought into contract.
Most engineers and technicians who are not in the daily practice of plastic part design and application have the misapprehension that compatibility between a plastic and a second material either is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.
years with a major appliance manufacturer testing and designing refrigeration equipment, he, like many of his colleagues in the 1950s, learned about plastic chemical compatibility with a second material the hard way.
We also found that some of the plasticizers used in the PVC door gaskets were incompatible with the HIPS door liner.
In both these cases, it was only under specific conditions that incompatibility between these two materials and HIPS existed.
Applying butter to a sample of HIPS sheet and a plasticizer to another sheet sample and leaving them lying on the desk indicated no incompatibility.
We therefore had to conclude that the stress level of the plastic material must have an effect on chemical compatibility.
This lead us to realize that temperature was another independent variable determining chemical compatibility between a plastic and second material.
In the early 195Os, the author observed chemical compatibility tests being conducted by one of the major material suppliers using an elliptical bar.
If an agent produces no affect on a specimen at the highest temperature, the test ceases here and the two materials are considered to be compatible.
Also, if a catastrophic failure (specimen actually breaks) occurs within 1 h at room temperature, the agent is considered incompatible.
Up until this point, we have established two classifications of compatibility: incompatible and compatible.
This type of result is called conditional compatibility.
At Rockwell, we have developed an interactive computer program that develops a complete report for conditional compatibility.
A report is resident on our computer for every chemical compatibility test conducted.
000000 Object: To determine the compatibility of Lexan 940 PC by G.E.
000000 Object: To determine the compatibility of Lexan 940 PC by G.E.
In avoinics products, where a material will be used in a functional part that will affect the accuracy of an instrument or control mechanism, only material combinations producing a compatible result will be specified.
Tests revealed that the compatibility between the lubricant and the dial material was conditional.
In conclusion, the eliptical bar chemical compatibility test yields extremely dependable results under conditions of compatibility and incompatibility.
If an absolute safe approach must be taken for a given application, a conditional situation should be considered incompatible; however, a dependable judgment can be made by a very experienced practitioner.
In the presence of dicumyl peroxide, the ABSTRACT: compatibility of thermal plasticized starch/linear low-density polyethylene (TPS/LLDPE) blends using maleic anhydride (MAH) as compatibilizer was investigated.
The thermal plasticization of starch and its compatibilizing modiﬁcation with LLDPE was accomplished in a single-screw extruder at the same time.
Finally, the dynamic thermal mechanical analysis results indicated that, with the addition of MAH, the compatibility between TPS and LLDPE in the blends was substantially improved.
© 2004 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 93: 686–695, 2004 Key words: starch; polyethylene (PE); blends; compatibility; rheology INTRODUCTION Over the last 50 years, synthetic polymers have become the major new materials replacing the traditional ones such as paper, glass, steel, and aluminum in many applications.1 These new synthetic polymers have many advantages, such as high tensile strength and elongation at break, and are easily produced into various end products with desirable properties.
To increase the interfacial adhesion and further improve the mechanical properties, a compatibilizer must be used.
The ethylene–acrylic acid (EAA) copolymer is the most effective compatibilizer used so far, but it must be used in large amounts to achieve satisfactory mechanical properties.
In the present study, we ﬁrst used MAH as the compatibilizer in a thermal plasticized starch/linear low-density polyethylene (TPS/LLDPE) system, in the presence of dicumyl peroxide.
The main objective was to test the compatibility of these blends.
Another parameter affecting the morphology and properties of polymeric blends is the use of compatibilizer.
Preliminary studies showed that a ﬁner and more uniform dispersion of starch in the LDPE matrix could be achieved in the blends compatibilized with PE-g-MAH copolymers.19 To see the interfacial structure between the matrix and the dispersed phase, SEM micrographs of fracture surfaces were obtained and are shown in Figure 1.
Nonetheless, on the other hand, the compatibility was improved with increasing MAH content.
In samples 6 and 11, however, the arrangement of molecules was more orderly than that of sample 1 because of the good plasticization of starch and good compatibility between TPS and LLDPE.
Thus TPS and LLDPE in the samples were not compatibilized at the molecular level.
Although the compatibility at the molecular level was impossible, the interaction power between TPS and LLDPE in the sample was improved Figure 8 DMA thermogram of samples: storage modulus.
We did not obtain a continuously uniform system, although the improvement in compatibility promoted good mechanical properties and thermal stability in the blends.
However, the phenomenon of compatibility can be induced in an immiscible binary system by introducing a third component that either will interact chemically with both phases or will have speciﬁc interaction with one phase and physical interaction with the other.
The addition of a block or graft copolymer reduces the interfacial tension between the two phases, increases the surface area of the dispersed phase, promotes adhesion between the phase components, and stabilizes the dispersed phase morphology.25 Investigation of PE-g-MAH, used as compatibilizer between starch and PE, was reported in a number of studies in the literature.18,26 –28 A uniform viewpoint that PE-g-MAH was used as compatibilizer is based on two factors: (1) the ester-forming ability of anhydride groups with hydroxyl groups on starch, the hydrogen bond–forming ability between carboxyl groups of hydrolyzed MAH and hydroxyl groups on starch; the substantial compatibility between grafted PE chain and PE phase.
This veriﬁed the fact that MAH grafted onto LLDPE in the presence of DCP, and was used as a compatibilizer in the TPS/LLDPE blends during the extrusion.
All of the above phenomena are ascribed to the improvement in the compatibility between TPS and LLDPE.
Solubility and molecular compatibility effects in the blends of fullerene derivatives with some electron donor copolymers.
The obtained results suggest strongly that some peculiarities of the molecular structures of the fullerene derivatives induce better or worse compatibility of these compounds with the electron donor polymers (P3ATs or conjugated copolymers).
At the same time, the side chains attached to the polymer backbone also improve or hinder compatibility of the polymers with the certain fullerene derivatives.
However, the molecular compatibility effects might be considered as superior parameter influencing the behavior of the fullerene/polymer composites if the solubility of the fullerene component in chlorobenzene lies in the range of 17-75 mg/ml.
Nevertheless, we believe that general principles, particularly the material solubility and material compatibility effects presented in this work, have to be considered for any fullerene derivative/polymer system regardless the film processing conditions.
Butanedio and succinic acid were used to ensure a good compatibility between PBBS and PBS, while 2,3-BDO was introduced into PBBS to inhibit the crystallization of PBBS and promote high elasticity of PBBS.
Besides, 2,3-BDO could tailor the compatibility between PBBS and PBS and helps to adjust the phase separated structure.
The synthesized PBBS shows a super toughing effect on PBS without any compatilizer, which could contribute to a wider application of PBS.
Key words: poly(butylene succinate), 2,3-butanediol, toughening, bio-based, compatibility 2  1.
Poly(hydroxybutyrate)(PHB)[10], hydroxyapatite (HA)[11] and fibers[12-17] were used to improve the toughness of PBS, however, the compatibility between these tougheners and PBS are bad.
Generally, compatibility between matrix and the toughener is the key to determine the phase microstructure and the toughening effect.
Low compatibility usually lead to bad toughing effect.
As most tougheners used during blending show low compatibility with PBS, ,current research focus on improving compatibility between PBS and the toughener by addition of compatibilizers or reactive compatibilization.
However, nearly all these tougheners need compatibilizer, which limited their applications.
In our previous work, polyester elastomers showed excellent toughing effect on PLA without any compatibilizer [5, 22].
In order to further improve the compatibility between the polyester elastomer and PBS, 1,4-butanediol and succinic acid were used as monomers to form the same structure fragment with PBS.
More important, 2,3-BDO could tailor the compatibility between the synthesized polyester and PBS.
Synthesis and characterization of poly (2,3-butanediol/1,4-butanediol/succinate) (PBBS) with different molar contents of 2,3Butanediol (2,3-BDO) A series of PBBS were prepared through varying the 2,3-BDO initial ratio in order to restrain the crystallization of PBBS and tailor the compatibility between PBBS and PBS.
The compatibility between the toughener and matrix is the key to determine the 9  phase microstructure and the toughening effect.
However, because the structure of PBBS is similar to PBS, which may provide over-high compatibility between them and lead to homogeneous phase microstructure.
Only suitable compatibility between PBS and toughener could help to form phase separated microstructure with small particle size and uniform distribution, which is beneficial to improve toughening effect of blends.
The popular oftyzer−Van Krevelen method was used to calculate the solubility parameter of PBBS aiming to predict its compatibility with PBS [26].
Therefore, in order to achieve the best toughing effect, the structure of PBBS was tailored by 2,3-BDO to adjust the compatibility between PBBS and PBS.
The increasing content of 2,3-BDO in PBBS may not only tailor the compatibility between PBBS and PBS according to our calculation to form sea-island phase separated microstructure, but also restrain the crystallization in PBBS to achieve high elasticity, both of which could promote good toughening effect of PBS.
The compatibility of PBBS/PBS blends 12  Beside the calculation of solution parameters to predict the compatibility between PBBS and PBS, the compatibility between PBBS and PBS were confirmed by both Atomic Force Microscope (AFM) and Dynamic Mechanical Thermal Analysis (DMTA) methods.
For PBBS-40/PBS, PBBS-50/PBS, and PBBS-60/PBS blends, they also show only one Tg, demonstrating these blends are miscible system with over-high compatibility, which lead to homogeneous phase microstructure.
Both the AFM and DMTA results confirmed the incorporation of 2,3-BDO in PBBS may tailor the compatibility with PBS, leading to phase separated microstructure, which would be beneficial to effective toughening.
The etched impact fractured surfaces of these two samples presented homogeneous phase microstructure which indicated the over-high compatibility between PBS and PBBS-40/50, which caused the limited toughening effect.
Further increased in 2,-3BOD content of PBBS decreased the compatibility between PBBS-80 and PBS, which lead to decreased toughening effect.
Only when the two components with appropriate compatibility could form phase separated microstructure with small particle size and uniform distribution.
The compatibility between PBBSs and PBS was investigated by AFM and DMTA, demonstrating that the incorporation of 2,3-BDO into PBBS could tailor the compatibility between PBBSs and PBS.
Appropriate compatibility was very important for achieving high toughing effect of PBBS on PBS.
The incorporation of 2,3-BDO into PBBS successfully inhibits the crystallization of PBBS and tailors the compatibility of PBBS and PBS.
The polymer blends were tested, using various methods, to determine if they are compatible as solids.
Data obtained from dynamic mechanical and DSC measurements show that, when they are mixed under given Brabender mix conditions, the blends exhibit properties characteristic of polymer pairs compatible as solids.
Using micrographs obtained by light microscopy in phase contrast as criteria, two companion blends containing PMMAIPVAc S0/20 would be classified as incompatible as solids because of the differences in refractive index of PMMA and PVAc.
The micrographs also show that, in the system that would otherwise be listed as compatible, the PVAc domains appear to be relatively uniform in size and distribution through the PMMA matrix.
These results indicated that the system is incompatible as solids.
The companion blends 90/10-1, 85/15-3, and 80/20-5, respectively, exhibit properties of incompatible polymer systems.
The results given in Table I and Figure 1 show that below about 48"C, a polymer pair incompatible as solids exhibits a storage modulus higher than its companion set.
Above these temperatures, modulus of the incompatible polymer blend decreases a t a faster rate than that of its companion compatible pair.
The data indicate that in the incompatible polymer blends, PVAc segments retain the capability to manifest a high inherent storage modulus independent of the PR4hIA constituent.
PVAc, then, exhibits the capability of converting the energy imparted to the specimen under rapid loading conditions to heat more efficiently than PMMA and at a temperature closc to that employed in the impact strength test.3 The data indicate that, in the compatible polymer blends, the mobility of the PVAc chains is restricted in some manner by the presence of the PAIMA constituent.
It is generally reported that if a film prepared from a blend of two polymers is cloudly, the polymer pair is incompatible as solids.
However, other methods used in compatibility studies, such as dynamic mechanical property tests and differential scanning calorimetry, indicate that under certain conditions the polymers apparently exhibit an affinity for each other.
Evidently, depending upon the method used in the compatibility studies, the size and distribution of the constituent polymers in the blend are important  2008 SCHNEIER Fig.
If the investigator is interested in systems that are compatible as solids, eq.
W. CHEN,' and H. C. TSENG3 'institute of Materials Science and Engineering, National Taiwan University, Taipei, Taiwan 106, 2Departrnent of Chemical Engineering, National Taiwan University, Taipei, Taiwan 106, and 3Department of Chemical Engineering, National Taiwan Institute of Technology, Taipei, Taiwan 106 SYNOPSIS The specific volume of polymer blends with different degree of compatibility has been measured at high pressure, up to 2000 kg/cm2, in the molten state by a dilatometer.
In the present study a dilatometer based on the design published in the literature has been developed and employed to measure the specific volume of polymers and polyblends at high temperature and pre~sure.~,~' The phase behavior of polymer blends can provide information related to the degree of compatibility.
Miscible blends have been widely studied; However, only few studies have been developed to determine the degree of compatibility for the phase-separated polyblend systems.
Recently, the technique has been extensively used for some partially compatible polymer blend^.^'-^^ The compatibility of polymer blends can be estimated from the experimental values of glass transition temperature shift (AT,) and heat capacity increment (AC,) by using differential scanning calorimetry (DSC ) .
In our present research, the DSC method is applied to examine the degree of compatibility of polymer blends.
Furthermore, this study expands on our previous studies of polymers and their composites to develop a suitably quantitative description of specific volume of polymer blends with different degree of compatibility.
It is well known that incompatibility exists for the blend of PS and BR, and therefore two T i s were observed.
The degree of compatibiIity of one polymer in another for a partially compatible polymer blend is dependent on the shift values of the two Tg's of blending polymers related to each component and is defined empirically by the following form: DC (degree of compatibility) = ( T i Tg,b)/( T," T,,c) X 100% where T," and Tg,b are the T, of the homopolymer in pure state and blends, respectively.
From the definition described above, the degree of compatibility of PS and BR in the PS-BR blend is calculated and listed in Table 111.
A low degree of compatibility is found for the PS-BR blends.
Specific Volume of Compatible System Based on previous DSC results, the SBR random copolymers ( SBRs) with various styrene content have been identified as compatible mixtures.
In order to estimate the excess volume of the compatible system at zero pressure, the combing rule of polymer blend systems was assumed 2 2 V = C C 4L4,V:(1 k , ) k , = 0 for i = j V: = Vp 1 = 1 r = l 100 140 180 220 260 300 Temperature ("C) Figure 8 Temperature dependence of specific volume of SBR random copolymers with various PS content (wt W ) at 1000 kgf/cmz: ( A ) SBR-10; (17) SBR-23.5; (0) SBR-60; ( X ) SBR-85; (-) Eq.
PS content ( wt % ) 1 100 I 80 Figure 9 Concentration dependence of excess specific volume of SBR random copolymers with various PS content (wt % ) at 1000 kgf/cm2: ( A ) 110°C; ( 0 ) 140°C; (-) predict excess specific volume with k&, = 0.0063. and k, = k,i for i # j (14) where k, is a parameter accountable for compatibility and V is the specific volume of selfand cross interactions.
A positive K , is in response to the existence of compatibility in the blend.
Specific Volume of Incompatible System In the previous research,47 the specific volumes of composites consisting of polypropylene and untreated glass fiber have been measured.
The polymer composites of polypropylene used in the study are considered an incompatible two-phase system.
Specific Volume of Partially Compatible System In order to estimate the composition of PS-rich and BR-rich domains in this partially compatible systems, it is essential to assume that the blending of the PS and the BR could reach an equilibrium state and form two independent domains, that is, a PSrich domain and a BR-rich domain.
According to the previous results, the Couchman equation can predict the T i s of the compatible SBR.
For the partially compatible blend of the PS and BR, it is reasonable to divide those two domains into domain a, associated with a PS-rich SBR, and domain b , associated with a BR-rich SBR.
is the specific volume of the i As shown in Figure 12, it is found that this additive rule is suitable to predict the specific volumes of this partially compatible PS-BR blends.
The PS-BR blend was found partially compatible with two separated domains of compatible phases.
The specific volumes of polymer blends are the function of the defined “degree of compatibility.” The specific volume of a compatible blend at a constant composition or a homopolymer in the melt state can be calculated by an semiempirical equation derived from the Tait equation.
The specific volumes of the partially compatible PS-BR blends can be solved through derived equations.
The specific volume of an incompatible blend obeys the principle of additivity from the weight fractions of the specific volume of the corresponding individual domain.
Ó 2007 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 106: 3125–3135, 2007 Key words: compatibility; immiscibility; morphology INTRODUCTION Blending has now emerged as a major tool for obtaining new polymeric materials with desired properties.
Physical compatibilization and reactive compatibilization are used to reduce the interfacial tension between the two phases and improve their interfacial adhesion.
Effective compatibilizing agents should be able to minimize the interfacial tension and reduce the size of the dispersed phase.
Block and graft copolymers with covalently connected immiscible blocks have demonstrated very effective compatibilization activity in immiscible blends.1–3 The addition of inorganic ﬁllers to an immiscible polymer blend provides an alternative way to modify its interfacial properties.
The use of mineral ﬁllers as compatibilizers is more economical than the use of copolymers.
The role of organically modiﬁed layered siliFigure 18 Comparison of the compatibilization mechanisms of (a) a diblock copolymer and (b) a clay platelet.
cate as a compatibilizer for immiscible polystyrene with polypropylene or polypropylene grafted with maleic anhydride was recently reported by Ray et al.41 The effect of nanometer-sized silica particles on the ﬂow-induced morphology of immiscible polymer blends was studied for a polydimethylsiloxane (PDMS)/polyisobutylene (PIB) model blend by Vermant et al.42 A stable droplet/matrix microstructure was obtained for blends of 30% PIB and 70% PDMS or the opposite composition.
The authors proposed that blends stabilized by solid particles could provide an interesting alternative to blends compatibilized by block copolymers.
Figure 18 shows a schematic comparison of the compatibilization mechanisms of a clay platelet and a diblock copolymer.
For a diblock copolymer, blocks A and B are compatible with phases A and B, respectively, and their connecting covalent link appears at the interface of the two phases.
761 763 The preparative applications of the isocyanides are generally compatible with the so-called solid phase techniques /6/.
This communication reports on the synthesis of two classes of isocyano polymer supports, 2 and 2, with a wide range of chemical composition, topographical design and general solvent compatibility.
Our previously reported synthesis of polymer-bound isocyanides /lo/ involved lengthy synthetic pathways: the resulting resins had limited solvent compatibility and synthetic utility.
Due to their copolymer structure, as well as the polymerization conditions employed during their initial synthesis /12,13/, all of the listed polymers show more or less general solvent compatibility.
765 767 able through suspension copolymerization of p with 3 and the crosslinking agents &;s. References CI e Pp: R4l.n: 1; & R=H.n=S; &:R = H. I)= 2; g:R:He.n=l; 4, however, cannot be made by copolyThe formamide resins merization, because styrene and the required formamido derivatives of acrylic acid are not compatible as commers for suspension polymerization.
Compatibility of Polypeptide Blends of Poly(y-Butyl Glutamate) lPoly(yBenzy1 Glutamate) YOSHIHARU TSUJITA, * MASAMI IKENOUCHI, MASAHIKO INUKAI, and AKIRA TAKIZAWA, Department of Polymer Engineering, Nagoya Institute of Technology, Gokiso-cho, Showa-ku, Nagoya 466, Japan Synopsis The compatibility of poly(y-butyl glutamate)/poly(y-benzyl glutamate) blend was examined by the estimation of the side chain dispersion of polypeptides in terms of the condition of preparation of blend films and the blend ratio.
On the other hand, the polypeptide blend cast for long time did show incompatibility, irrespective of the blend ratio or mole fraction.
INTRODUCTION The compatibility of many flexible polymer blends is summarized by Krause.'
Many compatible polymer blend systems have been discovered, and study on the compatibility of new blend systems has been continued.
It is necessary to study the compatibility on the blend of rigid rod polymer and flexible polymer and that of rigid rod polymers from the standpoint of an application of polymer materials.
Here, our trial to understand the compatibility of blends of rigid rod polymers was performed for the a helical poly(y-butyl glutamate) (PBuG)/ poly(y-benzyl glutamate) (PBeG) blend.
One has to take into account the intermolecular mixing of the side chain attaching to each a helix, when considering the compatibility of the rigid rod polypeptide blends.
In the present paper we studied the compatibility of PBuG/PBeG polypeptide blend.
Since the a helix of two-component polypeptides remains unchanged by blending, the compatibility of polypeptide blends is characterized by that of the side chain of polypeptides.
Therefore, the characteristic point is whether the entire intimate mixing between the side chains belonging to each a helix is possible or not, differing from the compatibility of a segment unit of flexible polymer blends.
From these standpoint, the compatibility was determined by either single or double side chain dispersion.
It was found that the compatibility of these blend systems depended upon the casting condition of a blend preparation.
Furthermore, structural change in incompatible phase due to compositions was proposed by the island-matrix structural model.
The appearance of single or double side chain dispersion was examined in order to investigate the compatibility of polypeptide blend, as the compatibility of flexible polymers was estimated by the primary dispersion.
This suggests a compatible PBuG/PBeG polypeptide blend, when casting time is very short.
In fact, the solution of this blend is so transparent even in concentrated solution that the blend is considered to be compatible in very concentrated solution.
The PBuG/PBeG polypeptide blend became incompatible as casting time increased.
Therefore, this polypeptide blend is thermodynamically incompatible system in the solid state.
It is considered that the PBuG/PBeG polypeptide blend of a very short casting time is apparently compatible, but it is in unstable and nonequilibrium state.
An exothermic peak (AH = 0.1 cal/g) appeared at 121.5"C, indicating that unstable and compatible PBuG/PBeG polypeptide as-cast blend transformed into incompatible in the solid state and separated phase corresponding to the thermodynamically stable state.
PC 1 ation observed for poly(y-methyl glutamate) around 140-190°C are ascribed to the migrational slip or rotational motion of a helix and to the accordionlike torsional extension or bending motion of the a helix core, respectively.lOJ1 Thus the phase transition from unstable compatible phase to stable incompatible phase takes place easily under a helix molecular motions above 120°C.
The compatibility of PBuG/PBeG (1 / 1) polypeptide blend was determined by casting condition and casting time.
This blend system was thermodynamically incompatible.
Next we study the compatibility of PBuG/PBeG polypdptide blend with various compositions prepared with a casting time of 4 days.
The dispersion temperature corresponding to maximum tan 6 was almost the constant, -13”C, while the dispersion temperature around 35°C lowered gradually with increasing mole fraction of PBuG, indicative of the compatibility of a small amount of PBuG to the PBeGrich separated phase.
Apparently compatible polypeptide blend could be obtained when cast by a very short casting time.
Ultrasonic and density investigations revealed the efficiency of adding LDPE in improving the compatibility behavior of this blend.
The degree of compatibility of the two polymer components is the fundamental property which plays an essential role in applicability of the final product in many industrial fields.
Many of the polymer blends are found to be incompatible showing multiphase morphology.
However, these blends can be made compatible by the addition of a proper compatiblizing agent in small concentrations.
E-mail: nadarwish@yahoo.com compatibility.
Many authors, using different methods, have studied the degree of compatibility theoretically and experimentally.
Many authors suggested a method for investigating the degree of compatibility using scanning electron microscopy.
Recent researches showed that the ultrasonic velocity, density and elastic moduli measurements can reveal the extent of compatibility of polymer blends.
The authors clarified that in compatible blends, the mentioned parameters varied linearly with composition whereas in case of incompatible blends these parameters deviate from linearity.
The ultrasonic attenuation measurements were also used to predict compatibility.
[13] reported that the presence of only single peak in attenuation, composition relation can be taken as an evidence of compatible blend.
The existence of double peaks indicates the incompatibility behavior of the blend.
Recently, the compatibility using ultrasonic transition temperature and measuring ultrasonic attenuation as a function of temperature has been determined[10,11,14].
The presence of one ultrasonic temperature peak indicates the existence of one phase and consequently the compatibility behavior of this blend.
In the present work, we attempt to evaluate rheological, mechanical, elastic, morphological and compatibility behavior of SBR=NBR rubber blend containing LDPE and HDPE by various analytical techniques.
1c), this may be due to the higher extent of branching in LDPE which allows the rubber macromolecules to be dispersed into the LDPE voids giving rise to such enhancement in the compatibility between SBR and NBR rubber blend.
evidence for an incompatible blend system.
This may be explained by the changes that occur in the domain structure and lead to better compatibility between the two components of the blend containing LDPE than that with HDPE.
It is quite clear from the figures that the addition of LDPE improves the compatibility behavior of SBR=NBR blend as the linearity of the relation is observed.
This behavior indicates the presence of two immiscible phases which in turn is an indication for the incompatibility feature of the blend system[9].
On the other hand, the incorporation of HDPE in the blend gives a curve of an ‘‘S’’ shape which indicates the formation of a semi compatible blend.
The presence of these two peaks indicates that the two components of the blend are phase separated and incompatible.
Table 6 shows that the addition of 10 phr LDPE reduced the difference between the two transition temperatures measured by both techniques and hence the degree of compatibility could be enhanced.
The presence of two glass transition temperatures does not imply complete incompatibility of the two components[25,26], that is, the two phases could be present with some degree of compatibility, with the first phase possibly rich in one component and the second is rich in the other.
Glass transition behavior of compatible polymer blends.
Investigation of the compatibility of butadieneacrylonitrile copolymers with poly(vinyl chloride).
Viscoelastic behavior of noncompatible polymer blends: Polystyrene-polycarbonate.
Belaribi, C.; Marin, C.; Monge, P. Viscoelastic and thermal behavior of partially compatible polymer blends polycarbonate=tetramethyl polycarbonate.
The effect of compatibilization on blends of polypropylene with a liquid-crystalline polymer.
Ultrasonic and viscometric investigation of isro polyol in various solvents and its compatibility with polypropylene glycol.
Study of compatibility of polystyrene with ethylene propylene-diene rubber.
Ultrasonic investigation on compatibility of PVC-modified liquid natural rubber blends.
K. Effect of compatibilizer on the crystallization, rheological, and tensile properties of LDPE=EVOH blends.
; Mounir, A. Compatibilization of SBR=NBR blends using poly acrylonitrile as compatibilizer.
Blends of nylon with polyethylene: Effect of compatibilization on mechanical and dynamic mechanical properties.
Sailaja, R. Mechanical properties of esterified tapioca starch LDPE blends using LDPE-co-Glycidyl methacrylate as compatibilizer.
The toughness depends on the compatibility of PDMS–urethane and PMMA segments in the copolymers.
© 2002 John Wiley & Sons, Inc. J Appl Polym Sci 83: 1875–1885, 2002 Key words: 2,4-TDI; m-XDI; PDMS-g-PMMA; compatibility; impact INTRODUCTION Poly(methyl methacrylate) (PMMA) prepared by free-radical polymerization exhibits high transparency, weather resistance, and nontoxicity.
patibility of PDMS and PMMA, the copolymer will show phase separation.7 Considering the intermolecular association, hydrogen bonding is a stronger intermolecular force than Van der Waals force, which can improve the compatibility of two structurally different polymers.9,10 In this study, urethane groups are anticipated to be associated with the PDMS– oligomer chain ends and to improve the compatibility of PDMS–urethane and PMMA in the copolymer by hydrogen bonding between urethanes of PDMS–urethane and ester groups of PMMA.
The compatibility and impact strength of PDMS urethane-co-PMMA graft copolymers resulting from the structural differences between 2,4-TDI and m-XDI are discussed.
The result indicates that the compatibility of copolymer in the 2,4-TDI system is better than that in the m-XDI system.
In addition to the glass-transition behavior, the compatibility of a polymer pair can be determined by observing the optical clarity of the copolymer.
From the preceding observations, the structural difference in the diisocyanates does affect the compatibility of PDMS–urethane and PMMA segments in the copolymer.
Considering the structure of the copolymer, although both m-XDI and 2,4-TDI possess a meta-substituted aromatic group, the functional group that adjoins the isocyanate group dominates the resultant compatibility of urethane-containing polymers.
In a subsequent report,15 the reason for this difference in the compatibility between the 2,4TDI and the m-XDI systems will be further investigated.
Results show that the structural differences in the diisocyanates affect the compatibility of PDMS–urethane and PMMA segments.
The function of the toughening matrix of PDMS–urethane in copolymer is dependent on the compatibility of PDMS–urethane and PMMA segments.